District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2025”.
TITLE I. GOVERNMENT DIRECTION AND SUPPORT
SUBTITLE A. FOIA CLARIFICATION
Sec. 1001. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Freedom of Information Clarification Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 1002. Section 204(a) of the Freedom of Information Act of 1976, effective March
29, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-534(a)), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (20) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
(b) Paragraph (21) is amended by striking the period and inserting a semicolon in its
place.
(c) New paragraphs (22) and (23) are added to read as follows:
“(22) Information or data provided by any court, federal agency, or federally
established agency to the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council, established by the Criminal
Justice Coordinating Council for the District of Columbia Establishment Act of 2001, effective
October 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 14-28; D.C. Official Code § 22-4231 et seq.);”
“(23) Information or data provided by any court, federal agency, or federally
established agency to the District of Columbia Sentencing Commission, established by the
Advisory Commission on Sentencing Establishment Act of 1998, effective October 16, 1998
(D.C. Law 12-167; D.C. Official Code § 3-101 et seq.); and”.
SUBTITLE B. CULTURAL AND COMMUNITY AFFAIRS
Sec. 1011. Short title.
8

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This subtitle may be cited as the “Cultural and Community Affairs Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 1012. Cultural and community affairs grants.
(a) The Mayor may issue grants, in accordance with the requirements set forth in the
Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official
Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), to individuals and organizations that provide services to District
residents to support cultural affairs, community relations, and community partnerships.
(b) The Mayor shall provide centralized review and approval of grants issued pursuant to:
(1) Section 303(10) of the District of Columbia Latino Community Development
Act, effective September 29, 1976 (D.C. Law 1-86; D.C. Code § 2-1313(10));
(2) Section 3(c)(10) of the Office and Commission on African Affairs Act of
2006, effective June 8, 2006 (D.C Law 16-111; D.C. Official Code § 2-1392(c)(10));
(3) Section 3(b)(3) of the Office on African American Affairs Establishment Act
of 2017, effectively February 17, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-59; D.C. Official Code § 2-1398.02(b)(3));
(4) Section 304(c)(9) of the Office on Asian and Pacific Islander Affairs
Establishment Act of 2001, effective October 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 14-28; D.C. Official Code § 2-
1373(c)(9));
(5) Sections 4(b)(11), (11A), and (12) and 4a of the Office of Gay, Lesbian,
Bisexual, and Transgender Affairs Act of 2006, effective April 4, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-89; D.C.
Official Code §§ 2-1383(b)(11), (11A), and (12), and 2-1384);
(6) Section 3(b)(3) of the Office on Caribbean Affairs Establishment Act of 2020,
effective May 6, 2020 (D.C. Law 23-87; D.C Official Code § 3-1452(b)(3));
(7) Section 3(b)(2)(L) of the Office on Ex-Offender Affairs and Commission on
Re-entry and Ex-Offender Affairs Establishment Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007 (D.C.
Law 16-243; D.C. Official Code § 24-1302(b)(2)(L)); and
(8) Section 704(6A) of the Office of Veterans Affairs Establishment Act of 2001,
effective October 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 14-28; D.C. Official Code § 49-1003(6A)).
Sec. 1013. Section 304(c)(8) of the Office on Asian and Pacific Islander Affairs
Establishment Act of 2001, effective October 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 14-28; D.C. Official Code § 2-
1373(c)(8)), is amended by striking the phrase “of the Office in accordance with an act of
Congress” and inserting the phrase “of the Office” in its place.
Sec. 1014. The Commission on Fathers, Men, and Boys Establishment Act of 2014,
effective February 26, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-155; D.C. Official Code § 3-731 et seq.), is repealed.
9

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 1015. Section 3 of the Office on Ex-Offender Affairs and the Commission on Re-
Entry and Ex-Offender Affairs Establishment Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007 (D.C. Law
16-243; D.C. Official Code § 24-1302), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “is established, as a subordinate
Executive agency within the Public Safety and Justice cluster,” and inserting the phrase “is
established” in its place.
(b) Subsection (b)(2) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (I) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(2) The second subparagraph (J) is redesignated as subparagraph (K).
(3) Subparagraph (J) is amended by striking the period and inserting a semicolon
in its place.
(4) Subparagraph (K) is amended by striking the period and inserting a semicolon
in its place.
(5) Subparagraph (L) is amended as follows:
(A) The lead-in language is amended to read as follows:
“(L) Have the authority to establish and implement a program to support
the employment of returning citizens through grants to employers; provided, that:”.
(B) Sub-subparagraph (i) is amended as follows:
(i) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “the
pilot program” and inserting the phrase “the program” in its place.
(ii) Sub-sub-subparagraph (II) is amended by striking the phrase
“the pilot program” and inserting the phrase “the program” in its place.
(iii) Sub-sub-subparagraph (VIII) is amended by striking the
phrase “the pilot program” and inserting the phrase “the program” in its place.
(C) Sub-subparagraph (iii) is amended as follows:
(i) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “the
pilot program” and inserting the phrase “the program” in its place.
(ii) Sub-sub-subparagraph (II) is amended by striking the phrase
“the pilot program” and inserting the phrase “the program” in its place.
(D) Sub-subparagraph (iv) is amended as follows:
(i) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “the
pilot program” and inserting the phrase “the program” in its place.
(ii) Sub-sub-subparagraph (I) is amended by striking the phrase
“the pilot program” and inserting the phrase “the program” in its place.
(iii) Sub-sub-subparagraph (II) is amended by striking the phrase
“the pilot program” and inserting the phrase “the program” in its place.
10

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(E) Sub-subparagraph (v) is amended as follows:
(i) Sub-sub-subparagraph (I) is amended by striking the phrase
“the pilot program” both times it appears and inserting the phrase “the program” in its place.
(ii) Sub-sub-subparagraph (III) is amended by striking the period
and inserting a semicolon in its place.
(6) Subparagraph (M) is amended by striking the period and inserting a semicolon
in its place.
(7) Subparagraph (N)(iv) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; and” in its place.
SUBTITLE C. SURPLUS PROPERTY FUND
Sec. 1021. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Surplus Property Sales Fund Emergency Amendment
Act of 2025”.
Sec. 1022. Section 805 of the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective
October 22, 2015 (D.C. Law 21-36; D.C. Official Code § 2-358.05), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) Money in the Fund shall be used to pay the operational costs of OCP.”.
(b) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
SUBTITLE D. RECREATIONAL FACILITIES ASSESSMENT
Sec. 1031. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Recreational Facilities Assessment Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 1032. The Department of General Services Establishment Act of 2011, effective
September 14, 2011 (D.C. Law 19-21; D.C. Official Code § 10-551.01 et. seq.), is amended by
adding a new section 1028i to read as follows:
“Sec. 1028i. Recreational facilities assessment.
“(a) The Department shall conduct an annual survey to update information on the
condition of spray parks, artificial turf fields, playgrounds, and courts such as tennis, pickleball,
basketball, or other similar hard surface courts, as determined by the Department, at recreational
11

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
facilities. The survey results shall be disaggregated by facility, made publicly available, and
transmitted to the Council, the Council chairpersons with oversight jurisdiction over the
Department and the Department of Parks and Recreation, and the Office of the City
Administrator by March 1 of each year.
“(b) For the purposes of this section, the term “recreation facility” shall have the same
meaning as set forth in section 1028c(a)(2).”.
SUBTITLE E. HUMAN SERVICES GRANT ADMINISTRATION
Sec. 1041. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Human Services Grant Administration Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 1042. The Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24, 2013 (D.C.
Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), is amended by adding a new section 1099 to
read as follows:
“Sec. 1099. Human Services grants.
“(a) For grants, the grant agreements for which are received by the Department of Human
Services (“DHS”) signed by the grantee after October 1, 2026, that are funded exclusively by
local operating funds, and for which DHS is the sole grantor (“DHS local grants”), the first
payment to the grantee under the grant shall issue no later than 30 days following the start of the
fiscal year or other term of service during which the grantee must perform under its grant
agreement with DHS or no later than 30 days following the actual receipt by DHS of a signed
grant agreement, whichever is later.
“(b) DHS shall provide the grant agreement for each DHS local grant to the grantee for
the grantee’s review and signature no later than 30 days following the start of the fiscal year or
other term of service during which the grantee must perform under its grant agreement with
DHS.”.
SUBTITLE F. ANC FUNDING FLEXIBILITY CLARIFICATION
Sec. 1051. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Funding
Flexibility Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 1052. Section 16 of the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Act of 1975, effective
March 26, 1976 (D.C. Law 1-58; D.C. Official Code § 1-309.13), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (b)(1) is amended as follows:
(1) The existing text is redesignated as subparagraph (A).
12

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(2) A new subparagraph (B) is added to read as follows:
“(B) Every such commercial bank, savings and loan association, credit
union, or combination thereof, shall provide to the Office of the Chief Financial Officer at
oft.bankingservices@dc.gov, on a monthly or quarterly basis, depending on the frequency with
which each such financial institution issues such records in the ordinary course of business, a
copy of the account statement of each Commission for which it serves as a depository of all
funds received, or online access to the same.”.
(b) Subsection (d)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “to the Council” and inserting the
phrase “to the Council and the OANC” in its place.
(c) Subsection (f)(2A)(C) is repealed.
(d) A new subsection (f-1) is added to read as follows:
“(f-1) A record or signature by an officer of a Commission who has authority to
sign on behalf of the Commission may be in electronic form.”.
(e) Subsection (h) is repealed.
(f) Subsection (l)(3) is repealed.
(g) Subsection (l-1)(3)(B)(i) is amended by striking the phrase “Authority;” and
inserting the phrase “Authority, and expenses for transportation by the use of a taxicab or
rideshare vehicle;” in its place.
(h) A new subsection (m-1) is added to read as follows:
“(m-1) Any services funded by a direct expenditure from a Commission must not be
duplicative of any services that are already performed by the District government.”.
(i) Subsection (q) is amended by striking the phrase “may seek to reprogram” and
inserting the phrase “shall provide” in its place.
SUBTITLE G. COMMUNITY LEGAL EDUCATION AND RESOURCES GRANT
PROGRAM
Sec. 1061. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Community Legal Education and Resources Grant
Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 1062. Community legal education and resources grant program.
(a) There is established a Community Legal Education and Resources Grant Program
(“Program”) to be administered by the Mayor to provide grants, pursuant to the Grant
Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code §
1-328.11 et seq.), to legal services providers to deliver legal services.
13

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code Section § 2-501 et seq.), may
issue rules to implement the Program, including rules governing the:
(1) Types of legal services projects eligible for grant funding;
(2) Application process and timing; and
(3) Monitoring of Program performance and reporting requirements.
(c) For the purposes of this subtitle, the term:
(1) “Legal services” means:
(A) Legal representation of District residents, including through the
provision of legal advice, brief services, and limited-scope representation; or
(B) Training of attorneys in legal issues.
(2) “Legal services provider” means:
(A) A nonprofit organization;
(B) A private entity that partners with a nonprofit organization; or
(C) A private entity utilizing pro bono legal assistance.
SUBTITLE H. ACCOUNTABILITY FOR BUDGET DELAYS
Sec. 1071. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Accountability for Delaying the Budget Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 1072. If the Mayor submits an annual budget later than the date established by the
Council pursuant to section 442(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 798; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.42(a)), nonpersonnel services
spending shall be prohibited within the Executive Office of the Mayor and the Office of the City
Administrator until the day after the date on which the Mayor submits the annual budget to the
Council.
Sec. 1073. Section 47-363(b)(3) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by
striking the phrase “is on recess.” and inserting the phrase “is on recess. If the Mayor submits an
annual budget later than the date established by the Council pursuant to § 1-204.42(a), no request
may be submitted to the Chairman of the Council under this subsection until after the date on
which the Mayor submits the annual budget to the Council.” in its place.
Sec. 1074. Section 711 of the Rules of Organization and Procedure for the Council of the
District of Columbia, Council Period 26, Resolution of 2025, effective January 2, 2025 (Res. 26-
1; 72 DCR 1289), is amended to read as follows:
14

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“711. EFFECT OF RECESS AND BUDGET SUBMISSION DELAY ON
PROCEDURES.
“(a) Reprogramming requests and grant budget modification requests may not be
submitted to the Council during a recess of the Council. No time period provided in this part for
the consideration of the requests will continue to run during a recess of the Council.
“(b) If the Mayor submits an annual budget later than the date established by the Council
pursuant to section 442(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
1973 (87 Stat. 798; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.42(a)), reprogramming requests and grant budget
modification requests may not be submitted to the Council until after the date on which the
Mayor submits the annual budget to the Council.”.
TITLE II. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND REGULATION
SUBTITLE A. BUILDING CONVERSION PERMIT FEES
Sec. 2001. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Building Conversion Permit Fee Establishment
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2002. Section 101.1 of Title 12-M of the District of Columbia Municipal
Regulations (12-M DCMR § 101.1) is amended by adding a new paragraph (a-1) to read as
follows:
“(a-1)(1) Building structures and equipment:
Description Fee Description Fee Amount
$0.03 per cubic foot of
Permit Fee
Building construction
Conversions Green Building Fee – Building $0.002 per square foot of
Conversions construction
“(2) The Building Conversion Permit Fee set forth in subparagraph (1) of this
paragraph shall be utilized to calculate the permit fee for a construction project involving a
change of use and occupancy for a building from any non-residential category to Residential
Group R-2, as defined by the Construction Codes.”.
Sec. 2003. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of the effective date of the Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Support
Emergency Act of 2025, passed on emergency basis on July 28, 2025 (Enrolled version of Bill
26-340).
15

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
SUBTITLE B. GREAT STREETS GRANT DISBURSEMENTS
Sec. 2011. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Great Streets Grant Disbursement Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2012. Section 4b(b)(4)(A) of the Retail Incentive Act of 2004, effective December
24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 2-1217.73b(b)(4)(A)), is amended by striking
the phrase “shall be divided and disbursed in allotments” and inserting the phrase “shall be
disbursed in one or more allotments” in its place.
SUBTITLE C. NEIGHBORHOOD PROSPERITY FUND
Sec. 2021. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Neighborhood Prosperity Fund Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2022. Section 2012(b)(3) of the Neighborhood Prosperity Initiative Act of 2018,
effective October 30, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-168; D.C. Official Code § 2-1210.71(b)), is amended
to read as follows:
“(3) “Qualifying project” means a mixed-use or retail real estate development
project that is located in a:
“(A) Low-income community, as that term is defined in section 45D(e) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, approved December 21, 2000 (114 Stat. 2763; 26 U.S.C. §
45D(e));
“(B) Retail Priority Area established by, or approved by the Council
pursuant to, section 4 of the Retail Incentive Act of 2004, effective September 8, 2004 (D.C.
Law 15-185; D.C. Official Code § 2-1217.73); provided, that the mixed-use or retail real estate
development project borders on or touches along an edge of a Neighborhood Prosperity Fund
boundary as established by the Mayor; or
“(C) Main Street corridor supported by the Department of Small and Local
Business Development; provided, that the mixed-use or retail real estate development project
borders on or touches along an edge of a Neighborhood Prosperity Fund boundary as established
by the Mayor.”.
SUBTITLE D. HUMANITIES RELIEF
Sec. 2031. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “HumanitiesDC Operating Funding Relief Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
16

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 2032. Section 6b(b)(2) of the Commission on the Arts and Humanities Act, effective
September 11, 2019 (D.C. Law 23-16; D.C. Official Code § 39-205.02(b)(2)), is amended by
striking the phrase “Up to 30%” and inserting the phrase “Up to 40%” in its place.
SUBTITLE E. SIDEWALK VENDING
Sec. 2041. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Sidewalk Vending Zone Implementation Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2042. The Vending Regulation Act of 2009, effective October 22, 2009 (D.C. Law
18-71; D.C. Official Code § 37-131.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 9a (D.C. Official Code § 37-131.08a) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(c)(1) Each sidewalk vending zone shall be supervised by a sidewalk vending zone
manager, which may be either:
“(A) An employee of the Department of Licensing and Consumer
Protection; or
“(B) A private organization contracted for such purposes, as provided in
paragraph (2) of this subsection.”.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) For a sidewalk vending zone authorized by this section or section 9b, the
Mayor may contract or enter into a memorandum of understanding with a private organization to
serve as a sidewalk vending zone manager.”.
(2) Subsection (d) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(i) Subparagraph (A) is amended to read as follows:
“(A) Submit to the Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection a
vending site plan, which shall include vending cart and vending table design standards;”.
(ii) A new subparagraph (A-i) is added to read as follows:
“(A-i) Enforce the vending site plan, including by reviewing and
approving vendors’ vending cart and vending table specifications and designs in accordance with
the approved vending site plan;”.
(iii) Subparagraph (G) is amended by striking the phrase “; and”
and inserting a semicolon in its place.
17

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(iv) Subparagraph (H) is amended by striking the period and
inserting the phrase “; and” in its place.
(v) A new subparagraph (I) is added to read as follows:
“(I) Obtain a public market manager’s license from the Department of
Licensing and Consumer Protection.”.
(B) Paragraph (3)(A) is amended by striking the phrase “business address
of each sidewalk vendor,” and inserting the phrase “business address, and home address, if
different from the business address, of each sidewalk vendor,” in its place.
(b) Section 9b (D.C. Official Code § 37-131.08b) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsections (d) and (e) are repealed.
(2) New subsections (f) and (g) are added to read as follows:
“(f)(1) If the Mayor does not contract with a vending zone manager, as provided for in
section 9a(c)(2), for the sidewalk vending zone established under this section, there shall be
established a Columbia Heights-Mount Pleasant Sidewalk Vending Zone Oversight Committee
(“Oversight Committee”), to be comprised of no more than 3 members as follows:
“(A) One representative of ANC 1A, who shall be a serving ANC
Commissioner; and
“(B) Two representatives appointed by the Council.
“(2) All members of the Oversight Committee shall serve without compensation.
“(3) The Oversight Committee shall have the following responsibilities:
“(A) Assist in the development and approval of the vending site plan;
“(B) Advise the Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection,
Department of Health, and Office of Tax and Revenue on implementation of the sidewalk
vending zone;
“(C) Provide a written update to Council each month on implementation
of the sidewalk vending zone; and
“(D) Assist in outreach and engagement with vendors.
“(4) A request for modification of the vending site plan from any member of the
Oversight Committee shall be considered in accordance with section 9a(d)(2).
“(5) This subsection shall expire 2 years after the effective date of the Fiscal Year
2026 Budget Support Act of 2025, passed on 2nd reading on July 28, 2025 (Enrolled version of
Bill 26-265) .
“(g) An employee of the Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection designated
as a vending zone site manager pursuant to section 9a(c)(1)(A) shall not be authorized to issue
notices of infraction pursuant to section 9.”.
(c) Section 9c (D.C. Official Code § 37-131.08c) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
18

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c)(1) A person may participate in the amnesty program by filing an application for
amnesty with the Mayor.
“(2) The Mayor shall establish by rule the requirements for applying for and being
approved to participate in the amnesty program.”.
(2) A new subsection (d-1) is added to read as follows:
“(d-1) At the request of the Mayor, the Chief Financial Officer shall send a notice by
electronic means to all mobile vendors and sidewalk vendors registered with the Office of Tax
and Revenue advising the vendors of the existence of the amnesty program.”.
(d) Section 10 (D.C. Official Code § 37-131.09) is repealed.
(e) A new section 10a is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 10a. Grantmaking authority.
“The Mayor may issue grants, pursuant to the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective
December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), to assist applicants
in obtaining a sidewalk vending license, mobile vending license, or other required authorization,
purchasing vending-related equipment and supplies, including carts and trucks, and successfully
operating as mobile or sidewalk vendor.”.
SUBTITLE F. RFK CAMPUS INFRASTRUCTURE FUND
Sec. 2051. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “RFK Campus Infrastructure Fund Establishment
Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2052. RFK Campus Infrastructure Fund.
(a) There is established as a special fund the RFK Campus Infrastructure Fund, which
shall be administered by the Mayor pursuant to subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this section.
(b) After all principal and interest on the bonds issued pursuant to section 103 of the
Ballpark Omnibus Financing and Revenue Act of 2004, effective April 8, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-
320; D.C. Official Code § 10-1601.03), has been paid, all receipts from the sports facilities fee
imposed by D.C. Official Code § 47-2762 shall be deposited into the RFK Campus Infrastructure
Fund.
(c) Money in the RFK Campus Infrastructure Fund shall be used:
(1) To pay the debt service, including principal and interest, costs of issuance, and
credit enhancements, and any costs of defeasance on bonds issued for RFK campus infrastructure
and parking facilities, and to make any other payments related to such bonds;
(2) To fund reserves for bonds issued for RFK campus infrastructure and parking
facilities; and
19

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(3) For the purposes set forth in and in accordance with subsection (d) of this
section.
(d) Any money available in the RFK Campus Infrastructure Fund in excess of the
amounts required to be paid or reserved pursuant to subsection (c)(1) and (2) of this section, as
determined by the Chief Financial Officer, shall:
(1) In Fiscal Years 2026 and 2027:
(A) Be used to pay the debt service on any ballpark early redemption
borrowing; and
(B) To the extent all debt service on any ballpark early redemption
borrowing has been paid, be transferred to the General Fund of the District of Columbia;
(2) In Fiscal Years 2028 and 2029, be transferred to the General Fund of the
District of Columbia;
(3)(A) In Fiscal Year 2030 and each fiscal year thereafter, be transferred to the
RFK Transportation Improvement Fund, established in the Robert F. Kennedy Campus
Redevelopment Act of 2025, passed on 1st reading on August 1, 2025(Engrossed version of Bill
26-288).
(B) If the amount of an annual deposit to the RFK Transportation
Improvement Fund pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph would exceed $20 million,
$20 million shall be deposited in the RFK Transportation Fund and the amount over $20 million
shall be deposited in the General Fund of the District of Columbia.
(e) The Mayor, or any District instrumentality or authority designated by the Mayor, may
pledge and create a security interest in the funds in the RFK Campus Infrastructure Fund for the
payment of the debt service on any bonds issued for RFK campus infrastructure and parking
facilities, any fees and charges incurred in connection therewith, and any payments owing under
any document or instrument entered into in connection with such indebtedness in accordance
with the provisions of the documents entered into by the District in connection with the issuance
of such bonds.
(f)(1) Except as provided in subsection (d)(3)(B) of this section, the money deposited into
the RFK Campus Infrastructure Fund shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the
General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the RFK Campus Infrastructure Fund shall be continually available without
regard to fiscal year limitation.
(g) For the purposes of this section, the term “RFK campus” means the parcels of land
that are the subject of the Transfer of Jurisdiction Plat recorded in the Surveyor’s Office of the
District of Columbia on February 5, 2025, on page 13 of subdivision book 223, together with any
public streets within or adjacent to such parcels that may be closed from time to time.
20

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
SUBTITLE G. REVISED GAME OF SKILL
Sec. 2061 Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Revised Game of Skill Machines Consumer Protections
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”
Sec. 2062. Section 16-1702 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The existing text is designated as subsection (a).
(b) New subsections (b), (c), and (d) are added to read as follows:
“(b) Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to commercial bingo authorized by §
36-601.01 et seq.
“(c) As of May 3, 2019, subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to sports wagering
authorized by § 36-621.01 et seq.
“(d) As of April 27, 2021, subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to games of skill
authorized by § 36-641.01 et seq.”.
Sec. 2063. Title 25 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 25-113.01(e)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “holding an on-site sales
and consumption permit, or” and inserting the word “or” in its place.
(b) Section 25-508 is amended by striking the phrase “$200” and inserting the phrase
“$500/year” in its place.
Sec. 2064. Title IV of the Law to Legalize Lotteries, Daily Numbers Games, and Bingo
and Raffles for Charitable Purposes in the District of Columbia, effective April 27, 2021 (D.C.
Law 23-280; D.C. Official Code § 36-641.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 408 (D.C. Official Code § 36-641.08) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a)(2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) Possesses a retailer’s license and a game of skill machine endorsement, as
required by D.C. Official Code § 25-113.01(e); and”.
(2) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, ABCA shall perform the Office’s
functions under this title with respect to processing and issuing retailer’s licenses.”.
(b) Section 416 (D.C. Official Code § 36-641.16) is amended by adding a new subsection
(f) to read as follows:
21

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(f) The Office shall promptly notify ABCA if a licensed establishment is the subject of a
citation, revocation, or other enforcement action taken by the Office in accordance with the
provisions of this title.”.
(c) Section 421(a) (D.C. Official Code § 36-641.21(a)) is amended by striking the phrase
“shall by January 2021,” and inserting the word “shall” in its place.
SUBTITLE H. COMMERCIAL BINGO
Sec. 2071. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Commercial Bingo Emergency Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 2072. Title 25 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Chapter 1 is amended as follows:
(1) Section 25-101 is amended by adding a new paragraph (15A-i) to read as
follows:
“(15A-i) “Commercial bingo” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 36-
601.01(c)(4A).
(2) Section 25-113.01 is amended by adding a new subsection (i) to read as
follows:
“(i) A licensee under an on-premises retailer’s license, class C/R, D/R, C/T, D/T, C/H,
D/H, C/X, D/X, C/RB, D/RB, C/N, or D/N, shall, in order to offer commercial bingo on the
licensed premises:
“(1) Obtain a commercial bingo endorsement from the Board; and
“(2) Obtain a license from the Office of Lottery and Gaming to conduct
commercial bingo pursuant to Subchapter I of Chapter 6 of Title 36.”.
(b) Section 25-508 is amended by adding a new row to the tabular array to read as
follows:
“
Commercial bingo endorsement $300/year
”.
Sec. 2073. Title II of the Law to Legalize Lotteries, Daily Numbers Games, and Bingo
and Raffles for Charitable Purposes in the District of Columbia, effective March 10, 1981 (D.C.
Law 3-172; D.C. Official Code 36-601.01 et seq), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 36-601.01(c)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is redesignated as paragraph (1C).
(2) New paragraphs (1), (1A), and (1B) are added to read as follows:
22

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) “ABCA” means the Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Administration.
“(1A) “Bingo” means a form of gambling in which the winning chances are
determined by a random drawing of a subset of numbered objects among a total set of 75 objects,
consecutively numbered from 1 to 75, and the bingo cards held by the players, which cards are
sold, rented, or used only at the time of the gambling activity.
“(1B) “Bingo card” means a card, including paper formats, electronic
representations, and image formats, that contains 5 rows of 5 spaces each, each space imprinted
with a number between 1 and 75 inclusive, except the central space which is marked “FREE”.”.
(3) A new paragraph (4A) is added to read as follows.
“(4A) “Commercial bingo” means bingo for which any type of consideration is
paid or collected in order to play, and each number is drawn and verbally announced by an
individual physically present in the same physical location as the game’s participants, who
compete against each other in a common bingo game, but does not include:
“(A) Bingo sponsored, conducted, or held by an entity in accordance with
section 2-2523(b), (c), or (d) (D.C. Official Code § 36-601.23(b), (c), or (d)).
“(B) Bingo played on or with the assistance of a gambling device, as that
term is defined by section 1(a) of An Act To prohibit transportation of gambling devices in
interstate and foreign commerce, approved January 2, 1951 (64 Stat. 1134; 15 U.S.C. 1171(a)); or
“(C) Bingo played over the internet or in an online environment or on any
machine or mechanical device that would qualify as or constitute a facsimile of class II gaming,
as that term is defined in section 4(7) of the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, approved October 17,
1988 (102 Stat. 2467; 25 U.S.C. § 2703(7)).”.
(4) A new paragraph (10A) is added to read as follows:
“(10A) “Licensed Establishment” means a business licensed by ABCA that holds
an on-premises retailer’s license, class C/R, D/R, C/T, D/T, C/H, D/H, C/X, D/X, C/RB, D/RB,
C/N, or D/N.”.
(5) A new paragraph (13A) is added to read as follows:
“(13A) “Raffle” means a lottery, other than a lottery operated by the District
pursuant to this title, in which a prize is won by at least one of multiple persons buying
chances.”.
(b) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 36-601.12) is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 2-2512. Lottery, Gambling, and Gaming Fund.”.
(2) Subsection (a)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “Chief Financial Officer”
and inserting the phrase “Chief Financial Officer, except for funds generated by the tax imposed
by D.C. Official Code §§ 47-2002(a)(9) and 47-2202(a)(6)” in its place.
(c) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 36-601.22) is amended to read as follows:
23

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“Sec. 2-2522. Operation of bingo and raffles.
“Bingo and raffles may be conducted in the District only in accordance with this title, any
rules issued pursuant to this title, and any other applicable law or rules.”.
(d) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 36-601.23) is amended by adding a new subsection
(e) to read as follows:
“(e) The Office may issue a license to operate commercial bingo under this section only
to an on-premises alcohol retailer licensed under Title 25 of the District of Columbia Official
Code; provided, that no license to operate commercial bingo may be issued by the Office before
October 1, 2025.”.
(e) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 36-601.24) is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 2-2524. Rules governing conduct of bingo and raffles.
“(a) The Chief Financial Officer shall adopt rules governing the conduct of bingo and
raffles to ensure the integrity of the conduct of bingo and raffles, and to protect the economic
welfare and interests in fair and honest play of bingo and raffles participants. The rules shall
include:
“(1) Specific application requirements, application fees, and the form thereof;
“(2) The specific models, types, and technological configurations of any devices
or applications used to assist in the play of bingo or raffles that may be lawfully operated;
“(3) The terms, conditions, and rules for bingo and raffles;
“(4) Amount of or value of prizes;
“(5) The premises that may be used to conduct bingo or raffles and the terms of
such use;
“(6) The occasions on and frequency with which bingo and raffles may be
conducted;
“(7) The definition and use of gross receipts from the conduct of bingo and
raffles; and
“(8) A prohibition on any machine, device, or terminal that:
“(A) Enables a person to play a bingo game against a machine or
computerized system rather than against other human players collocated onsite at a licensed
establishment; or
“(B) Allows a person to participate in a commercial bingo game from a
location other than the licensed establishment where the numbers are called by a live caller.
“(b) For any violation of rules adopted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the
Office may:
“(1) Impose a fine of not more than $50,000; and
“(2) Suspend or revoke the license, issued under this title, of any person, firm,
partnership, association, organization, or corporation.
24

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c) All fines imposed pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Lottery, Gaming,
and Gambling Fund established by section 2-2512 (D.C. Official Code § 36-601.12).
“(d) Any person, firm, partnership, association, organization, or corporation fined or
suspended pursuant to this section shall have a right to a hearing before the Chief Financial
Officer, or the Chief Financial Officer’s designee, and, in the event of the affirmation of such
fine or suspension, the right to appeal such fine or suspension to the Superior Court of the
District of Columbia.”.
Sec. 2074. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 47-2002(a) is amended by adding a new paragraph (9) to read as follows:
“(9) The rate of tax shall be 7.5% on the gross receipts from the sale of or charges
collected to play commercial bingo.”.
(b) Section 47-2202(a) is amended by adding a new paragraph (6) to read as follows:
“(6) The rate of tax shall be 7.5% on the gross receipts from the sale of or charges
collected to play commercial bingo.”.
SUBTITLE I. ECONOMIC REVITALIZATION INITIATIVES
Sec. 2081. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Economic Revitalization Initiatives Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2082. Section 2032 of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
Limited Grant-Making Authority Act of 2012, effective September 20, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-168;
D.C. Official Code § 1-328.04), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (bb) is repealed.
(b) Subsection (ii) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended to read as follows:
“(ii)(1)(A) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December
24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), the Deputy Mayor shall
establish a Chinatown Long-Term Lease Grant program to award grants through a competitive
process to eligible entities or eligible commercial property owners in the Chinatown
neighborhood, in accordance with this subsection.”.
(B) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “eligible
business” and inserting the phrase “eligible entity” in its place.
(C) Subparagraph (C) is amended as follows:
25

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(i) Sub-subparagraph (ii) is amended by striking the phrase
“eligible business” and inserting the phrase “eligible entity” in its place.
(ii) Sub-subparagraph (iv) is amended by striking the phrase
“eligible business” and inserting the phrase “eligible entity” in its place.
(D) Subparagraph (D) is amended by striking the phrase “A business or
commercial property owner” and inserting the phrase “An entity or commercial property owner”
in its place.
(E) Subparagraph (E) is amended as follows:
(i) Sub-subparagraph (i) is amended by striking the phrase
“eligible business” and inserting the phrase “eligible entity” in its place.
(ii) Sub-subparagraph (ii) is amended by striking the phrase
“tenant improvement allowance, to the eligible business” and inserting the phrase “tenant
improvement allowance, including for façade repair and interior and exterior space renovations,
to the eligible entity” in its place.
(F) Subparagraph (F) is amended by striking the phrase “a business or
commercial” and inserting the phrase “an entity or commercial” in its place.
(G) Subparagraph (G) is amended by striking the phrase “eligible
business” both times it appears and inserting the phrase “eligible entity” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2)(A) is amended by striking the figure “$125,000” and inserting
the figure “$250,000” in its place
(3) Paragraph (5) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “eligible
business” and inserting the phrase “eligible entity” in its place.
(B) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “eligible
businesses” and inserting the phrase “eligible entities” in its place.
(c) New subsections (jj), (kk), (ll), (mm), (nn), (oo), and (pp) are added to read as
follows:
“(jj) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24,
2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.):
“(1) In Fiscal Year 2024, the Deputy Mayor shall award a grant of $500,000 to
Capital Factory for the purpose of supporting a technology incubator in the District;
“(2) In Fiscal Year 2025, the Deputy Mayor shall award a grant of $1,500,000 to
Capital Factory for the purpose of supporting a technology incubator in the District; and
“(3) Beginning in Fiscal Year 2026, the Deputy Mayor may award grants to
entities that provide support for entrepreneurs to establish, develop, and grow early-stage
technology companies within the District or provide training to District residents to work in the
technology sector.
26

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(kk) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24,
2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), the Deputy Mayor may issue
grants to the African American Civil War Memorial Freedom Foundation, Inc. for the purpose of
redeveloping and operating the African American Civil War Museum, located at 1925 Vermont
Avenue, NW.
“(ll)(1)(A) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December
24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), in Fiscal Year 2026, the
Deputy Mayor shall establish a Rhode Island Avenue Support Grant program to award grants
through a competitive process to eligible businesses and eligible commercial property owners in
the Rhode Island Avenue Corridor, in accordance with this subsection.
“(B) An eligible business shall:
“(i) Be registered as an entity in the District;
“(ii) Be in good standing with the Department of Licensing and
Consumer Protection (“DLCP”), the Office of Tax and Revenue (“OTR”), the Department of
Employment Services, and the United States Internal Revenue Service (“IRS”);
“(iii) Have fewer than 30 full-time employees;
“(iv) Sign or intend to sign a long-term lease of a commercial
property in the Rhode Island Avenue Corridor; and
“(v) Offer retail, educational programs, entertainment, food, or
other services or activities that strengthen community connections and attract foot traffic to the
Rhode Island Avenue Corridor.
“(C) An eligible commercial property owner shall:
“(i) Own a commercial property on the Rhode Island Avenue
Corridor;
“(ii) Sign or intend to sign a long-term lease with an eligible
business for the commercial property on the Rhode Island Avenue Corridor;
“(iii) Be in good standing with DLCP, OTR, and IRS; and
“(iv) Not be a beneficial owner of the eligible business that is or
will be occupying the commercial property on the Rhode Island Avenue Corridor.
“(D) A business or commercial property owner seeking a grant under this
subsection shall submit to the Deputy Mayor an application, in a form prescribed by the Deputy
Mayor, which shall include:
“(i) A signed current long-term lease or evidence of the intent to
sign a long-term lease; and
“(ii) Any additional information requested by the Deputy Mayor.
“(E)(i) An eligible business awarded a grant pursuant to this subsection
shall use the grant funds for rent payments or tenant improvements.
27

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(ii) A property owner awarded a grant pursuant to this subsection
shall use the grant to abate rent payments or otherwise provide a benefit, which may include a
tenant improvement allowance, including for façade repair and interior and exterior space
renovations, to the eligible business in an amount equal in value to or greater than the amount of
the grant and shall submit evidence to the Deputy Mayor demonstrating compliance with this
subparagraph.
“(F) To receive the annual grant funds disbursement, a business or
commercial property owner awarded a grant pursuant to this subsection shall annually submit to
the Deputy Mayor proof of continued participation in the long-term lease and other
documentation as required by the Deputy Mayor.
“(G) If an eligible business awarded a grant pursuant to this subsection
ends its lease early, and a likewise eligible business assumes the same lease, the new lessee may
apply to the Deputy Mayor through a noncompetitive process for a grant up to the amount of the
remaining funds that the original grantee was awarded.
“(H) If an eligible property owner awarded a grant pursuant to this
subsection transfers the property to a likewise eligible property owner, and the likewise eligible
property owner assumes the same long-term lease, the new property owner may apply to the
Deputy Mayor through a noncompetitive process for a grant up to the amount of the remaining
funds that the original grantee was awarded.
“(2) In Fiscal Year 2026, the Deputy Mayor shall award at least $350,000 in grant
funds for the Rhode Island Avenue Support Grant Program.
“(3) The Deputy Mayor may award one or more grants to a third-party grant-
managing entity for the purpose of administering the program pursuant to this subsection and
making subgrants on behalf of the Deputy Mayor in accordance with the requirements of this
subsection or regulations issued pursuant to this subsection.
“(4) The Deputy Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia
Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code §
2-501 et seq.), may issue rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.
“(5)(A) The Deputy Mayor and any third-party entity chosen pursuant to
paragraph (3) of this subsection shall maintain a list of all grants awarded pursuant to this
subsection, identifying for each award:
“(i) The grant recipient;
“(ii) The name and address of the eligible business or property
owner;
“(iii) The date of the award;
“(iv) The intended use of the award; and
“(v) The award amount.
28

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) The list required by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall be
published in the D.C. Register every 6 months.
“(C) The Deputy Mayor and any third-party entity chosen pursuant to
paragraph (3) of this subsection shall collect necessary information to evaluate the effectiveness
of the program, including:
“(i) The total award amount and duration of the award;
“(ii) The share of the award as a percentage of the total lease cost;
and
“(iii) The length of time that eligible businesses or eligible
commercial property owners awarded grant funds pursuant to this subsection remain in their
leases.
“(6) For the purposes of this subsection, the term:
“(A) “Rhode Island Avenue Corridor” means the parcels, squares, and lots
within and along the boundary of the following area: Beginning at the intersection of 14th Street,
NE, Evarts Street, NE, and Rhode Island Avenue, NE; continuing east along Evarts Street, NE,
to 20th Street, NE; continuing north along 20th Street, NE, to Hamlin Street, NE; continuing east
along Hamlin Street, NE, to Mills Avenue, NE; continuing south along Mills Avenue, NE, to
Hamlin Place, NE; continuing east along Hamlin Place, NE, to 24th Street, NE; continuing north
along 24th Street, NE, to Kearny Street, NE; continuing west along Kearny Street, NE, to 13th
Street, NE; continuing south along 13th Street, NE, to Rhode Island Avenue, NE; continuing east
along Rhode Island Avenue, NE, to the intersection with 14th Street, NE, and Evarts Street, NE.
“(B) “Entity” shall have the same meaning as provided in D.C. Official
Code § 29-101.02(10).
“(C) “Long-term lease” means a fixed-term rental agreement with a lease
period of no fewer than 10 years, exclusive of options.
“(mm) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24,
2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), the Deputy Mayor may make a
grant to the Prince Hall Free & Accepted Mason and Order of the Eastern Star Charitable
Educational Foundation (“Foundation”), or a commercial tenant of space leased by the
Foundation at 1000 U Street, NW, in order to support the implementation of recommendations
for that space and the adjacent plaza made in the Shaw/U Street Cultural Destination District
Plan, as approved by the Shaw/U Street Cultural Destination District Plan Approval Resolution
of 2005, effective June 21, 2005 (Res. 16-209).
“(nn) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24,
2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), in Fiscal Year 2025, the Deputy
Mayor shall award a grant of $500,000 to a licensed retailer of medical cannabis in Ward 8 that
29

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
has been in operation since January 2019 for the purpose of continuing current business
operations.
“(oo) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24,
2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), in Fiscal Year 2026, the Deputy
Mayor shall award $150,000 in grants to provide small business support for businesses impacted
by construction near Pennsylvania Avenue, SE, and Potomac Avenue, SE, and along 8th Street
SE, between Pennsylvania Avenue, SE, and Virginia Avenue, SE.
“(pp)(1) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December 24,
2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), in Fiscal Year 2026, the Deputy
Mayor shall award a grant of up to $3,000,000 to the Rosemount Center (“Center”) to support
the Center’s purchase of the real property the Center currently leases, located at 2000 Rosemount
Avenue, NW.
“(2) Of the funds authorized pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
Deputy Mayor shall award $2 million by December 1, 2025, and shall award by May 31, 2026,
as a matching grant, $4 to the Center for every dollar above $1 million that the Center raises
from private donations by April 30, 2026; provided, that the total matching grant shall not
exceed $1 million.”.
Sec. 2083. Section 301 of the National Capital Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia
Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Act of 2008, effective March 26, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-
138; D.C. Official Code § 2-1225.21), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (b)(1) is amended by adding a new subparagraph (C-i) to read as follows:
“(C-i) Beginning October 1, 2025, the tax revenue received pursuant to
D.C. Official Code § 47-2002.03a(a)(2), less amounts deposited in the General Fund pursuant to
D.C. Official Code § 47-2002.03a(c)(2);”.
(b) New subsections (d-3) and (d-4) are added to read as follows:
“(d-3) In Fiscal Year 2026, of the amounts credited to the Account pursuant to subsection
(b)(1)(C-i) of this section:
“(1) $2,451,000 shall be used to provide grants authorized by section 2032(jj)(3)
of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development Limited Grant-Making Authority
Act of 2012, effective September 20, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-168; D.C. Official Code § 1-
328.04(jj)(3));
“(2) $5,140,000 shall be used to provide a grant to the Washington DC Economic
Partnership to support retail and business attraction efforts;
“(3) $750,000 shall be used for services to generate business attraction leads, to
market the District to businesses with the goal of enticing businesses to relocate into the District,
and to develop business incentives;
30

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(4) $1,125,000 shall be used to support businesses in the Gallery Place and
Chinatown neighborhoods while the Capital One Arena redevelopment project is under
construction;
“(5) $750,000 shall be used to support retail, reduce commercial vacancies, and
generate foot traffic across the District by supporting street level and storefront activations to fill
amenity gaps; and
“(6) $250,000 shall be used to rejuvenate and preserve the cultural identity of
Chinatown.
“(d-4) In Fiscal Year 2027, of the amounts credited to the Account pursuant to subsection
(b)(1)(C-i) of this section, $6,140,000 shall be used to provide a grant to the Washington DC
Economic Partnership to support retail and business attraction efforts.”.
Sec. 2084. Applicability.
Amendatory section 2032(nn) in section 2082(c) shall apply as of the effective date of the
Fiscal Year 2025 Revised Local Budget Adjustment Emergency Act of 2025, passed on
emergency basis on July 28, 2025 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-263).
SUBTITLE J. WASHINGTON DC ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIP
Sec. 2091. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Washington Convention Center Marketing Authority
Marketing Fund Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2092. Section 208a(e) of the Washington Convention Center Authority Act of 1994,
effective August 12, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-142; D.C. Official Code § 10-1202.08a(e)), is amended
as follows:
(a) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
(b) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in its
place.
(c) A new paragraph (4) is added to read as follows:
“(4) The Washington DC Economic Partnership, pursuant to which the
Washington DC Economic Partnership shall be designated as the primary contractor to:
“(A) Foster and enhance economic growth and business prospects in the
District;
“(B) Provide support for the retention and expansion of businesses in the
District and the attraction of businesses to the District; and
31

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(C) Market and provide support for the marketing of the District as an
attractive location to establish, operate, and grow businesses.”.
SUBTITLE K. FUNDING FOR LOCAL THEATERS
Sec. 2101. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Funding for Theaters Emergency Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 2102. Section 6d of the Commission on the Arts and Humanities Act, effective
September 6, 2023 (D.C. Law 25-50; D.C. Official Code § 39-205.04), is amended by adding a
new subsection (f) to read as follows:
“(f)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or the Grant Administration
Act of 2013, effective December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et
seq.), from the funds appropriated for the Large Capital Grants program, the Commission shall
issue the following grants:
“(A) In Fiscal Year 2025:
“(i) $4 million to the National Theatre, for the acquisition of and
repairs to the theater;
“(ii) $500,000 to the Howard Theatre, for debt service payments
related to renovations and improvements to the theater and operational expenses of the theater;
and
“(iii) $285,000 to the Lincoln Theatre, for repairs to and renovation
of the theater; and
“(B) In Fiscal Year 2026:
“(i) $500,000 to the Woolly Mammoth Theatre Company, to pay
for operational expenses of the theater; and
“(ii) To Grupo de Artistas Latinoamericanos, G.A.L.A., Inc., also
known as the GALA Hispanic Theatre (“GALA”), for capital repair and expenses for renovation
to, and operation of, the theater:
“(I) $450,000 to be disbursed in a lump sum by December
31, 2025; and
“(II) Up to a maximum of $50,000, $1 for every $1 raised
by GALA from non-government sources, as evidenced by a notarized, itemized list of donations
submitted by GALA to the Commission:
“(aa) During the period from August 1, 2025, to
October 31, 2025, to be disbursed in a lump sum not later than December 31, 2025;
32

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(bb) During the period from November 1, 2025, to
January 31, 2026, to be disbursed in a lump sum not later than February 28, 2026;
“(cc) During the period from February 1, 2026, to
April 30, 2026, to be disbursed in a lump sum not later than May 31, 2026; and
“(dd) During the period from May 1, 2026, to July
31, 2026, to be disbursed in a lump sum not later than September 30, 2026.
“(2) Any appropriated amounts remaining in the Large Capital Grants program
after accounting for the maximum amounts required to be issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of
this subsection in a respective fiscal year shall be awarded competitively in accordance with
subsections (a) through (e) of this section.”.
Sec. 2103. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of the effective date of the Fiscal Year 2025 Revised Local
Budget Adjustment Emergency Act of 2025, passed on emergency basis on July 28, 2025
(Enrolled version of Bill 26-263).
SUBTITLE L. TRUXTON CIRCLE EMINENT DOMAIN AUTHORITY
Sec. 2111. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Truxton Circle Eminent Domain Authority Emergency
Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2112. The Council finds that:
(1) The Truxton Circle neighborhood is a mixed-use neighborhood characterized
by mixed-density residential, commercial, and retail uses. It is a high-priority corridor for
investment, in-fill development, and the revitalization of vacant and underutilized lots.
(2) Lot 48 in Square 3100 (“the Property”), located at approximately 1600 North
Capitol Street, NW, is approximately 18,984 square feet and located at the northwest intersection
of North Capitol Street, NW, and Florida Avenue, NW. It is bounded by North Capitol Street,
NW, to the east, Q Street, NW, to the south, and Florida Avenue, NW, to the west.
(3) The property is at the intersection of 2 major District corridors and
development of these areas is a high-priority measure for the District and residents of Ward 5.
(4) The property presents the opportunity for redevelopment along North Capitol
Street, NW, and a reduction in blight. This parcel is ripe for matter-of-right, neighborhood-
appropriate development, including housing, retail, mixed-use development, and office space.
(5) Acquisition of the property by the District will allow for development to
invigorate a vacant and underutilized parcel and to reposition the property for development and
revitalization.
33

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 2113. The Mayor may exercise eminent domain in accordance with the procedures
set forth in Subchapter II of Chapter 13 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Official Code to
acquire Lot 48 in Square 3100 for the purpose of revitalization or redevelopment.
SUBTITLE M. HOUSING IN DOWNTOWN PROGRAM
Sec. 2121. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Housing in Downtown Program Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2122. Chapter 8 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 47-860.01(2) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraphs (A) and (B) are repealed.
(2) New subparagraphs (C), (D), and (E) are added to read as follows:
“(C) The geographic area contained in the Central Washington Area
Element, as set forth in Volume 2 of the District of Columbia Office of Planning’s 2021
Comprehensive Plan and the Comprehensive Plan Amendment Act of 2021, effective August 21,
2021 (D.C. Law 24-20; 68 DCR 6918) (“Comprehensive Plan Amendment Act of 2021”), plus
1,750 linear feet within the District in any direction beyond the area’s boundaries;
“(D) The geographic area contained in the Near Northwest Area Element,
as set forth in Volume 2 of the Comprehensive Plan Amendment Act of 2021, plus 1,750 linear
feet within the District in any direction beyond the area’s boundaries; and
“(E) Any other portion of the District with a concentration of commercial
office property and high commercial vacancy rates, as designated by the Mayor.”.
(b) Section 47-860.03(b)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “up to $6.8 million” and
inserting the phrase “up to $5 million” in its place.
(c) Section 47-870(1) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “tax year 2025;” and
inserting the phrase “tax year 2026;” in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (B) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “tax year 2025” and insert the phrase “tax year
2026” in its place.
(B) Strike the phrase “after 2025” and insert the phrase “after 2026” in its
place.
34

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
SUBTITLE N. ROCK CREEK TENNIS CENTER TRANSFER OF
JURSISDICTION
Sec. 2131. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Rock Creek Tennis Center Transfer of Jurisdiction and
Funding Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2132. (a) Pursuant to section 404 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act,
approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.04), and consistent with
section 1 of An Act To authorize the transfer of public land in the District of Columbia, approved
May 20, 1932 (47 Stat. 161; D.C. Official Code § 10-111), the Council of the District of
Columbia authorizes the transfer of jurisdiction from the Director of the National Park Service,
acting on behalf of the Secretary of the Interior, to the government of the District of Columbia,
over a portion of U.S. Reservation 339, which is National Park Service Land and appurtenant
facilities in Rock Creek Park, the boundaries of which are generally Kennedy Place, NW, to the
north; 16th Street, NW, and Colorado Avenue, NW, to the east; the inside boundary of the
existing parking lots to the south and west; Stage Road, NW, to the west; and a portion of
Morrow Drive, NW, to the existing tree line to where it intersects with Kennedy Place, NW, to
the west, upon which is situated the Rock Creek Tennis Center and appurtenant facilities, as
shown on a plat to be drawn and filed in the Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia.
(b) Upon the transfer of jurisdiction described in subsection (a) of this section, or another
transfer of jurisdiction approved by the Council pursuant to section 1 of An Act To authorize the
transfer of jurisdiction over public land in the District of Columbia, approved May 20, 1932 (47
Stat. 161; D.C. Official Code § 10-111), over the property in which the Rock Creek Tennis
Center is situated, the Department of Parks and Recreation shall commence the Rock Creek
Tennis Center capital project to make improvements necessary to bring the existing tennis center
into compliance with Association of Tennis Professionals Tour and Women’s Tennis
Association Tour event standards.
Sec. 2133. It is the sense of the Council that the Mayor, in accepting a transfer of
jurisdiction that includes the Rock Creek Tennis Center, should:
(1) Thoroughly and thoughtfully engage with the communities and organizations
impacted by the current and future uses of the property over which jurisdiction is to be
transferred, including Advisory Neighborhood Commission 4E, the Rock Creek Conservancy,
and residents of the Sixteenth Street Heights and Crestwood neighborhoods.
(2) Provide a reasonable period of time for public comment, including
opportunities for Executive agencies to answer public questions about the transfer of jurisdiction.
35

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(3) Incorporate any relevant environmental, traffic, and noise impact studies
previously completed pertaining to the property over which jurisdiction is to be transferred, or
conduct additional studies of comparable rigor and scope that should be made available to the
public.
(4) Prioritize preservation of open and free access to as much of the property over
which jurisdiction is to be transferred as possible for as much of the year as possible, including
the existing Picnic Grove #24 and public parking spaces to be utilized for public access of other
areas of Rock Creek Park.
(5) Explore the role of the Carter Barron Amphitheater in a proposed or future
transfer of jurisdiction to ensure preservation, improvement, and future productive public use of
this historic community asset.
SUBTITLE O. HISTORIC BURIAL GROUNDS PRESERVATION PROGRAM
Sec. 2141. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Historic Burial Grounds Preservation Program
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2142. The Historic Landmark and Historic District Protection Act of 1978, effective
March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-144; D.C. Official Code § 6-1101 et seq.), is amended by adding a
new section 11c to read as follows:
“Sec. 11c. Paul E. Sluby, Sr. Historic Burial Grounds Preservation Program.
“(a) There is established a Paul E. Sluby, Sr. Historic Burial Grounds Preservation
Program at the Office of Planning (“Office”).
“(b) Subject to available funding, the Office shall issue grants to qualified charitable
organizations for the following purposes:
(1) The preservation and restoration of historic burial grounds;
(2) The identification of historic burial grounds;
(3) The interpretation of historic burial grounds;
(4) The repatriation of human remains, particularly those from former historic
burial grounds; or
(5) Related research and documentation of historic burial grounds including burial
records, locational data, and contested ownership.
“(c) Qualified charitable organizations that seek a grant for activities at a historic burial
ground that is located on private property shall be considered for a grant only with the written
consent of the property owner.
“(d) For the purposes of this section, the term:
36

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) “Historic burial ground” means a cemetery or any natural or prepared
physical location, whether originally below, on, or above the surface of the earth, into which
human remains are deposited as a part of the death rite or ceremony of a culture, and that was
established in the District of Columbia prior to January 1, 1955, for interments of African
Americans and is owned by a public body or qualified charitable organization.
“(2) “Qualified charitable organization” means a charitable corporation, charitable
association, or charitable trust that has been granted tax-exempt status under § 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code and that has the primary purpose of preserving historical cemeteries and
graves or was formed for the purpose of identifying, preserving, or maintaining historic burial
grounds.”.
SUBTITLE P. COMMUNITY LAND TRUST TRANSFERS
Sec. 2151. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Community Land Trust Transfers Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2152. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Chapter 8 is amended as follows:
(1) Section 47-803 is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is redesignated as paragraph (1A).
(B) A new paragraph (1) is added to read as follows:
“(1) The term “community land trust” means a nonprofit organization that:
“(A) Acquires and holds land for the purpose of providing and
maintaining affordable housing for low- and moderate-income families in perpetuity; and
“(B) Employs land leases as a method to secure the affordability of
housing.”.
(2) Section 47-820.02 is amended by adding a new subsection (c-1) to read as
follows:
“(c-1) If the grounds of a resale restricted property are owned by a community land trust
as defined by § 47-803(1) and are subject to a land lease with the community land trust as the
lessor, the assessed value of the grounds shall be based upon the average annual rent over the
term of the lease, including renewals, capitalized at a rate of 10%, plus any additional actual
consideration payable; except, that the amount to which the rate is applied shall not exceed the
fair market value of the real property covered by the interest transferred.”.
(3) Section 47-850 is amended by adding a new subsection (i) to read as follows:
37

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(i) For purposes of this section, an individual who occupies real property pursuant to a
land lease with a community land trust as defined by § 47-803(1) shall be deemed the owner
thereof and entitled to apply for a homestead deduction for such real property.”.
(b) Section 47-902 is amended by adding a new paragraph (30) to read as follows:
“(30) Transfers of property to a community land trust, as that term is defined in §
47-803(1).”.
(c) Chapter 35 is amended as follows:
(1) Section 47-3502(a)(2) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and
inserting a semicolon in its place.
(B) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; or” in its place.
(C) A new subparagraph (C) is added to read as follows:
“(C) Enter into a land lease with a community land trust, as defined by §
47-803(1), as the lessor.”.
(2) Section 47-3503 is amended as follows:
(A) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(i) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(a)(1) A deed, including a lease or ground rent, conveying property or an interest in
property to a qualifying lower income homeownership household shall be exempt from the deed
recordation tax pursuant to §§ 42-1102 or 42-1103, if the household meets the requirements of §
47-3502, and a deed conveying property to a community land trust, as defined by § 47-803(1),
shall be exempt from the deed recordation tax pursuant to §§ 42-1102 or 42-1103.”.
(ii) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “if the
property securing the deed of trust or mortgage is owned by or is being simultaneously
transferred” and inserting the phrase “if the property securing the deed of trust or mortgage is
owned or leased by or is being simultaneously transferred or leased to” in its place.
(B) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(i) Paragraph (1)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “The
purchaser in fee simple or the persons acquiring qualified ownership interests under a shared
equity financing agreement receive” and inserting the phrase “The household acquiring a fee
simple interest, a leasehold interest under a land lease from a community land trust, as defined by
§ 47-803(1), or qualified ownership interests under a shared equity financing agreement,
receives” in its place.
(ii) A new paragraph (3) is added to read as follows:
“(3) Transfers of property to a community land trust, as that term is defined in §
47-803(1), shall be exempt from the transfer tax pursuant to § 47-902.”.
38

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(C) The lead-in language of subsection (c)(2) is amended to read as
follows:
“(2) Property transferred, including a transfer by land lease, to a qualifying lower
income homeownership household and property owned by a community land trust as defined by
§ 47-803(1) that is subject to a land lease to a qualifying lower income homeownership
household shall be exempt from real property tax pursuant to § 47-1002, if:”.
Sec. 2153. To the extent an exemption from such taxes is provided pursuant to section
2152 of this subtitle, all transfer and recordation taxes, penalties and interest collected since
October 1, 2018, in connection with a transfer by or to a community land trust, as defined by
D.C. Official Code § 47-803(1), as well as real property taxes, penalties and interest collected
since such date with respect to real property for which an exemption is so provided, shall be
forgiven and refunded to the person who made the payments; provided further, that real property
taxes, penalties and interest collected since such date through September 30, 2025, with respect
to real property owned of record by a community land trust, as defined by D.C. Official Code §
47-803(1) shall be forgiven and refunded to the person who made the payments.
SUBTITLE Q. BUSINESS LICENSE FEE AND PENALTY WAIVERS
Sec. 2161. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Business License Fee and Penalty Waivers Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2162. Section 29-102.12(e) of the District of Official Code is amended by striking
the phrase “fee forgiveness programs” and inserting the phrase “fee and penalty waiver and
forgiveness programs” in its place.
Sec. 2163. Chapter 28 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 47-2851.07(a)(4) is amended by striking the phrase “more than $100” and
inserting the phrase “more than $1,000” in its place.
(b) Section 47-2851.10(b) is amended by adding a new paragraph (4) to read as follows:
“(4) To encourage a licensee to come into compliance with the District’s business
licensing laws, the Department may, in accordance with rules issued by the Director, waive the
late fee and penalty for reinstating a lapsed license or an expired license.”.
SUBTITLE R. EVENTS DC GRANTS
Sec. 2171. Short title.
39

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This subtitle may be cited as the “Events DC Grants Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2172. National Cherry Blossom Festival grant.
(a) There is established a matching grant program to support the 2026 National Cherry
Blossom Festival (“Program”), which shall be administered by the Washington Convention and
Sports Authority (“Events DC”). Under the Program, a matching grant shall be awarded to a
nonprofit organization that organizes and produces an event or events as part of the official,
month-long National Cherry Blossom Festival (“Festival”) at a rate of $2 for every dollar that the
organization has raised in corporate donations by April 30, 2026; except, that the total matching
grant shall not exceed $1.5 million.
(b) In Fiscal Year 2026, of the funds allocated to the Non-Departmental Account, $1.5
million shall be transferred to Events DC to use for the grant authorized by subsection (a) of this
section.
(c) A grant awarded pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other grant
awarded by Events DC in support of the Festival.
Sec. 2173. DC History grants.
(a) In Fiscal Year 2026, Events DC shall issue a grant of no less than $350,000 for the
purpose of providing funds to a nonprofit organization located in the District that
provides education about how the District of Columbia has been the home for the fight for
freedom and democracy, with an emphasis on including the entire District across all 8 wards in
this history.
(b)(1) In Fiscal Year 2026, Events DC shall issue a grant of no less than $250,000 to a
nonprofit organization occupying space in the Carnegie Library building that is engaged in
collecting, interpreting, and sharing the history of the District.
(2) A grant awarded pursuant to this subsection shall be in addition to any other
grant awarded by Events DC in support of historical education and research.
SUBTITLE S. HOME PURCHASE ASSISTANCE RESTORATION AND
REFORM
Sec. 2181. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Home Purchase Assistance Restoration and Reform
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2182. The Home Purchase Assistance Fund Act of 1978, effective Sept. 12, 1978
(D.C. Law 2-103; D.C. Official Code § 42-2601 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 42-2603) is amended as follows:
40

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(1) Subsection (b)(1) is amended to read as follows:
“(b)(1) DHCD shall maintain and publish a Program dashboard, which shall include, at a
minimum:
“(A) The total Program funding available, excluding administrative costs,
as of the date of updating the dashboard;
“(B) The underwriting guidelines and program rules for each Program
administrator;
“(C) For each fiscal year, the average amount of time it takes for each
Program administrator and DHCD to:
“(i) Issue a notice of eligibility after receiving an application for
assistance;
“(ii) Issue a notice to proceed after issuing a notice of eligibility;
and
“(iii) Enter into a final loan agreement after issuing a notice to
proceed.”.
(2) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows.
“(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section:
“(1) Applicants required by Program rules to receive housing counseling to
receive assistance shall be permitted no less than 2 years after the completion of housing
counseling to receive financial assistance from the Program;
“(2) Priority in the allocation of assistance through the Fund shall be given to
District of Columbia residents who are low income, elderly, displaced applicants, or residents
with disabilities;
“(3) The Mayor shall distribute Program funding to eligible applicants on a rolling
basis upon availability of funding and shall not select applicants for funding based on a lottery or
other similar randomization method;
“(4) The Mayor shall not use loan-to-value ratio nor the amount of a participant’s
first trust mortgage on a housing unit to decide whether a participant will receive Program
funding;
“(5) If Program funding is depleted before the end of the fiscal year in which an
applicant receives a notice of eligibility, the notice of eligibility shall remain valid through at
least the end of the next fiscal year with available funding.”.
(b) Section 5(b) (D.C. Official Code § 42-2604(b)) is amended by repealing paragraphs
(1A) and (1B).
SUBTITLE T. DOWNTOWN BID TAX
Sec. 2191. Short title.
41

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This subtitle may be cited as the “Downtown Business Improvement District Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2192. Section 201(c)(2) of the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996,
effective March 17, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-257; D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.51(c)(2)), is amended
as follows:
(a) Strike the phrase “3% annual increase” and insert the phrase “5% annual increase” in
its place.
(b) Strike the period and insert the phrase “. Notwithstanding section 16(e)(1), for the
2026 tax year, the Downtown BID may assess a total tax increase of up to 5% over the previous
year, which may be assessed flexibly between the September 2025 and March 2026 payments;
provided, that the total combined increase for the tax year does not exceed 5%.” in its place.
SUBTITLE U. HOUSING PRODUCTION TRUST FUND
Sec. 2201. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Affordable Housing Preservation Prioritization
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2202. Section 3 of the Housing Production Trust Fund Act of 1989, effective March
16, 1989 (D.C. Law 7-202; D.C. Official Code § 42-2802), is amended by adding a new
subsection (b-7) to read as follows:
“(b-7)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of this act or any other law, in Fiscal Year 2026,
the Mayor shall use $20 million in the Fund, and any additional amount allocated to the Fund
pursuant to section 7262(b)(3) of the Revised Revenue Funding Emergency Act of 2025, passed
on emergency basis on July 28, 2025 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-340), up to a total of $30
million, for the purpose of assisting in the preservation of affordable rental housing (“eligible
preservation projects”); provided, that, if, by the last day of the third quarter of Fiscal Year 2026,
the Mayor has not obligated the full amount so allocated to eligible preservation projects
(because the total amount of applications that meet the published eligibility and underwriting
criteria is less than such amount), the unobligated balance may be used for the other purposes
authorized by this section.
“(2) The Mayor’s selection process for funding viable preservation of affordable
rental housing proposals shall give a preference to projects or proposals that previously have
received Fund commitments.”.
SUBTITLE V. INTERACTIVE WAYFINDING KIOSKS
Sec. 2211. Short title.
42

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This subtitle may be cited as the “Interactive Wayfinding Kiosk Emergency Act of
2025”.
Sec. 2212. Definitions.
For the purposes of this subtitle, the term:
(1) “Commercial district” means the geographic area included in the boundaries
of BID corporations, as that term is defined in section 3(4) of the Business Improvement
Districts Act of 1996, effective May 29, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code § 2-
1215.02(4)), and of Main Street corridors.
(2) “Interactive wayfinding kiosk” means an interactive informational wayfinding
platform for use by pedestrians and erected in the public right-of-way on public space in the form
of a kiosk capable of providing or generating wireless internet at no cost to users and
electronically displayed content including weather updates, multimodal mapping to event
destinations with mobile integration, shopping, dining, and medical points of interest, job
postings, real time transportation information, public opinion surveys, camera enabled
technology for public safety use, public safety and police emergency notifications and call button
functionality, kiosk usage information, public service announcements, and digital commercial
advertisements.
(3) “Unrestricted locations” means areas of public space, including commercial
districts, where the installation of interactive wayfinding kiosks is not prohibited by law or
regulation.
Sec. 2213. Authorization for master license agreement.
The Mayor is authorized to enter into a contract with a provider of interactive wayfinding
kiosks (“provider”) to install and operate interactive wayfinding kiosks in commercial districts
and other unrestricted locations in the District; provided, that:
(1) The District receives a percentage of the revenue derived from any
commercial digital advertisements displayed on interactive wayfinding kiosks in the District; and
(2) The master license agreement between the Mayor and the provider complies
with any other terms established by law or regulation.
Sec. 2214. Rules.
The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,
approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue rules
governing interactive wayfinding kiosks in the District, including rules related to their design,
placement, and component parts.
43

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
SUBTITLE W. TIPPED MINIMUM WAGE
Sec. 2221. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Tipped Minimum Wage Timeline Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2222. The Minimum Wage Act Revision Act of 1992, effective March 25, 1993
(D.C. Law 9-248; D.C. Official Code § 32-1001 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 32-1003), is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (f) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the date “January 1, 2023” and
inserting the date “May 1, 2023” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (6) is repealed.
(C) A new paragraph (6A) is added to read as follows:
“(6A) Except as provided in subsections (h) and (i) of this section, as of July 1,
2026, the tipped minimum wage shall be 56% of the minimum wage provided in subsection (a)
of this section, with tips on top; provided, that the employee actually receives tips in an amount
at least equal to the difference between the hourly wage paid and the minimum wage as set by
subsection (a) of this section.”.
(D) Paragraphs (7) and (8) are amended to read as follows:
“(7) Except as provided in subsections (h) and (i) of this section, as of July 1,
2028, the tipped minimum wage shall be 60% of the minimum wage provided in subsection (a)
of this section, with tips on top; provided, that the employee actually receives tips in an amount
at least equal to the difference between the hourly wage paid and the minimum wage as set by
subsection (a) of this section.
“(8) Except as provided in subsections (h) and (i) of this section, as of July 1,
2030, the tipped minimum wage shall be 65% of the minimum wage provided in subsection (a)
of this section, with tips on top; provided, that the employee actually receives tips in an amount
at least equal to the difference between the hourly wage paid and the minimum wage as set by
subsection (a) of this section.”.
(E) New paragraphs (9) and (10) are added to read as follows:
“(9) Except as provided in subsections (h) and (i) of this section, as of July 1,
2032, the tipped minimum wage shall be 70% of the minimum wage provided in subsection (a)
of this section, with tips on top; provided, that the employee actually receives tips in an amount
at least equal to the difference between the hourly wage paid and the minimum wage as set by
subsection (a) of this section.
“(10) Except as provided in subsections (h) and (i) of this section, as of July 1,
2034, the tipped minimum wage shall be 75% of the minimum wage provided in subsection (a)
44

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
of this section, with tips on top; provided, that the employee actually receives tips in an amount
at least equal to the difference between the hourly wage paid and the minimum wage as set by
subsection (a) of this section.”.
(2) Subsection (i) is amended by striking the phrase “, and (7)” and inserting the
phrase “(6A), (7), (8), (9), and (10)” in its place.
(b) Section 8a (D.C. Official Code § 32-1007.01) is amended as follows:
(1) Designate the existing text as subsection (a).
(2) A new subsection (b) is added to read as follows:
“(b)(1) The Office of the Chief Financial Officer, beginning on June 1, 2027, and every 2
years thereafter, shall publish a report on the economic trends affecting the restaurant industry
and tipped full-service and limited-service restaurant workers in the District that:
“(A) Compares wages and salaries for tipped restaurant workers year over
year;
“(B) Indicates the average gross receipts for restaurants in the District;
“(C) Analyzes the change in wages for tipped restaurant workers year over
year;
“(D) Compares the number of full-service and limited-service restaurants
year over year; and
“(E) Indicates the total number of restaurants that claimed a retailer
property tax relief credit pursuant to D.C. Official Code §§ 47-1807.14 and 47-1808.14 year over
year.
“(2) Each report published pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection after the
June 1, 2027, report shall also include an analysis of the effect of section 70201 of the One Big
Beautiful Bill Act, approved July 4, 2025 (Pub. L. No. 119-21; 139 Stat. 170), on tipped
workers’ overall tax liability to the District.
“(3) By January 1, 2036, the Office of the Chief Financial Officer shall publish a
report analyzing the effect of the tipped minimum wage reaching 100% of the regular minimum
wage on the restaurant industry and tipped workers in the District.”.
(c) Section 9(b) (D.C. Official Code § 32-1008(b)), is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(2) A new paragraph (6A) is added to read as follows:
“(6A) Beginning on January 1, 2026, a list of sources of the employee’s
compensation in addition to base wages and gratuities, including bonuses, commissions on sales,
any amount calculated as a percentage of service charges, or other sources; and”.
Sec. 2223. Applicability.
45

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Section 222(a)(1) shall apply as of July 25, 2025.
SUBTITLE X. PRESERVING AND PROTECTING CHINATOWN
Sec. 2231. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Preserving and Protecting Chinatown Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2232. Chapter 8 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 47-870(3) is amended as follows:
(1) The existing text is designated as subparagraph (A).
(2) A new sub-paragraph (B) is added to read as follows:
“(B)(i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, for a property
located in Square 485, Lots 3, 30, 42, 43, 44, and 48, “repositioning” means:
“(I) A construction, reconstruction, alteration, or renovation
to a property:
“(aa) With a minimum of 50,000 square feet; or
“(bb) That yields a minimum of 50,000 square feet;
and
“(II) That results in:
“(aa) The conversion of the property from a
primarily non-residential, rooming house, or office use to a use that is not residential; or
“(bb) An upgrade in at least 50,000 square feet of
office space.
“(ii) For the purposes of this subparagraph, the reviewing authority
shall use existing certificates of occupancy or, in the absence of certificates of occupancy,
affidavits of prior use.”.
(b) Section 47-870.01 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a)(2)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “repositioning.” and
inserting the phrase “repositioning or, for a tax abatement for a property located in Square 485,
Lots 3, 30, 42, 43, 44, and 48, to existing properties utilized only for office use.” in its place.
(2) A new subsection (g) is added to read as follows:
“(g) Any property owner issued a tax abatement pursuant to this subchapter after October
1, 2025, for a property located in Square 485, Lots 3, 30, 42, 43, 44, and 48, shall:
“(1) For the duration of the time in which the property owner receives a tax
abatement pursuant to this subchapter, lease space to or operate at least one space in the
46

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
redeveloped property to be leased to or operated by a business or nonprofit entity that maintains
or enhances the cultural heritage of the Chinatown neighborhood;
“(2) For the duration of the time in which the property owner receives a tax
abatement pursuant to this subchapter, lease space to or operate an Asian market open to the
public as part of the redeveloped property and, prior to opening, consult with the Chinatown
Revitalization Initiative, ANC 2C, and residents of the Wah Luck House to identify products that
may be of interest to sell in the market; and
“(3) In the first year that a tax abatement is issued pursuant to this subchapter,
donate a minimum of $300,000 to the District of Columbia, which shall be made available in full
to the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development for the purposes of
supplementing the funding available for grants issued pursuant to section 2032(ii) of the Deputy
Mayor for Planning and Economic Development Limited Grant-Making Authority Act of 2012,
effective September 20, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-168; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.04(ii)), in the next
Chinatown Long-Term Lease Grant program cycle following the date of the donation.”.
TITLE III. PUBLIC SAFETY AND JUSTICE
SUBTITLE A. IMMIGRANT LEGAL SERVICES PROGRAM
Sec. 3001. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Immigrant Legal Services Program Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 3002. Section 3102 of the Immigrant Legal Services Program Act of 2018, effective
October 30, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-168; D.C. Official Code § 4-1901), is repealed.
SUBTITLE B. 911-311 FUND SWEEP REPEAL AND REVERSAL
Sec. 3011. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “911-311 Fund Sweep Repeal and Reversal Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 3012. (a) The tabular array in section 8002(a) of the Designated Fund Transfer Act
of 2021, effective November 13, 2021 (D.C. Law 24-45; 68 DCR 10163), is amended as follows:
(1) Strike the following row:
UC0 1630 911 and 311 Assessments 150,000 Recurring
(2) Strike the number “1,012,074” and insert the number “862,074” in its place.
(b) The transfers of $150,000 from the 911 and 311 Assessments Fund to the General
Fund of the District of Columbia in Fiscal Year 2023 and Fiscal Year 2024, made pursuant to
47

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
section 8002(a) of the Designated Fund Transfer Act of 2021, effective November 13, 2021
(D.C. Law 24-45; 68 DCR 10163), are reversed and $300,000 shall be transferred from the
unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia to the 911 and 311
Assessments Fund on October 1, 2025.
SUBTITLE C. CRIMINAL CODE REFORM COMMISSION
Sec. 3021. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Criminal Code Reform Commission Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 3022. Section 3127 of the Criminal Code Reform Commission Establishment Act of
2016, effective October 8, 2016 (D.C. Law 21-160; D.C. Official Code § 3-156), is revived as of
the effective date of this subtitle and amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 3127. Sunset.
“This part shall expire on September 30, 2025, and the Commission shall thereupon be
dissolved.”.
Sec. 3023. Section 406(b)(25) of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive
Merit Personnel Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-139; D.C. Official Code § 1-
604.06(b)(25)), is repealed.
Sec. 3024. Applicability.
Section 3023 shall apply as of September 30, 2025.
SUBTITLE D. REHIRING OF RETIRED POLICE OFFICERS
Sec. 3031. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Retired Police Officer and Firefighter Redeployment
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 3032. The Retired Police Officer Redeployment Amendment Act of 1992, effective
September 29, 1992 (D.C. Law 9-163; D.C. Official Code § 5-761 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 2(a-1) (D.C. Official Code § 5-761(a-1)) is amended by striking the phrase
“as a temporary full-time or temporary part-time employee without jeopardy to the retirement
benefits of the employee” and inserting the phrase “as a full-time or part-time employee of the
Department of Forensic Sciences without jeopardy to the retirement benefits of the police
officer” in its place.
48

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) Section 2a(a) (D.C. Official Code § 5-761.01(a)) is amended by striking the phrase
“temporary full-time or temporary part-time” and inserting the phrase “full-time or part-time” in
its place.
Sec. 3033. Section 12(p)(5) of the Policemen and Firemen’s Retirement and Disability
Act, approved September 1, 1916 (39 Stat. 718; D.C. Official Code § 5-723(e)), is amended by
striking the phrase “an annuitant employed by the Office of Unified Communications” and
inserting the phrase “an annuitant employed by the Department of Forensic Sciences under
section 2(a-1) of the Retired Police Officer Redeployment Amendment Act of 1992, effective
September 29, 1992 (D.C. Law 9-163; D.C. Official Code § 5-761(a-1)), or an annuitant
employed by the Office of Unified Communications” in its place.
SUBTITLE E. BACKGROUND CHECK AND RAP BACK PROGRAM
Sec. 3041. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Background Check Fingerprinting Authority and Rap
Back Program Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 3042. Definitions.
For the purposes of this subtitle, the term:
(1) “Covered individual” means an individual who has submitted to a fingerprint-
based background check as a condition of caring for children, persons with a disability, the
elderly, or vulnerable adults, a security officer, special police officer, private detective, private
detective agency, security agency, or other person responsible for protecting property, preventing
theft, damage to real or personal property, assaults, disorder, or other illegal occurrences, or for
purposes of licensure, appointment, commission, certification, registration, employment, or
volunteer service with a participating agency pursuant to District law or regulation.
(2) “FBI” means the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
(3) “FBI Rap Back Service” means the FBI Next Generation Identification
Record of Arrest and Prosecution Background Service.
(4) “MPD” means the Metropolitan Police Department.
(5) “Notification event” means an event, such as an arrest or other criminal
activity when fingerprints are taken, that triggers a notification from the FBI Rap Back Service to
the Metropolitan Police Department regarding a covered individual who has been subscribed to
the FBI Rap Back Service.
(6) “Participating agency” means a District government agency that requires a
fingerprint-based background check and receives the results as a condition of caring for children,
persons with a disability, the elderly, or vulnerable adults, a security officer, special police
49

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
officer, private detective, private detective agency, security agency, or other person responsible
for protecting property, preventing theft, damage to real or personal property, assaults, disorder,
or similar illegal occurrences, or for purposes of licensure, appointment, commission,
certification, registration, employment, or volunteer service.
Sec. 3043. Background check fingerprinting authority.
(a) If the fingerprinting of an individual is required or authorized by any District or
federal law or regulation for the purposes of conducting a background check of the individual,
MPD, or an entity authorized by MPD, may fingerprint the individual, forward the fingerprints to
the FBI for the purpose of conducting a criminal history check, receive the results of the criminal
history check, and disseminate the results of the criminal history check to entities authorized to
receive the results.
(b) The authority provided by this section applies to fingerprinting authorized under the
District of Columbia Rap Back Program and to fingerprinting required or authorized by any
other District or federal law or regulation.
Sec. 3044. District of Columbia Rap Back Program.
(a) MPD shall participate on behalf of the District in the FBI Rap Back Service through
the establishment of a District of Columbia Rap Back Program.
(b) The purpose of the District of Columbia Rap Back Program shall be to allow
participating agencies, through the District of Columbia Rap Back Program, to subscribe covered
individuals in the FBI Rap Back Service and to be notified when a covered individual is the
subject of an FBI Rap Back Service notification event.
(c) If a participating agency requests that the District of Columbia Rap Back Program
subscribe a covered individual in the FBI Rap Back Service, the covered individual shall be
fingerprinted by MPD or an entity authorized by MPD and the fingerprints shall be forwarded by
MPD to the FBI for a national criminal history check and subscription in the FBI Rap Back
Service.
(d) MPD shall notify the relevant participating agency when a covered individual
subscribed by the participating agency in the FBI Rap Back Service through the District of
Columbia Rap Back Program is the subject of an FBI Rap Back Service notification event.
(e) For the purposes of administering the District of Columbia Rap Back Program and
performing or facilitating criminal history background screenings, MPD is authorized to take the
fingerprints of a covered individual, submit to the FBI the fingerprints of, and accompanying
records regarding, a covered individual, and allow such fingerprints and records to be retained by
the FBI Rap Back Service and used for ongoing searches through the FBI Rap Back Service.
50

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 3045. Limitation on use of information.
The information contained in a notification event received by a participating agency shall
be used by the participating agency only for the purpose of determining a covered individual’s
eligibility to care for children, persons with a disability, the elderly, or vulnerable adults, a
security officer, special police officer, private detective, private detective agency, security
agency, or other person responsible for protecting property, preventing theft, damage to real or
personal property, assaults, disorders, or similar illegal occurrences, or for purposes of licensure,
appointment, commission, certification, registration, employment, or volunteer service and shall
not be further disseminated by the participating agency.
Sec. 3046. Fees.
MPD may establish by rule a fee, to be imposed on a covered individual or participating
agency, for subscription of a covered individual in the District of Columbia Rap Back
Program. The fee may be imposed on an annual basis.
Sec. 3047. Rules.
MPD, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,
approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue rules
to govern the implementation of the District of Columbia Rap Back Program and to otherwise
implement the provisions of this subtitle.
SUBTITLE F. DETAINERS
Sec. 3051. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Detainer Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 3052. Section 7 of An Act To create a Department of Corrections in the District of
Columbia, effective December 11, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-194; D.C. Official Code § 24-211.07), is
amended by adding a new subsection (g) to read as follows:
“(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit cooperation required by federal
law, or to restrict the sharing of information covered by section 642 of the Omnibus
Consolidated Appropriations Act, 1997, approved September 30, 1996 (110 Stat. 3009-707; 8
U.S.C. § 1373).”.
SUBTITLE G. DEPUTY MAYOR FOR PUBLIC SAFETY AND JUSTICE
GRANT-MAKING AUTHORITY
Sec. 3061. Short title.
51

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This subtitle may be cited as the “Deputy Mayor for Public Safety and Justice Grant-
Making Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 3062. Section 3023 of the Office of Deputy Mayor for Public Safety and Justice
Establishment Act of 2011, effective September 6, 2023 (D.C. Law 25-50; D.C. Official Code §
1-301.192), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language of paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, an organization, which may
include a non-profit voluntary business association, shall:”.
(2) Paragraph (6)(A) is amended to read as follows:
“(6)(A) Salary and fringe benefits for staff, including special police officers when
specifically authorized by the Deputy Mayor;”.
(b) Subsection (d) is amended by adding a new paragraph (6) to read as follows:
“(6) In Fiscal Year 2026, the Deputy Mayor shall issue no less than $750,000 in
total grant awards pursuant to this subsection.”.
SUBTITLE H. ACCESS TO JUSTICE CLARIFICATION
Sec. 3071. Short Title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Access to Justice Initiative Clarification Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 3072. The Access to Justice Initiative Establishment Act of 2010, effective
September 24, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-223; D.C. Official Code § 4-1701.01 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 101 (D.C. Official Code § 4-1701.01) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the phrase “Grant Funding for Civil
Legal Services” and inserting the phrase “Grant Program” in its place.
(2) A new paragraph (6A) is added to read as follows:
“(6A) “CLCPP” means the Civil Legal Counsel Projects Program.”.
(b) Section 201 (D.C. Official Code § 4-1702.01) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) The existing language is designated as paragraph (1).
(B) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(i) Strike the phrase “nonprofit organization partners; and
providing loan-repayment assistance to lawyers working in eligible employment” and insert the
phrase “nonprofit organization partners, including a shared legal interpreter bank; providing
52

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
loan-repayment assistance to lawyers working in eligible employment; and providing legal
services to eligible individuals or groups in covered proceedings as defined in section 3052(2) of
the Expanding Access to Justice Amendment Act of 2017, effective December 13, 2017 (D.C.
Law 22-33; D.C. Official Code § 4-1801(2))” in its place.
(ii) Strike the phrase “. The Initiative shall consist of the ATJ and
LRAP programs.” and insert a period in its place.
(C) A new paragraph (2) is added to read as follows:
“(2) The Initiative shall consist of the ATJ program, the LRAP, and the CLCPP.”.
(2) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1)(1) The ATJ program shall provide support to nonprofit organizations that deliver
civil legal services to low-income and under-served District residents, or support to their
nonprofit organization partners, including a shared legal interpreter bank.
“(2) The ATJ program shall be part of and be funded through the Initiative,
established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.”.
(c) Section 202(a) (D.C. Official Code § 4-1702.02(a)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended as follows:
(i) Sub-subparagraph (i) is amended by striking the phrase “the
ATJ program” and inserting the phrase “the Initiative” in its place.
(ii) Sub-subparagraph (ii) is amended by striking the phrase “the
ATJ program” and inserting the phrase “the Initiative” in its place.
(B) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “the ATJ
program” and inserting the phrase “the Initiative” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “the ATJ program” and
inserting the phrase “the Initiative” in its place.
(d) Section 301 (D.C. Official Code § 4-1703.01) is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “ATJ; funding” and
inserting the phrase “ATJ Initiative; funding” in its place.
(2) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “each fiscal year from the budget of the Initiative to
the Bar Foundation for the purpose of the Bar Foundation providing support to nonprofit
organizations that deliver civil legal services to low-income and under-served District residents,
or support to their nonprofit organization partners, including funds for a shared legal interpreter
bank” and insert the phrase “each fiscal year to the Bar Foundation for the purpose of funding
the Initiative, as defined in section 201(a)” in its place.
(B) Strike the phrase “the budget for ATJ” and insert the phrase “the
budget for the Initiative” in its place.
53

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(e) Section 401(b) (D.C. Official Code § 4-1704.01(b)) is amended by repealing
paragraphs (1) and (2).
Sec. 3073. Section 3053 of the Expanding Access to Justice Amendment Act of 2017,
effective December 13, 2017 (D.C. Law 22-33; D.C. Official Code § 4-1802), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “Civil Legal Counsel Projects
Program (“Program”)” and inserting the phrase “Civil Legal Counsel Projects Program
(“CLCPP”)” in its place.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) CLCPP shall be part of and be funded through the Access to Justice
Initiative, established pursuant to section 201 of the Access to Justice Initiative Establishment
Act of 2010, effective September 14, 2011 (D.C. Law 19-21; D.C. Official Code § 4-1702.01).”.
(2) Paragraph (3) is repealed.
(c) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “entity for the Program; and”
and inserting the phrase “entity for CLCPP; and” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “requirements for the
Program, including” and inserting the phrase “requirements for CLCPP, including” in its place.
TITLE IV. PUBLIC EDUCATION SYSTEM
SUBTITLE A. UNIFORM PER STUDENT FUNDING FORMULA
Sec. 4001. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Uniform Per Student Funding Formula Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 4002. The Uniform Per Student Funding Formula for Public Schools and Public
Charter Schools Act of 1998, effective March 26, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-207; D.C. Official Code §
38-2901 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 104(a) (D.C. Official Code § 38-2903(a)) is amended by striking the phrase
“$14,668 per student for Fiscal Year 2025 and” and inserting the phrase “$15,070 per student for
Fiscal Year 2026 and $14,110 for” in its place.
(b) Section 105 (D.C. Official Code § 38-2904) is amended by striking the tabular array
and inserting the following tabular array in its place:
54

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“Grade Level Weighting Per Pupil
Allocation in FY
2026
“Pre-Kindergarten 3 1.34 $20,194
“Pre-Kindergarten 4 1.30 $19,591
“Kindergarten 1.30 $19,591
“Grades 1-5 1.00 $15,070
“Grades 6-8 1.08 $16,276
“Grades 9-12 1.22 $18,385
“Alternative program 1.58 $23,811
“Special education school 1.17 $17,632
“Adult 1.00 $15,070
”.
(c) Section 106(c) (D.C. Official Code § 38-2905(c)) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) The supplemental allocations shall be calculated by applying weightings to the
foundation level as follows:
“Special education add-ons:
“Level/ Program Definition Weighting Per Pupil
Allocation in
FY 2026
“Level 1: Special 8 hours or less per school week of 0.97 $14,618
Education specialized services
“Level 2: Special More than 8 hours and less than or equal 1.20 $18,084
Education to 16 hours per school week of
specialized services
“Level 3: Special More than 16 hours and less than or 1.97 $29,688
Education equal to 24 hours per school week of
specialized services
“Level 4: Special More than 24 hours per school week of 3.49 $52,594
Education specialized services which may include
instruction in a self-contained (dedicated)
special education school other than
residential placement
Special Education Funding provided in addition to special 0.099 $1,492
Compliance education level add-on funding on a per-
55

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
student basis for special education
compliance
Attorneys’ Fees Funding provided in addition to special 0.089 $1,341
education level add-on funding on a per-
student basis for attorney’s fees
“General education add-ons:
“Level/ Program Definition Weighting Per Pupil
Allocation in
FY 2026
“Elementary ELL Additional funding for English language 0.50 $7,535
learners in grades PK3-5
“Secondary ELL Additional funding for English language 0.75 $11,303
learners in grades 6-12, alternative
students, adult students, and students in
special education schools
“At-risk Additional funding for students in foster 0.30 $4,521
care, who are homeless, on TANF or
SNAP, or behind grade level in high
school
“At-risk High School Funding provided in addition to at-risk 0.06 $904
Over-Age funding for students who are behind
Supplement grade level in high school
“At-risk > 40% Funding provided in addition to at-risk 0.07 $1,055
Concentration funding for the percentage of at-risk
Supplement students above 40% enrolled in a school
where at least 40% of the student
population is at-risk
“At-risk > 70% Funding provided in addition to at-risk 0.07 $1,055
Concentration funding and at-risk > 40% concentration
Supplement supplement for the percentage of at-risk
students above 70% where at least 70%
of the student population is at-risk
“Residential add-ons:
56

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“Level/ Program Definition Weighting Per Pupil
Allocation in
FY 2026
“Residential Funding provided on a per-student basis 1.67 $25,167
for a District of Columbia Public Schools
school or public charter school that
provides students with room and board in
a residential setting, in addition to their
instructional program
“Level 1 Special Funding in addition to residential funding 0.37 $5,576
Education – to support the after-hours Level 1 special
Residential education needs of students living in a
DCPS school or public charter school
that provides students with room and
board in a residential setting
“Level 2 Special Funding in addition to residential funding 1.34 $20,194
Education - to support the after-hours Level 2 special
Residential education needs of students living in a
DCPS school or public charter school
that provides students with room and
board in a residential setting
“Level 3 Special Funding in addition to residential funding 2.89 $43,552
Education - to support the after-hours Level 3 special
Residential education needs of students living in a
DCPS school or public charter school
that provides students with room and
board in a residential setting
“Level 4 Special Funding in addition to residential funding 2.89 $43,552
Education - to support the after-hours Level 4 special
Residential education needs of limited and non-
English proficient students living in a
DCPS school or public charter school
that provides students with room and
board in a residential setting
“LEP/NEP – Funding in addition to residential funding 0.668 $10,067
Residential to support the after-hours limited and
non-English proficiency needs of
57

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
students living in a DCPS school or
public charter school that provides
students with room and board in a
residential setting
“Special education add-ons for students with extended school year (“ESY”) indicated in
their individualized education programs (“IEPs”):
“Level/ Program Definition Weighting Per Pupil
Allocation in
FY 2026
“Special Education Additional funding to support the 0.063 $949
Level 1 ESY summer school or program need for
Level 1 special education students with
ESY services indicated in their IEPs
“Special Education Additional funding to support the 0.227 $3,421
Level 2 ESY summer school or program need for
Level 2 special education students with
ESY services indicated in their IEPs
“Special Education Additional funding to support the 0.491 $7,399
Level 3 ESY summer school or program need for
Level 3 special education students with
ESY services indicated in their IEPs
“Special Education Additional funding to support the 0.491 $7,399
Level 4 ESY summer school or program need for
Level 4 special education students with
ESY services indicated in their IEPs
”.
(d) Section 107b(b)(1) (D.C. Official Code § 38-2906.02(b)(1)) is amended by striking
the figure “35%” and inserting the figure “30%” in its place.
SUBTITLE B. DC PUBLIC LIBRARY SPECIAL FUNDS
Sec. 4011. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “District of Columbia Library Special Funds Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
58

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 4012. An Act To establish and provide for the maintenance of a free public library
and reading room in the District of Columbia, approved June 3, 1896 (29 Stat. 244; D.C. Official
Code § 39-101 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 14(c) (D.C. Official Code § 39-114(c)) is amended to read as follows:
“(c)(1) The money deposited into the Account but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Account shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year
limitation.”.
(b) Section 16(d)(1) (D.C. Official Code § 39-116(d)(1)) is amended by striking the
phrase “the Fund, and interest earned,” and inserting the phrase “the Fund” in its place.
(c) Section 17 (D.C. Official Code § 39-117) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting
a semicolon in its place.
(B) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; and” in its place.
(C) A new paragraph (4) is added to read as follows:
“(4) Payment of the costs of temporary and when-actually-employed employees
whose work is intended to generate revenue from the activities described in sections 5(a)(14),
(16), and (17)(A)(ii) and (iii) and 7.”.
(2) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.”.
SUBTITLE C. PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL EDUCATOR COMPENSATION
PAYMENTS
Sec. 4021. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Public Charter School Educator Compensation
Payments Emergency Act of 2025”.
59

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 4022. (a) In School Year 2025-2026, the Office of the State Superintendent of
Education shall make direct payments in a total amount of $30,785,832 from the Workforce
Investments account to public charter LEAs to increase the compensation of public charter
school educators.
(b) To receive funds authorized under subsection (a) of this section, a public charter
LEA’s chief executive officer or head of school shall sign an assurance that the funds provided
under this section will be:
(1) Used exclusively to increase the compensation of public charter school
educators; and
(2) Paid to the public charter LEA’s educators during School Year 2025-2026.
(c) For the purposes of this subtitle, the term:
(1) “Public charter LEA” means an individual public charter school or a group of
public charter schools operating under a single charter.
(2) “Educator” means a school-based employee who directly supports students,
including full-time and part-time teachers, teachers’ aides, homebound teachers, hospital-based
teachers, instructional coaches, athletic trainers, attendance coordinators, counselors, physical
therapists, social workers, school psychologists, speech therapists, librarians, and classroom
assistants of any type who assist in the instructional process, but excludes administrative
personnel such as principals, assistant principals, deans, and office staff.
SUBTITLE D. EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATOR SUBSIDY PAYMENTS
Sec. 4031. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Early Childhood Educator Pay Equity Fund Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 4032. Section 5102(b) of the Early Childhood Educator Pay Equity Fund
Establishment Act of 2021, effective November 13, 2021 (D.C. Law 24-45; D.C. Official Code §
1-325.431(b)), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (4) is amended to read as follows:
“(4) In Fiscal Year 2025, $70,000,000 in local funds; and”.
(b) Paragraph (6) is repealed.
(c) A new paragraph (7) is added to read as follows:
“(7) In Fiscal Year 2026, $72,126,902 in local funds.”.
Sec. 4033. The Day Care Policy Act of 1979, effective September 19, 1979 (D.C. Law 3-
16; D.C. Official Code § 4-401 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 4-401) is amended as follows:
60

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(1) Paragraph (1)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “an expanded child
development home” and inserting the phrase “a child development home or an expanded child
development home” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (1D) is amended to read as follows:
“(1D) The term “CDA” means a child development associate credential
recognized by the Council for Professional Recognition and accepted by the Department to
demonstrate competency as a caregiver for young children or a state-awarded certificate that
meets or exceeds the requirements for a child development associate credential, as defined by the
Department.”.
(3) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “the the” and inserting the
word “the” in its place.
(4) Paragraph (4B) is amended by striking the phrase “education.” and inserting
the phrase “education or a related field, as identified by the Department’s regulations governing
the qualifications of child development facility lead teachers and assistant teachers.” in its place.
(5) Paragraph (6) is repealed.
(b) Section 11b (D.C. Official Code § 4-410.02) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) From October 1, 2024, through December 31, 2024, child development facilities that
enter or have entered into a contract or agreement with the Department to receive monies from
the Early Childhood Educator Pay Equity Fund shall use such monies to pay, at minimum, the
salaries for assistant and lead teachers listed in the following tables:
Table 1: Assistant Teacher Minimum Salaries
Credential Level Minimum Salary
Less than a CDA $43,865/year
CDA $51,006/year
Associate $54,262/year
Table 2: Lead Teacher Minimum Salaries
Credential Level Minimum Salary
CDA or 48 credit hours with greater than or $54,262/year
equal to 15 credit hours in ECE
Associate in ECE or Associate’s with greater $63,838/year
than or equal to 24 credit hours in ECE
Bachelor’s in ECE or Bachelor’s with greater $75,103/year
than or equal to 24 credit hours in ECE
”.
61

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(2) New subsections (b-1) and (b-2) are added to read as follows:
“(b-1) From January 1, 2025, through September 30, 2026, child development facilities
that enter or have entered into a contract or agreement with the Department to receive monies
from the Early Childhood Educator Pay Equity Fund shall use such monies to pay, at minimum,
the salaries for assistant and lead teachers listed in the following tables:
Table 1: Assistant Teacher Minimum Salaries
Credential Level Minimum Salary
CDA $51,006/year ($24.52/hour)
Associate degree or higher or 60 hours of $54,262/year ($26.09/hour)
college-level coursework in any field
Table 2: Lead Teacher Minimum Salaries
Credential Level Minimum Salary
Child development center teacher or expanded $51,006/year ($24.52/hour)
child development home caregiver with a CDA
Child development home caregiver with a CDA $54,262/year ($26.09/hour)
Associate in ECE; associate with at least 12 $63,838/year ($30.69/hour)
credit hours in ECE; 60 college credit hours
with at least 12 credit hours in ECE
Bachelor’s or higher in ECE; or bachelor’s or $75,103/year ($36.11/hour)
higher with at least 12 credit hours in ECE
“(b-2) The Department shall issue guidance to assist child development facilities with
aligning the minimum salary requirements in subsections (b) and (b-1) of this section with the
qualifications for child development facility assistant and lead teachers it has established by
regulation.”.
SUBTITLE E. EARLY LITERACY INTERVENTION
Sec. 4041. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Early Literacy Intervention Emergency Amendment
Act of 2025”.
Sec. 4042. Section 3(b)(24) of the State Education Office Establishment Act of 2000,
effective October 21, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-176; D.C. Official Code § 38-2602(b)(24)), is amended
to read as follows:
62

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(24) Subject to available funding, implement a program to provide funding and
other support to early literacy programs and providers, which may include the issuance of
grants.”.
SUBTITLE F. HEALTHY SCHOOLS
Sec. 4051. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Healthy Schools Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 4052. Title I of the Healthy Schools Act of 2010, effective July 27, 2010 (D.C. Law
18-209; D.C. Official Code § 38-821.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) The title heading is amended to read as follows:
“TITLE I. DEFINITIONS; HEALTHY SCHOOLS INITIATIVES.”.
(b) Section 101 (D.C. Official Code § 38-821.01) is amended by adding a new paragraph
(2A) to read as follows:
“(2A) “LEA” means local education agency, which is the District of Columbia
Public Schools system or an individual or a group of public charter schools operating under a
single charter.”.
(c) Section 102(c) (D.C. Official Code § 38-821.02(c)) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “In Fiscal Year 2025,
$5,690,000 in local funds shall be used as follows:” and inserting the phrase “Funding for
healthy schools initiatives may be used as follows:” in its place.
(2) A new paragraph (12) is added to read as follows:
“(12)(A) In School Year 2025-2026, $300,000 in funds shall be used to assist at
least 2 community-based organizations in partnering with schools and childcare development
facilities to create and sustain healthy working environments for educators through a competitive
grant program.
“(B) The Office of the State Superintendent of Education (“OSSE”) shall
select grant recipients, after a call for applications, by no later than November 26, 2025.
“(C) Participation in the program shall be based on criteria OSSE
establishes.
“(D) For the purposes of this paragraph, the term “educator” includes a
principal, assistant principal, teacher, assistant teacher, paraprofessional, school psychologist or
counselor, all school service providers, or any person who provides professional educational
services or education psychological services at a school.”.
SUBTITLE G. YOUTH WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS
Sec. 4061. Short title.
63

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This subtitle may be cited as the “Youth Workforce Development Programs Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 4062. Section 202(3) of the Criminal Background Checks for the Protection of
Children Act of 2004, effective April 13, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-353; D.C. Official Code § 4-
1501.02(3)), is amended to read as follows:
“(3) “Covered child or youth services provider”:
“(A) Means any District government agency providing direct services to
children or youth and any private entity that is licensed by or contracts with the District to
provide direct services to children or youth, or for the benefit of children or youth, that affect the
health, safety, and welfare of children or youth, including individual and group counseling,
therapy, case management supervision, or mentoring.
“(B) The term “covered child or youth services provider” does not include
foster parents or grantees.
“(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the term
“covered child or youth services provider” includes an employee or volunteer of a host employer
or grantee participating in a program established pursuant to section 2a of the Youth
Employment Act of 1979, effective January 5, 1980 (D.C. Law 3-46; D.C. Official Code § 32-
242), who has direct contact with or unsupervised access to youth participating in such
programs.”.
Sec. 4063. Section 2a of the Youth Employment Act of 1979, effective January 5, 1980
(D.C. Law 3-46; D.C. Official Code § 32-242), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (h) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the phrase “;
and” in its place,
(2) Paragraph (2) is repealed.
(3) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “closing ceremony” and
inserting the word “activities” in its place.
(b) A new subsection (i) is added to read as follows:
“(i) The Department of Employment Services is authorized to perform criminal
background checks and traffic record checks for employees and volunteers of host employers or
grantees participating in programs established pursuant to this section in accordance with the
Criminal Background Checks for the Protection of Children Act of 2004, effective April 13,
2005 (D.C. Law 15-353; D.C. Official Code § 4-1501.01 et seq.).”.
SUBTITLE H. UNIVERSAL PAID LEAVE
64

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 4071. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Universal Paid Leave Emergency Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 4072. Section 1152(b)(2)(A) of the Universal Paid Leave Implementation Fund Act
of 2016, effective October 8, 2016 (D.C. Law 21-160; D.C. Official Code § 32-551.01(b)(2)(A)),
is amended as follows:
(a) Sub-subparagraph (v) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(b) Sub-subparagraph (vi) is amended to read as follows:
“(vi) In Fiscal Year 2029, $25,812,158; and”.
(c) A new sub-subparagraph (vii) is added to read as follows:
“(vii) In Fiscal Year 2030 and each subsequent fiscal year, no more
than 15% of the money estimated to be deposited in the Fund;”.
Sec. 4073. Section 8002(b) of the Designated Fund Transfer Act of 2022, effective
September 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-167; 69 DCR 9223), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the phrase “; and” in
its place.
(b) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting a period in its place.
(c) Paragraphs (3) and (4) are repealed.
Sec. 4074. Applicability.
Section 4073 shall apply as of July 1, 2025.
SUBTITLE I. CHARTER SCHOOL FACILITY ALLOWANCE
Sec. 4081. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Charter School Facility Allowance Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 4082. Section 109 of the Uniform Per Student Funding Formula for Public Schools
and Public Charter Schools Act of 1998, effective March 26, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-207; D.C.
Official Code § 38-2908), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “as provided in subsections (b), (b-
1), and (b-2) of” and inserting the phrase “as otherwise provided in” in its place.
65

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) Subsection (b-3) is amended by striking the phrase “Beginning with Fiscal Year 2024,
and for each subsequent fiscal year,” and inserting the phrase “In Fiscal Year 2024, Fiscal Year
2025, and Fiscal Year 2026,” in its place.
(c) A new subsection (b-4) is added to read as follows:
“(b-4)(1) For Fiscal Year 2027 and Fiscal Year 2028, the per-pupil facility allowance for
Public Charter Schools shall be $3,850 per pupil for non-residential facilities and $10,396 per
pupil for residential facilities.
“(2) For Fiscal Year 2029, the per-pupil facility allowance for public charter
schools shall be $4,219 per pupil for non-residential facilities and $11,393 per pupil for
residential facilities.
“(3) Beginning with Fiscal Year 2030, and for each subsequent fiscal year, the
per-pupil facility allowance for public charter schools shall be 3.1% greater than the previous
fiscal year’s per-pupil facility allowance.
“(4) The facility allowance set forth in paragraphs (1), (2) and (3) of this
subsection shall be multiplied by the number of students estimated to be attending each Public
Charter School to determine the actual facility allowance payments to be received by each Public
Charter School.”.
SUBTITLE J. SPECIAL NEEDS PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL FUNDING
Sec. 4091. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Special Needs Public Charter School Funding
Authorization Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 4092. (a)(1) Notwithstanding section 2401(b)(2) of the District of Columbia School
Reform Act of 1995, approved April 26, 1996 (110 Stat. 1321-136; D.C. Official Code § 38-
1804.01(b)(2)), in Fiscal Year 2026, the Public Charter School Board (“PCSB”) shall transmit
$1,200,000 to St. Coletta Special Education Public Charter School (“School”), which shall be in
addition to any funds transmitted to the School pursuant to the Uniform Per Student Funding
Formula for Public Schools and Public Charter Schools Act of 1998, effective March 26, 1999
(D.C. Law 12-207; D.C. Official Code § 38-2901 et seq.).
(2) PCSB shall transfer the funds authorized in paragraph (1) of this subsection to
a bank designated by the School no later than November 1, 2025.
(3) Within 5 business days after transferring the funds to the bank designated by
the School pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, PCSB shall submit documentation to the
Council showing that such transfer occurred.
66

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b)(1) PCSB shall require the School to submit to it a quarterly accounting of all
expenditures made with the additional funds the School received pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section.
(2) PCSB may consider the School’s failure to submit the quarterly accounting
required pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection as fiscal mismanagement.
SUBTITLE K. PUBLIC SCHOOL EXPERIENTIAL GRANT
Sec. 4101. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Experiential Learning Grant Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 4102. (a) Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective
December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), in Fiscal Year
2026, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education (“OSSE”) shall issue a $500,000 grant
to Live It Learn It, for the purpose of creating a microgrant and support program to enhance
experiential learning at high-need schools.
(b) OSSE shall issue this grant no later than November 1, 2025.
SUBTITLE L. STRUCTURED LITERACY TEACHING TRAINING
REQUIREMENTS
Sec. 4111. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Structured Literacy Competency Requirement
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 4112. Section 4115 of the Structured Literacy Action Plan Act of 2022, effective
September 18, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-217; D.C. Official Code § 38-2264), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a)(1) is amended to read as follows:
“(a)(1) An LEA shall require each of its teachers to successfully complete an OSSE-
approved structured literacy training or to demonstrate competency in structured literacy
instruction within a year of the teacher’s hire or by the start of the school year identified in table
1 of this paragraph, whichever is later:
Table 1: Structured Literacy Competency Requirement Schedule
Teacher Grade Level School Year
Kindergarten 2026-2027
First 2027-2028
Second 2028-2029
Third 2029-2030
”.”
67

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “Year 2025-26, including summer 2026,” and insert
the phrase “Years 2025-2026 through 2029-2030, including summers,” in its place.
(B) Strike the phrase “kindergarten teachers” and insert the word
“teachers” in its place.
(C) Strike the phrase “literacy training” and insert the phrase “literacy
training and have not already done so” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “kindergarten teachers for
time” and inserting the phrase “kindergarten teachers, and, subject to the availability of funding,
all other teachers, for time” in its place.
(c) Subsection (d) is amended by striking the phrase “By April 1, 2026” and inserting the
phrase “Subject to available funding, by April 1, 2026” in its place.
(d) Subsection (e)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “by the start of the school year for
all kindergarten teachers employed as of October 5” and inserting the phrase “by October 5” in
its place.
SUBTITLE M. CERTIFIED NURSE AIDE WORKFORCE SUPPORT
Sec. 4121. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Certified Nurse Aide Workforce Support Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 4122. The State Education Office Establishment Act of 2000, effective October 21,
2000 (D.C. Law 13-176; D.C. Official Code § 38-2601 et seq.), is amended by adding a new
section 7l to read as follows:
“Sec. 7l. Certified nurse aide summer training program.
“(a) By August 30, 2026, OSSE shall provide $150,000 in one-time funding to a local
university, with whom it has an existing partnership agreement to train certified nurse aides, for
the purpose of training and supervising at least 25 District high school students in the summer to
become certified nurse aides, pursuant to section 907 of the District of Columbia Health
Occupations Revision Act of 1985, effective July 7, 2009 (D.C. Law 18-18; D.C. Official Code §
3-1209.07).
“(b) Students participating in the program shall be compensated at $17 per hour and shall
be paid from the funds authorized by this section.
“(c) OSSE and the university partner shall establish a plan to ensure that students who
complete the course and their clinical hours take the certified nurse aide certification exam
68

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
within 2 months of finishing the program, and that those students who earn their certified nurse
aide certification are connected with industry partners hiring certified nurse aides.”.
SUBTITLE N. DUAL-LANGUAGE FEASIBILITY STUDY
Sec. 4131. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Dual-Language Program Feasibility Study Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 4132. The Department of Education Establishment Act of 2007, effective June 12,
2007 (D.C. Law 17-9; D.C. Official Code 38-191 et seq.), is amended by adding a new section
203c to read as follows:
“Sec. 203c. Dual-language program feasibility study.
“(a) By January 1, 2026, the Deputy Mayor for Education (“DME”) shall complete a
feasibility study for the development and operation of a new dual-language education program or
dual-language education school, located in Ward 6, 7, or 8, and serving grades 6 through 8.
“(b) The study shall:
“(1) Consider the feasibility of:
“(A) Using the Winston Education Campus as a site for a dual-language
education program or a school that hosts a dual-language education program;
“(B) Embedding a dual-language education program into an existing
middle school in Ward 6, 7, or 8, including Kelly Miller Middle School, Kramer Middle School,
Sousa Middle School, and Jefferson Academy Middle School;
“(C) Utilizing the Shirley Chisholm Elementary School modernization to
establish a dual-language education campus at Shirley Chisholm Elementary School; and
“(D) Incorporating Ward 6, 7, and 8 dual-language education public
charter school elementary schools without an existing or nearby middle school feeder into a
District of Columbia Public Schools dual-language education program or middle school feeder
pattern;
“(2) Assess the feasibility of each option in paragraph (1) of this subsection based
on the following considerations:
“(A) Capital and operational costs;
“(B) Staffing requirements and models;
“(C) The transportation time of the students and families likely to attend
the new school or program;
“(D) The impact on enrollment patterns of the elementary and middle
schools in the proposed or existing feeder patterns; and
69

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(E) Enrollment trends of English learners, by in-boundary and out-of-
boundary status, to attend such a dual-language program or school;
“(3) Analyze the demand in Wards 7 and 8 for a dual-language education middle-
grade option, which shall include:
“(A) The number of students living in Wards 7 and 8 who attend a dual-
language elementary school in the District outside of those wards; and
“(B) The number of families living in Wards 7 and 8 waitlisted at dual-
language elementary schools in the District outside of those wards over the last 5 school years;
and
“(4) Propose timelines for implementing the 3 most feasible options for a dual-
language education program or school located in Ward 6, 7, or 8, serving grades 6 through 8.
“(c) For purposes of this section, the term “dual-language education” means a course of
study where students study grade-level content in English and another language, including
Spanish.”.
SUBTITLE O. COMMUNITY SCHOOLS GRANT PROGRAM
Sec. 4141. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Community Schools Grant Program Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 4142. Section 403 of the Community Schools Incentive Act of 2012, effective June
19, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-142; D.C. Official Code § 38-754.03), is amended by adding a new
subsection (h) to read as follows:
“(h) In Fiscal Year 2026, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education shall award
the Fiscal Year 2022 Community Schools Incentive Initiative grant recipients a fifth year of
grant funding and the Fiscal Year 2024 Community Schools Incentive Initiative grant recipients
a third year of grant funding totaling, for the 2 cohorts, the amount of $2,400,000.”.
SUBTITLE P. DCPS REPROGRAMMING LIMITATION
Sec. 4151. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “DCPS Reprogramming Limitation Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 4152. Section 4012 of the DCPS Contracting and Spending Flexibility Amendment
Act of 2016, effective October 8, 2016 (D.C. Law 21-160; D.C. Official Code § 38-2955), is
amended by adding a new subsection (d) that reads as follows:
70

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, DCPS shall not reprogram or reallocate
any funds appropriated to it for the purpose of providing permanent residency sponsorship
services for educators.”.
TITLE V. HUMAN SUPPORT SERVICES
SUBTITLE A. STATE HEALTH PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT AGENCY
Sec. 5001. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “State Health Planning and Development Agency
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5002. The Health Services Planning Program Re-establishment Act of 1996,
effective April 9, 1997 (D.C. Law 11-191; D.C. Official Code § 44-401 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 2(19) (D.C. Official Code § 44-401(19)) is amended by striking the phrase
“within the Commission of Public Health” and inserting the phrase “within the Department of
Health” in its place.
(b) Section 3(a)(1) (D.C. Official Code § 44-402(a)(1)) is amended to read as follows:
“(a)(1) There is established, in the Department, under the direction and control of the
Director of the Department, the State Health Planning and Development Agency.”.
(c) Section 21a (D.C. Official Code § 44-420.01) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the State Health Planning and Development
Agency Fund (“SHPDA Fund”), which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with
this section. All fees and civil fines relating to the SHPDA shall be deposited in the SHPDA
Fund.”.
(2) Subsection (b) is repealed.
(3) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) Money received by and deposited in the SHPDA Fund shall be used for the
following purposes:
“(1) To pay the salaries of employees and other necessary expenses of carrying
out the duties of the SHPDA; and
“(2) To the extent money is available in the SHPDA Fund in excess of the amount
necessary to pay for the costs described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, to pay salaries and
other expenses necessary in carrying out other health assessment, planning, and evaluation
functions of the Department.”.
(4) Subsection (d) is repealed.
(5) A new subsection (e) is added to read as follows:
71

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(e) Any money remaining available in the SHPDA Fund at the end of the fiscal year, as
determined by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the
unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal
year-end close.”.
SUBTITLE B. OFFICE OF THE OMBUDSPERSON FOR CHILDREN
Sec. 5011. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Office of the Ombudsperson for Children Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5012. Section 102 of the Office of the Ombudsperson for Children Establishment
Amendment Act of 2020, effective April 5, 2021 (D.C. Law 23-270; D.C. Official Code § 4-
671.02), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (c)(4) is amended by striking the phrase “the Chief Deputy Ombudsperson
shall” and inserting the phrase “the Deputy CFSA Ombudsperson shall” in its place.
(b) Subsection (d) is repealed.
SUBTITLE C. ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH FUNCTIONS
Sec. 5021. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Environmental Health Emergency Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 5022. Section 4902 of the Department of Health Functions Clarification Act of 2001,
effective October 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 14-28; D.C. Official Code § 7-731), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (3) is repealed.
(2) New paragraphs (3A), (3B), and (3C) are added to read as follows:
“(3A) Regulate medical waste;
“(3B) Regulate low-level radioactive waste;
“(3C) Regulate the following environmental health hazards in residential settings:
“(A) Indoor air, including smoke, noxious odors, and fumes; and
“(B) Pests, including rats, mice, and insects;”.
(b) A new subsection (a-2) is added to read as follows:
“(a-2) The Department of Health shall implement a lead-poisoning prevention program to
reduce lead exposure in children, pursuant to the Childhood Lead Poisoning Screening and
Reporting Act of 2002, effective October 1, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-190; D.C. Official Code § 7-
871.01 et seq.).”.
72

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 5023. The District Department of the Environment Establishment Act of 2005,
effective February 15, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-51; D.C. Official Code § 8-151.01 et seq.), is
amended as follows:
(a) Section 103 (D.C. Official Code § 8-151.03) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) The Department of Energy and Environment is established as an agency within the
executive branch of the government of the District of Columbia. DOEE shall be responsible for
the interpretation, administration, enforcement, and oversight of environmental laws, regulations,
and programs, whether involving public or private property, including laws, regulations, and
programs related to the following:
“(1) Air quality and resources;
“(2) Water quality and resources;
“(3) Watershed protection;
“(4) Stormwater;
“(5) Soil resources;
“(6) Hazardous wastes and toxic substances, except for medical waste and low-
level radioactive waste;
“(7) Pesticides;
“(8) Asbestos;
“(9) Underground storage tanks;
“(10) Aquatic and wildlife resources;
“(11) Lead hazard prevention and elimination, except for the Childhood Lead
Poisoning Screening and Reporting Act of 2002, effective October 1, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-190;
D.C. Official Code § 7-871.01 et seq.); and
“(12) To the extent it does not conflict with, or supersede, the urban forestry
functions of the District Department of Transportation, tree and forest policy related to
stormwater management, erosion and sediment control, and habitat and wildlife conservation and
restoration.”.
(2) Subsection (b) is repealed.
(b) Section 106(2) (D.C. Official Code § 8-151.06(2)) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) A Natural Resources and Water Quality Division to set policy, regulate
activities, and implement programs and initiatives to protect, restore, and enhance natural
resources and the environment, such as:
“(A) Conducting educational, outreach, and experiential programs and
activities that promote understanding and conservation of natural resources;
73

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) Implementing initiatives for greening neighborhoods through
community education and provision of materials;
“(C) Establishing tree, forest, and plant management policies, consistent
with section 103(a)(12), and implementing tree, forest, and plant protection and promotion
programs and activities;
“(D) Regulating stormwater management, soil erosion, and sedimentation;
“(E) Administering habitat, aquatic resources, and wildlife conservation
and restoration programs;
“(F) Regulating hazardous materials and toxic substances, excluding
medical waste and low-level radioactive waste;
“(G) Regulating underground storage tanks;
“(H) Administering lead-based paint abatement and control programs;
“(I) Regulating activities to prevent, control, and remediate water
pollution;
“(J) Regulating the wastewater and stormwater systems;
“(K) Conducting and coordinating research, outreach, and rehabilitation
efforts pertaining to the environment; and
“(L) Regulating activity and administering programs and initiatives to
conserve and enhance water quality in the District’s groundwater systems and in the waters of,
and adjacent to, the District;”.
(c) Section 110 (D.C. Official Code § 8-151.10) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “Mayor shall promulgate”
and inserting the phrase “Mayor may promulgate” in its place.
(2) Subsection (b) is repealed.
(d) Section 111 (D.C. Official Code § 8-151.11) is amended as follows:
(1) The existing text is designated as subsection (a).
(2) A new subsection (b) is added to read as follows:
“(b)(1) All functions, authority, programs, positions, personnel, property, records, and
unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or made available
to DOEE for the purposes of carrying out the following functions are transferred to the
Department of Health:
“(A) Childhood lead poisoning prevention program; and
“(B) Medical waste management.
“(2) All rules, orders, obligations, determinations, grants, contracts, licenses, and
agreements of the DOEE transferred to the Department of Health under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall continue in effect according to their terms until lawfully amended, repealed, or
modified.”.
74

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 5024. The Childhood Lead Poisoning Screening and Reporting Act of 2002,
effective October 1, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-190; D.C. Official Code § 7-871.01 et seq.), is amended
as follows:
(a) Section 102 (D.C. Official Code § 7-871.02) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) “Elevated blood lead level” shall have the same meaning as set forth in
section 2(13) of the Lead-Hazard Prevention and Elimination Act of 2008, effective March 31,
2009 (D.C. Law 17-381; D.C. Official Code § 8-231.01(13)).”.
(2) Paragraph (5) is amended to read as follows:
“(5) “Lead-poisoned child” means a child with an elevated blood lead level.”.
(b) Section 103 (D.C. Official Code § 7-871.03) is amended by adding a new subsection
(f-1) to read as follows:
“(f-1) The Mayor may, pursuant to section 106, issue rules to provide support to health
care providers in delivering appropriate care for the treatment of lead poisoning in children.”.
Sec. 5025. Section 101(27A) of the Retail Electric Competition and Consumer Protection
Act of 1999, effective May 9, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-107; D.C. Official Code § 34-1501(27A)), is
amended by striking the phrase “Columbia law that owns” and inserting the phrase “Columbia
law, or government entity, that owns” in its place.
Sec. 5026. Section 2(20) of the Lead-Hazard Prevention and Elimination Act of 2008,
effective March 31, 2009 (D.C. Law 17-381; D.C. Official Code § 8-231.01(20)), is amended by
striking the phrase “(0.7 µg/cm²)” and inserting the phrase “(0.7 mg/cm²)” in its place.
Sec. 5027. Section 128(11)(A) of the Sustainable Solid Waste Management Amendment
Act of 2014, effective March 16, 2021 (D.C. Law 23-211; D.C. Official Code § 8-
771.01(11)(A)), is amended by striking the phrase “who manufacturers a” and inserting the
phrase “who manufactures a” in its place.
Sec. 5028. Applicability.
(a) Section 5023(c) shall apply as of July 29, 2021.
(b) Section 5025 shall apply as of December 13, 2013.
(c) Sections 5026 and 5027 shall apply as of March 16, 2021.
SUBTITLE D. CASH ASSISTANCE COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENTS
Sec. 5031. Short title.
75

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This subtitle may be cited as the “Cash Assistance Cost of Living Adjustments
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5032. Section 552(d-1)(1) of the District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of
1982, effective April 6, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-101; D.C. Official Code § 4-205.52(d-1)(1)), is
amended as follows:
(a) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon
in its place.
(b) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “by 11.8%.” and inserting the
phrase “by 11.8%; and” in its place.
(c) A new subparagraph (D) is added to read as follows:
“(D) For Fiscal Years 2027, 2028, 2029, and 2030, the assistance level shall not be
adjusted for inflation.”.
SUBTITLE E. HEALTH CARE ALLIANCE
Sec. 5041. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “DC Health Care Alliance Reform Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5042. Section 2202 of the Medical Assistance Expansion Program Act of 1999,
effective October 20, 1999 (D.C. Law 13-38; D.C. Official Code § 1-307.03), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language is amended by striking the word “shall” and inserting the
word “may” in its place.
(2) The lead-in language of paragraph (5) is amended by striking the word “shall”
and inserting the word “may” in its place.
(b) Subsection (b) is repealed.
(c) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “subsections (a) and (b)” and
inserting the phrase “subsection (a)” in its place.
Sec. 5043. The Health Care Privatization Amendment Act of 2001, effective July 12,
2001 (D.C. Law 14-18; D.C. Official Code § 7-1401 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 7 (D.C. Official Code § 7-1405) is amended as follows:
(1) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) Effective October 1, 2025, the Mayor may, notwithstanding any other law:
76

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) Limit the services provided by the DC Healthcare Alliance program to
enrollees who are age 21 or older to such primary care services, inpatient and outpatient acute-
care hospital services, emergency medical transportation services, prescription drugs, and
durable medical equipment as may be designated by the Mayor; and
“(2) For enrollees under age 21:
“(A) Exclude home health services, nursing facility services, and services
provided by an inpatient psychiatric hospital from coverage under the program; and
“(B) Limit coverage by the program to such primary care, dental, durable
medical equipment, and behavioral health services as may be designated by the Mayor.”.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) A contract entered into by the Mayor pursuant to subsection (a) or (a-1) of this
section shall be exempt from the requirements of the Procurement Practices Reform Act of
2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-351.01 et seq.)
(“PPRA”); except, that the contract shall be subject to section 202 of the PPRA (D.C. Official
Code § 2-352.02).”.
(3) A new subsection (f) is added to read as follows:
“(f) The Mayor may establish by rule, pursuant to section 7a, a limit on the number of
District residents who may be served by a contract entered into, or program established under,
this section; provided, that the rules shall provide DC HealthCare Alliance program enrollees
with a 90-day grace period beyond the end of the enrollee’s certification period to complete any
renewal requirements and, if deemed eligible, retroactive coverage to the end of the prior
certification period without interruption.”.
(b) Sections 7b, 7c, and 7d (D.C. Official Code §§ 7-1407, 7-1408, and 7-1409) are
repealed.
Sec. 5044. Chapter 33 of Title 22-B of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations
(22-B DCMR § 3300.1 et seq.) is amended as follows:
(a) Section 3300.5 is amended to read as follows:
“3300.5 (a) All individuals applying for or enrolled in the Alliance program, with the exception
of individuals described in § 3300.4, shall meet the following financial and non-financial
eligibility factors:
“(1) Be a District resident pursuant to § 3302 of this Chapter;
“(2) Provide a Social Security Number (SSN), if assigned and available;
“(3) If aged twenty-one (21) or over:
“(A) Have a household income at or below:
“(i) Two hundred and ten percent (210%) of the Federal Poverty
Level (FPL), if the individual is enrolled on or before September 30, 2025;
77

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(ii) One hundred and thirty-three percent (133%) of the FPL, if
the individual is enrolled between October 1, 2025, and September 30, 2026; or
“(iii) Nineteen percent (19%) of the FPL, if the individual is
enrolled between October 1, 2026, and September 30, 2027; and
“(B) Not be eligible for, or enrolled in, Medicare, the Children’s Health
Insurance Program (CHIP), Medicaid, excluding eligibility for Medicaid payment for the
treatment of an emergency medical condition pursuant to 42 C.F.R. § 440.255, or enrolled in
other third party medical or health coverage that meets the requirements of minimum essential
coverage, as defined under 45 C.F.R. § 156.600;
“(4) If aged nineteen (19) or twenty (20):
“(A) Have a household income at or below two hundred and sixteen
percent (216%) of the FPL; and
“(B) Not be eligible for or enrolled in CHIP or Medicaid, excluding
eligibility for Medicaid payment for the treatment of an emergency medical condition pursuant
to 42 C.F.R. § 440.255; and
“(5) If aged eighteen (18) or below:
“(A) Have a household income at or below three hundred and nineteen
percent (319%) of the FPL; and
“(B) Not be eligible for or enrolled in CHIP or Medicaid, excluding
eligibility for Medicaid payment for the treatment of an emergency medical condition pursuant
to 42 C.F.R. § 440.255.
“(b) Effective October 1, 2027, residents aged twenty-one (21) or over will no longer be
eligible for application for or enrollment in the Alliance program; except as otherwise provided
in § 3309.
“(c) Income determinations under this section shall be subject to the income
determination requirements set forth under § 3304.”.
(b) Section 3301.13 is amended to read as follows:
“3301.13 Each Alliance program beneficiary shall submit an application for recertification with
the Department of Human Services:
“(1) In person;
“(2) Over the telephone; or
“(3) Through electronic means, including through a web-based portal.”.
(c) Section 3302 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection 3302.2 is amended by striking the phrase “accept any form” and
inserting the phrase “require at least two (2) forms” in its place.
(2) Subsections 3302.3 and 3302.4 are amended to read as follows:
78

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“3302.3 Acceptable forms of verification of residency (either copies or originals) shall be limited
to the following items in the name of the applicant:
“(a) An active lease, rental receipt, or rental agreement for real property located in the
District of Columbia;
“(b) A deed, settlement agreement, or mortgage statement for real property located in the
District of Columbia;
“(c) A telephone or utility bill (water, gas, electric, oil, cable, or landline telephone)
issued within the last sixty (60) days for real property located in the District of Columbia;
“(d) A non-expired, valid motor vehicle operator’s permit (or a non-driver identification
card) that is issued by the District’s Department of Motor Vehicles;
“(e) A pay stub or earning statement issued within the previous thirty (30) days with the
individual’s name and District of Columbia address;
“(f) A property tax bill issued within the last sixty (60) days for real property located in
the District of Columbia; and
“(g) Proof of enrollment in a District of Columbia public school.
“3302.4 The Department may consider exceptions to the residency verification requirement
established by §§ 3302.2 and 3302.3 for exceptional circumstances. Exceptional circumstances
shall include:
“(a) Homelessness;
“(b) Domestic violence;
“(c) Instances where a noncustodial parent refuses to release documentation germane to
verification of residency; and
“(d) Other exceptional circumstances as may be identified and approved on a case-by-
case basis by the Department.”.
(d) Section 3304.9 is amended by striking the phrase “is at or above the upper income
eligibility limit of two hundred ten percent (210%) of FPL” and inserting the phrase “is at or
above the upper income eligibility limit for the individual” in its place.
(e) A new section 3309 is added to read as follows:
“3309 MORATORIUM ON NEW ENROLLMENT; EXIT OF INDIVIDUALS
“3309.1 (a) Effective October 1, 2025, no individual aged twenty-six (26) or over shall be
eligible for new enrollment into the Alliance program.
“(b) An enrollee who newly enrolled in the Alliance program between October 1, 2025,
and September 30, 2026, and who turns twenty-six (26) between October 1, 2025, and
September 30, 2026, shall not be exited from the Alliance program until September 30, 2026.
“3309.2 Effective October 1, 2026, an individual aged twenty-one (21) to twenty-six (26) who
newly enrolled in the Alliance program between October 1, 2025, and September 30, 2026, shall
79

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
not be eligible for continued enrollment in the Alliance program and shall be exited from the
Alliance program.
“3309.3 Effective October 1, 2026, no individual aged twenty-one (21) or over shall be eligible
for new enrollment into the Alliance program.
“3309.4 Effective October 1, 2026, any individual enrolled in the Alliance program who turned
or will turn twenty-one (21) between October 1, 2025, and September 30, 2027, shall not be
eligible for continued enrollment in the Alliance program and shall be exited from the Alliance
program; provided, that no individual shall be exited from the Alliance program pursuant to this
subsection until the individual reaches the age of twenty-one (21).”.
SUBTITLE F. MEDICAL CANNABIS
Sec. 5051. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Medical Cannabis Emergency Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 5052. The Legalization of Marijuana for Medical Treatment Initiative of 1999,
effective February 25, 2010 (D.C. Law 13-315; D.C. Official Code § 7-1671.01 et seq.), is
amended as follows:
(a) Section 9(f)(3) (D.C. Official Code § 7-1671.08(f)(3)) is amended to read as follows:
“(3) Revenue collected from fines imposed pursuant to this subsection shall be
deposited in the General Fund of the District of Columbia.”.
(b) Sections 9b and 9c (D.C. Official Code §§ 7-1671.08b and 7-1671.08c) are repealed.
Sec. 5053. Section 8(d) of the Medical Cannabis Amendment Act of 2022, effective
March 22, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-332; D.C. Official Code § 7-1675.01(d)), is amended to read as
follows:
“(d) Revenue collected from fines imposed pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited
in the General Fund of the District of Columbia.”.
Sec. 5054. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 47-2002(a)(7) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “medical marijuana” and
inserting the phrase “medical cannabis” in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (B) is amended to read as follows:
“(B) In Fiscal Year 2026, the proceeds of the tax collected under
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall be deposited in the Healthy DC and Health Care
Expansion Fund established by § 31-3514.02; except, that all proceeds of such tax above the
80

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
amount certified for Fiscal Year 2026 in the approved Fiscal Year 2023 budget shall be
deposited in the General Fund of the District of Columbia.”.
(b) Section 47-2202(a) is amended by adding a new paragraph (6) to read as follows:
“(6)(A) The rate of tax shall be 6% of the gross receipts from the sale of or
charges for medical cannabis, as that term is defined in § 7-1671.01(12).
“(B) In Fiscal Year 2026, the proceeds of the tax collected under
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall be deposited in the Healthy DC and Health Care
Expansion Fund established by § 31-3514.02; except, that all proceeds of such tax above the
amount certified for Fiscal Year 2026 in the approved Fiscal Year 2023 budget shall be
deposited in the General Fund of the District of Columbia.”.
SUBTITLE G. TANF BENEFITS
Sec. 5061. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “District of Columbia Public Assistance Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5062. The District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982, effective April 6,
1982 (D.C. Law 4-101; D.C. Official Code § 4-201.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 511a (D.C. Official Code § 4-205.11a) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “Federally-funded TANF
benefits shall not be provided” and inserting the phrase “Except as provided in subsection (e) of
this section, federally funded TANF benefits shall not be provided” in its place.
(2) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) After an assistance unit that includes an adult has reached the 60-month limit set
forth in subsection (a) of this section or has received federally funded and District-funded TANF
benefits for 60 months (whether or not consecutive) after February 28, 1997, District-funded
TANF benefits shall be provided to the assistance unit in the reduced amounts set forth in section
552(c-4), except as provided in subsection (e) of this section.”.
(3) The lead-in language of subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase
“received federally-funded” and inserting the word “received” in its place.
(4) Subsection (d) is amended by striking the phrase “received federally funded”
and inserting the word “received” in its place.
(5) The lead-in language of subsection (e) is amended by striking the phrase
“requirements of subsection (a)” and inserting the phrase “restrictions imposed by subsections
(a) and (a-1)” in its place.
81

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(6) Subsection (f) is amended by striking the phrase “exempt under subsection
(e)” and inserting the phrase “exempted, under subsection (e) of this section, from the restrictions
imposed by subsection (a) of this section” in its place.
(7) A new subsection (f-1) is added to read as follows:
“(f-1) A monthly average of no more than 25% of the average monthly number of
assistance units for which District-funded TANF benefits are provided during the current fiscal
year or the prior fiscal year (as the Mayor may elect) may be exempted, under subsection (e) of
this section, from the restrictions imposed by subsection (a-1) of this section.”.
(b) Section 518(e) (D.C. Official Code § 4-205.18(e)) is amended by striking the phrase
“shall exceed 6%” and inserting the phrase “shall exceed 25%” in its place.
(c) Section 519f(g) (D.C. Official Code § 4-205.19f(g)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraphs (1) and (2) are repealed.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended to read as follows:
“(3) The Department of Human Services shall reduce an assistance unit’s TANF
benefit by 25% when a TANF recipient is found to be in noncompliance with this act or
regulations implementing this act.”.
(d) Section 552 (D.C. Official Code § 4-205.52) is amended by adding a new subsection
(c-4) to read as follows:
“(c-4) The level of District-funded TANF assistance paid to each assistance unit
receiving benefits under section 511a(a-1) shall be as follows:
“(1) For Fiscal Year 2027, 70% of the Fiscal Year 2026 amount;
“(2) For Fiscal Year 2028, 50% of the Fiscal Year 2026 amount;
“(3) For Fiscal Year 2029, 25% of the Fiscal Year 2026 amount; and
“(4) For Fiscal Year 2030 and thereafter, the level of assistance paid in Fiscal
Year 2029.”.
Sec. 5063. Applicability.
Section 5062 shall apply as of October 1, 2026.
SUBTITLE H. HEALTH OCCUPATION CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECKS
Sec. 5071. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Health Occupation Criminal Background Checks
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5072. Section 522(b) of the District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act
of 1985, effective March 6, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-222; D.C. Official Code § 3-1205.22(b)), is
amended as follows:
82

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) Strike the phrase “the Department of Health” both times it appears and insert the
phrase “the Mayor” in its place.
(b) Strike the phrase “directly to the appropriate health licensing board” and insert the
phrase “directly to the Mayor or to the appropriate health licensing board” in its place.
SUBTITLE I. BASIC HEALTH PROGRAMS
Sec. 5081. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Health Benefit Exchange Authority Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5082. The Health Benefit Exchange Authority Establishment Act of 2011, effective
March 2, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-94; D.C. Official Code § 31-3171.01 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 31-3171.01) is amended by adding a new paragraph
(2A) to read as follows:
“(2A) “Basic health program” means a program established pursuant to section
1331 of the Federal Act (42 U.S.C. § 18051).”.
(b) Section 5(a) (D.C. Official Code § 31-3171.04(a)) is amended by adding a new
paragraph (1A) to read as follows:
“(1A) Establish and operate a basic health program, established pursuant to
section 1331 of the Federal Act (42 U.S.C. § 18051);”.
SUBTITLE J. DIRECT CARE PROFESSIONAL PAYMENT RATES
Sec. 5091. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Direct Care Professional Payment Rate Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5092. The Direct Support Professional Payment Rate Act of 2020, effective April
16, 2020 (D.C. Law 23-77; D.C. Official Code § 4-2001 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 4-2002) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is repealed.
(2) A new subsection (c) is added to read as follows:
“(c) In Fiscal Year 2026, the reimbursement rate that the District shall pay to direct care
service providers for the provision of direct care services shall be the reimbursement rate that is
sufficient to support direct care service provider payments to direct care professionals at the
highest of the following rates:
83

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) 117.6% of the District living wage that was in effect on July 1, 2025,
pursuant to the Living Wage Act of 2006, effective June 8, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-118; D.C.
Official Code § 2-220.01 et seq.);
“(2) The current District minimum wage pursuant to section 4 of the Minimum
Wage Act Revision Act of 1992, effective March 25, 1993 (D.C. Law 9-248; D.C. Official Code
§ 32-1003); or
“(3) The current District living wage pursuant to the Living Wage Act of 2006,
effective June 8, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-118; D.C. Official Code § 2-220.01 et seq.).”.
(b) Section 4a (D.C. Official Code § 4-2003.01) is repealed.
(c) Section 5 (D.C. Official Code § 4-2004) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) It shall not be a violation of this act for a direct care service provider to pay a direct
care professional less than the amount set forth in section 3 if the direct care service provider
creates a tiered compensation schedule that:
“(1) Considers a direct care professional’s qualified experience in the field and
their demonstrated competency; and
“(2) Ensures that, on average, all direct care professionals were paid a wage equal
to the amount set forth in section 3.”.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “During Fiscal Year 2026 and each fiscal year
thereafter” and insert the phrase “During Fiscal Year 2026” in its place.
(B) Strike the phrase “is equal to at least the greater of either 117.6% of
the District minimum wage pursuant to section 4 of the Minimum Wage Act Revision Act of
1992, effective March 25, 1993 (D.C. Law 9-248; D.C. Official Code § 32-1003), or 117.6% of
the District living wage pursuant to the Living Wage Act of 2006, effective June 8, 2006 (D.C.
Law 16-118; D.C. Official Code § 2-220.01 et seq.),” and insert the phrase “is equal to at least
the amount set forth in section 3(c)” in its place.
SUBTITLE K. RAPID REHOUSING PROGRAMS
Sec. 5101. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Homeless Service Reform Emergency Amendment Act
of 2025”.
Sec. 5102. The Homeless Services Reform Act of 2005, effective October 22, 2005 (D.C.
Law 16-35; D.C. Official Code § 4-751.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 7 (D.C. Official Code § 4-753.01) is amended by adding a new subsection (b-
1) to read as follows:
84

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(b-1) Case management shall not be required for individuals or families determined to
be eligible for or participating in Rapid Re-Housing. Case management may be made available
to individuals or families participating in Rapid Re-Housing upon oral or written request, but no
individual or family shall be entitled to case management.”.
(b) A new section 22a-1 is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 22a-1. Discontinuation of services under a Rapid Re-Housing program.
“(a) Each client shall be exited from a Rapid Re-Housing program at the end of the time
limit for services under the program. The time limit for assistance under the program shall be
established by the Mayor by rule, but shall not be shorter than 12 months.
“(b) The Mayor may extend a client’s time limit for services in a Rapid Re-Housing
program beyond the time limit established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, pursuant to
subsection (e) of this section and procedures established by the Mayor by rule. If the Mayor
extends a client’s time limit pursuant to this subsection, the client shall be exited from the Rapid
Re-Housing program at the end of the extended time limit.
“(c) The provision for continuation of services under section 22b(c)(1) shall not apply to
a client who receives a notice of program exit from a Rapid Re-Housing program pursuant to
subsection (a) or (b) of this section on or after the effective date of the Fiscal Year 2026 Budget
Support Emergency Act of 2025, passed on emergency basis on July 28, 2025 (Enrolled version
of Bill 26-340) (“Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Support Emergency Act”).
“(d)(1) A client who received a notice of program exit from a Rapid Re-Housing program
before the effective date of the Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Support Emergency Act, when the exit
was due to the end of a time limit for services to the client under the program, shall be exited
from the Rapid Re-Housing program when the client’s time in the program reaches 24 months or
on September 30, 2025, whichever date is later.
“(2) A program exit provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall occur
regardless of the pendency of an administrative review, fair hearing, or other appeal in which the
client seeks to remain in the Rapid Re-Housing program beyond the client’s time limit for
services and notwithstanding any statutory provision requiring the continuation of services that
existed on or before the date the client received the notice of program exit.
“(e)(1) A determination of whether to consider a request to extend a client’s time limit for
services in a Rapid Re-Housing program need not be made on an individualized basis, and any
determination of whether to consider or grant a request to extend a client’s time limit for services
on the basis of the unavailability of funds shall be in the sole and absolute discretion of the
Director of the Department.
“(2) This subsection shall apply as of November 27, 2024.”.
(c) Section 22b(c)(2) (D.C. Official Code § 4-754.36b(c)(2)) is amended to read as
follows:
85

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not apply to an exit from a Rapid Re-
Housing program if the exit is due to the client reaching the time limit for services under the
program established pursuant to section 22(b)(a)(1).”.
SUBTITLE L. HEALTHY DC AND HEALTH CARE EXPANSION FUND
Sec. 5111. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Healthy DC and Health Care Expansion Fund
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5112. Section 15b(d) of the Hospital and Medical Services Corporation Regulatory
Act of 1996, effective March 2, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-192; D.C. Official Code § 31-3514.02(d)), is
amended by striking the phrase “fiscal years 2025, 2026,” and inserting the phrase “fiscal years
2026,” in its place.
Sec. 5113. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of September 18, 2024.
SUBTITLE M. DYRS PILOT PROGRAMS
Sec. 5121. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services Pilot
Programs Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5122. The Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services Establishment Act of 2004,
effective April 12, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-335; D.C. Official Code § 2-1515.01 et seq.), is amended
by adding a new section 104c to read as follows:
“Sec. 104c. Pilot Grant Programs.
“(a) Youth Pre-Apprenticeship Grant Pilot Program.
“(1) In Fiscal Year 2026, the Department shall establish a one-year pilot grant
program to provide pre-apprenticeship training services for youth detained at New Beginnings.
“(2) To be eligible to participate in the pilot program, an applicant shall:
“(A) Hold status in good standing as:
“(i) An accredited higher education institution;
“(ii) A 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization; or
“(iii) A prior or current provider of apprenticeship programming at
a Department Achievement Center; and
“(B) Have a demonstrated history of providing pre-apprenticeship training
or apprenticeship services for youth.
86

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3) The grant awardee shall provide participants with workforce skills training
and evidence-based instruction that:
“(A) Promotes targeted skills development in an in-demand industry
sector or occupation;
“(B) Is conducive to work and training in a safe environment in
accordance with applicable federal and District child labor laws; and
“(C) Enables participants to gain:
“(i) Postsecondary education credit, as applicable; or
“(ii) Access to an industry-recognized apprenticeship program, as
applicable, that:
“(I) Leads to a career in high-skill, high-wage, and in-
demand industry sectors and occupations in the local or regional labor market;
“(II) Pays wages to participants based on a progressively
increasing, clearly defined schedule of wages;
“(III) Provides participants with services to support their
persistence in and completion of the program;
“(IV) Provides collaborative professional development
services to workplace supervisors, mentors, teachers, counselors, and other staff to develop and
maintain a well-integrated, high-performing program; and
“(V) Provides individualized career counseling, counseling
about postsecondary education, or academic counseling.
“(4) Preference shall be made in favor of grant applicants:
“(A) Based within the District of Columbia or primarily serving residents
of the District of Columbia; and
“(B) With a demonstrated history of partnership with the District of
Columbia government, including receiving grant awards within the past 5 years, having current
or prior MOUs with a District agency within the past 5 years, or having entered into partnerships
with the Department of Employment Services.
“(5) Within 14 months of receiving a grant issued pursuant to this subsection, an
awardee shall submit to the Department and the Council a report that describes, at a minimum,
the:
“(A) Number of participants served, by age and Ward residence;
“(B) Services received by participants;
“(C) Outcomes by type of service rendered to participants;
“(D) Number of participants currently enrolled in postsecondary
education; and
87

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(E) Number of participants currently enrolled in apprenticeship
programs.
“(b) Youth Recidivism Reduction Grant Pilot Program.
“(1) In Fiscal Year 2026, the Department shall establish a one-year pilot grant
program to support youth re-entry services.
“(2) To be eligible to participate in the pilot program, an applicant shall hold
status in good standing as a:
“(A) 501(c)(3) non-profit organization;
“(B) Neighborhood Family Success Center; or
“(C) Other Department or Child and Family Services Agency grantee
within the past five years.
“(3) The grant shall fund projects that:
“(A) Provide the following aftercare and case management services,
including coordinating the delivery of services, to youth upon release from a Department secure
facility:
“(i) Housing assistance;
“(ii) Job training;
“(iii) Conflict resolution skills training;
“(iv) Assistance with coordination of school reenrollment and
credit transfer;
“(v) Access to out-of-school programming, including enrollment in
and transportation to afterschool activities;
“(vi) Mentorship programming; and
“(vii) Any such other services to address identified needs for the
purposes of preventing youth from committing further offenses; and
“(B) Include close coordination with the Department to implement aspects
of discharge and reentry plans described in D.C. Official Code § 16-2320(i).
“(4) Preference shall be granted to applicants:
“(A) Based in the District of Columbia or with a mission of primarily
serving residents of the District of Columbia; and
“(B) With a demonstrated history of partnership with the District of
Columbia government, including receiving District-funded grant awards within the past 5 years,
having current or prior MOUs with a District agency within the past 5 years, or entering into
partnerships with the Department within the past 5 years.
“(5) Within 14 months of receiving a grant issued pursuant to this subsection, a
recipient shall submit to the Department and the Council a report that describes, at a minimum:
“(A) The number of youth served, by age and Ward residence;
88

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) The services received by participants;
“(C) Outcomes by type of service rendered to participants;
“(D) The number of school-aged participants who are enrolled in school or
a GED program;
“(E) The number of non-school-aged participants who are enrolled in
postsecondary education; and
“(F) The number of non-school-aged participants who are employed full
or part time.
“(6) Within 14 months of issuing any grant pursuant to this subsection, the
Department shall submit to the Office of the Attorney General and the Council committee with
jurisdiction over the Department a report disclosing for each youth participant any known
involvement with law enforcement or return to Department custody during the duration of the
grant period, subject to juvenile confidentiality laws.”.
SUBTITLE N. CHILD SUPPORT REFORM
Sec. 5131. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Child Support Reform Emergency Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 5132. The District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982, effective April 6, 1982
(D.C. Law 4-101; D.C. Official Code § 4-201.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 511(a)(8) (D.C. Official Code § 4-205.11(a)(8)) is amended by striking the
semicolon and inserting the phrase “, and beginning on October 1, 2025, disregard the full current
monthly child support obligations and voluntary child support payments the assistance unit
receives from an absent parent or spouse;” in its place.
(b) Section 519(c)(5) (D.C. Official Code § 4-205.19(c)(5)) is amended by striking the
period and inserting the phrase “and beginning on October 1, 2025, shall not apply to up to the
first $200 received that represents such an obligation or payment.”.
SUBTITLE O. TRUANCY PILOT EXPANSION
Sec. 5141. This subtitle may be cited as the “Truancy Pilot Expansion Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5142. Section 7 of Article II of An Act To provide for compulsory school
attendance, for the taking of a school census in the District of Columbia, and for other purposes,
effective September 19, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-17; D.C. Official Code § 38-208), is amended as
follows:
89

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) New subsections (c-1) and (c-2) are added to read as follows:
“(c-1)(1)(A) By August 12, 2024, the Mayor shall identify 5 secondary educational
institutions in the District that had a truancy rate greater than 50% in the 2023-2024 school year
to participate in a truancy pilot with the Department of Human Services (“DHS”) during School
Year 2024-2025.
“(B) The Mayor shall notify the identified educational institutions of their
participation in the truancy pilot at least 10 business days before the first day of instruction in
School Year 2024-2025. The notice shall include appropriate agency contacts, timelines, and
procedures for complying with paragraph (2) of this subsection.
“(2) The 5 secondary educational institutions identified pursuant to paragraph (1)
of this subsection shall refer each student who is 14 years of age through 17 years of age to DHS
no later than 2 school days after the accrual of 15 unexcused full school day absences within a
school year.
“(3) By March 31, 2025, DHS shall publish a preliminary report, and by
September 30, 2025, DHS shall publish a final report that:
“(A) Describes the interventions and services provided through the
truancy pilot;
“(B) Provides the 5 most common reasons for unexcused absences for the
students referred to DHS, such as housing instability, transportation issues, or medical
emergencies;
“(C) Presents aggregate data on the 5 most common truancy intervention
services or programs that students referred to DHS utilized; and
“(D) Provides an analysis that compares:
“(i) The attendance outcomes, academic performance, and
delinquency status of students referred to DHS to the students’ attendance outcomes, academic
performance, and delinquency status during the same time period in the prior school year;
“(ii) The attendance outcomes, academic performance, and
delinquency status of students referred to DHS before and after the DHS referral during the
applicable time period for School Year 2024-2025; and
“(iii) The attendance outcomes and academic performance of
educational institutions participating in the truancy pilot with the attendance and academic
performance during School Year 2024-2025 of non-participating secondary educational
institutions that are socio-demographically similar to participating educational institutions.
“(4) Educational institutions participating in the truancy pilot shall be exempt
from the requirements of subsection (c) of this section for minor students who are 14 through 17
years of age.
90

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c-2)(1)(A) By August 13, 2025, the Mayor shall identify no fewer than 10 educational
institutions in the District, with students enrolled in any grade 6 through 12, that had a truancy
rate greater than 35% in the 2024-2025 school year to participate in a truancy pilot with DHS
during School Year 2025-2026. The identified educational institutions shall include at least one
middle school and the 5 secondary educational institutions identified in subsection (c-1)(1)(A) of
this section.
“(B) The Mayor shall notify the identified educational institutions of their
participation in the truancy pilot at least 10 business days before the first day of instruction in
School Year 2025-2026. The notice shall include appropriate agency contacts, timelines, and
procedures for complying with paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection.
“(2) The educational institutions identified pursuant to paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall refer each student who is 14 years of age through 17 years of age to DHS no
later than 2 school days after the accrual of 15 unexcused full school day absences within a
school year.
“(3) The educational institutions identified pursuant to paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall refer each student who is 10 years of age through 13 years of age to DHS no
later than 2 school days after the accrual of 10 unexcused full school day absences within a
school year.
“(4) DHS shall refer to the Child and Family Services Agency any student
referred under paragraph (3) whose parent has not responded to DHS outreach within 10
business days after that outreach or has declined services.
“(5) By March 31, 2026, DHS shall publish a preliminary report, and by
September 30, 2026, DHS shall publish a final report that:
“(A) Describes the interventions and services provided through the
truancy pilot;
“(B) Provides the 5 most common reasons for unexcused absences for the
students referred to DHS, such as housing instability, transportation issues, or medical
emergencies;
“(C) Presents aggregate data on the 5 most common truancy intervention
services or programs that students referred to DHS utilized;
“(D) Provides the number of families referred to the Child and Family
Services Agency as required by paragraph (4) of this subsection;
“(E) Provides an analysis that compares:
“(i) The attendance outcomes, academic performance, and
delinquency status of students referred to DHS to his or her attendance outcomes, academic
performance, and delinquency status during the same time period in the prior school year;
91

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(ii) The attendance outcomes, academic performance, and
delinquency status of students referred to DHS before and after the DHS referral during the
applicable time period for School Year 2025-2026; and
“(iii) The attendance outcomes and academic performance of
educational institutions participating in the truancy pilot with the attendance and academic
performance during School Year 2025-2026 of non-participating secondary educational
institutions that are socio-demographically similar to participating educational institutions; and
“(F) Provides any other information DHS deems useful to the report.
“(6) Educational institutions participating in the truancy pilot shall be exempt
from the requirements of subsection (c) of this section.”.
(b) New subsections (e) and (f) are added to read as follows:
“(e)(1) Notwithstanding any other law, upon the request of DHS, the Metropolitan Police
Department (“MPD”) shall provide DHS with information about the delinquency status of
students attending schools participating in the truancy pilots described in subsections (c-1) and
(c-2) of this section, which DHS deems necessary for it to meet the reporting requirements of
those subsections.
“(2) DHS and MPD may enter into an agreement for the purposes of sharing and
protecting information related to students’ delinquency status.
“(3) Information MPD shares with DHS pursuant to this subsection shall be
exempt from the disclosure requirements of the Freedom of Information Act of 1976, effective
March 29, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-531 et seq.).
“(f) For the purposes of this section, the term “delinquency status” means whether a
minor student was arrested by a law enforcement official during the time period analyzed in the
relevant report.”.
Sec. 5143. Section 204(a) of the Freedom of Information Act of 1976, effective March
29, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-534(a)), is amended by adding a new
paragraph (24) to read as follows:
“(24) Information exempt from disclosure under section 7(e)(3) of Article II of
An Act To provide for compulsory school attendance, for the taking of a school census in the
District of Columbia, and for other purposes, effective September 19, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-17;
D.C. Official Code § 38-208(e)(3)).”.
Sec. 5144. Repealer.
The Pilot Truancy Reduction Temporary Amendment Act of 2025, enacted on July 7,
2025 (D.C. Act 26-102; 72 DCR 7686), is repealed.
92

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 5145. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of the effective date of the Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Support
Emergency Act of 2025, passed on emergency basis on July 28, 2025 (Enrolled version of Bill
26-340).
SUBTITLE P. DC HEALTH LICENSURE PATHWAYS
Sec. 5151. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Department of Health Licensure Pathways Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5152. The Department of Health Functions Clarification Act of 2001, effective
October 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 14-28; D.C. Official Code § 7-731 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) The second section 4907d is redesignated as section 4907e.
(b) A new section 4907f is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 4907f. Licensure pathways program.
“(a) Beginning on October 1, 2025, the Department of Health shall establish and
administer a licensure pathways program (“program”) for the purpose of assisting internationally
trained health professionals in obtaining the licensure and credentials necessary to practice in the
District.
“(b) The program shall provide:
“(1) Guidance on the licensure application process;
“(2) Information on examinations, educational requirements, and training
requirements;
“(3) Assistance with accessing resources for language support and exam
preparation; and
“(4) Any other services the Department of Health deems necessary.”.
SUBTITLE Q. GROCERY ACCESS PILOT PROGRAM
Sec. 5161. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Grocery Access Pilot Program Establishment
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5162. Section 4907d of the Department of Health Functions Clarification Act of
2001, effective September 18, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-217; D.C. Official Code § 7-736.04), is
amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
93

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(a) In Fiscal Years 2025 and 2026, the Department of Health shall establish a grocery
access pilot grant program for the purpose of providing up to 1,000 eligible District residents
with membership to a grocery delivery service at no cost for 2 years.”.
(b) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “one-year” and inserting the phrase
“2-year” in its place.
SUBTITLE R. SCHOOL-BASED BEHAVIORAL HEALTH STRENGTHENING
Sec. 5171. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “School-Based Behavioral Health Program
Strengthening Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5172. Section 115b of the Department of Mental Health Establishment Amendment
Act of 2001, effective June 7, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-141; D.C. Official Code § 7-1131.17), is
amended by adding subsections (f) and (g) to read as follows:
“(f)(1) In Fiscal Year 2026, the Department shall, pursuant to the Grant Administration
Act of 2013, effective December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et
seq.), award grants to community-based organizations for the operation of the program at not less
than $120,000 per school-based clinician; provided, that the total amount of grants awarded
under this subsection shall be not less than $16,320,000; provided further, that the Department
shall prioritize applicants who previously provided school-based behavioral health services in
School Years 2023-2024 or 2024-2025.
“(2) The Department shall not:
“(A) Require that any portion of the grant be restricted to supervision
expenses;
“(B) Prohibit the use of any portion of the grant materials for general or
specialized therapy for children;
“(C) Condition the disbursement of grant funds on a minimum total billing
requirement under the program that exceeds $15,000; or
“(D) Decrease the grant amount based on reported insurance claims billed
or paid for services provided as part of the program.
“(3) A grantee shall report to the Department on activities, services provided, and
individuals served in a manner and form to be prescribed by the Department; provided, that the
report shall include the salary information for each clinician and supervisor funded by the
program, including the employee’s salary from the previous 2 school years.
“(g) By October 15, 2025, the Department shall submit to the Council and the Mayor a
comprehensive plan outlining the Department’s strategy for strengthening and improving the
program, which shall include:
94

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) An overview of the strategic vision for the program, including a description
of how the program will align with a public health approach to prevention, early intervention,
and treatment in public and public charter schools;
“(2) A summary of findings from an environmental scan of behavioral health
resources in public and public charter schools, and an explanation of how this data will inform
school assignments, staffing models, and risk-based resource allocation;
“(3) A billing and funding sustainability strategy, including an assessment of the
current program funding model, proposed changes to the community-based organization
clinician subsidy structure, and specific actions the Department will take to identify and remove
barriers to Medicaid and private-insurance billing, support provider compliance, and promote the
long-term financial sustainability of school-based services;
“(4) A detailed evaluation of all pilot programs implemented by the Department
in Fiscal Years 2023, 2024, and 2025, including analysis of outcomes, challenges, and lessons
learned to inform future program design;
“(5) A workforce development strategy, including a plan to address supervision
needs, clinician licensure levels, recruitment and retention challenges, the incorporation of non-
licensed staff, professional development opportunities for Department and community-based
organization clinicians, and an evaluation of the current staffing model, including the
Department clinicians compared to clinicians employed through grant-funded partnerships with
community-based organizations;
“(6) An integration framework for behavioral-health and school-health services,
developed in consultation with the Department of Health, to support collaboration between
school-based behavioral-health clinicians and public-school and public-charter-school nurses;
“(7) A review of performance metrics, curriculum standards, and quality
assurance protocols for clinicians assigned to public and public charter schools, with proposed
updates to strengthen accountability and service delivery outcomes;
“(8) An assessment of the need for, and feasibility of, a common electronic health
record platform or data-sharing interface between the Department and its contracted providers to
support documentation, billing, and care coordination;
“(9) A summary of input received from Department clinicians and community-
based organization employed clinicians, including feedback on service-delivery challenges and
recommendations for program improvement;
“(10) A proposed structure and function for the program’s advisory council,
including any changes to membership, scope, and meeting frequency to ensure the advisory
council can effectively support implementation and accountability;
“(11) A plan for how the Department will support the creation and maintenance of
a comprehensive inventory of behavioral health resources in public and public charter schools,
95

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
pursuant to section 4902b of the Department of Health Functions Clarifications Act of 2001,
effective March 7, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-279; D.C. Official Code § 7-731.02), and the Healthy
Schools Act of 2010, effective July 27, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-209; D.C. Official Code § 38-821.01
et seq.), by partnering with school behavioral health coordinators to identify resource gaps and
guide resource allocation and development; and
“(12) A timeline and implementation plan, including short- and long-term actions,
milestones, responsible parties, and any budgetary or legislative changes needed to support
improvements to the program.”.
SUBTITLE S. SUBSTANCE USE AND BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES
TARGETED OUTREACH PILOT
Sec. 5181. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Substance Use and Behavioral Health Services
Targeted Outreach Grant Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5182. Fiscal Year 2026 substance use and behavioral health services targeted
outreach pilot.
(a) By October 31, 2025, the Department Behavioral Health (“DBH”) shall award grants
to 501(c)(3) not-for-profit organizations with experience in substance use harm reduction
services to provide direct support, relationship development, and resource brokering to
individuals in need of substance use and behavioral health services at the locations and in the
amounts as follows:
(1) $800,000 from the Opioid Abatement Fund, pursuant to section 5012(b-6)(1)
of the Opioid Abatement Fund Establishment Act of 2022, effective September 21, 2022 (D.C.
Law 24-167; D.C. Official Code § 7-3221(b-6)(1)), for:
(A) The vicinity of the 600 block of T Street, NW;
(B) The vicinity of the of the 1300-1700 blocks of North Capitol Street,
NW, and 1600-1700 blocks of Lincoln Road, NE;
(C) The vicinity of the 3800-4000 blocks of Minnesota Avenue, NE; and
(D) The vicinity of the 1300-1800 blocks of Marion Barry Avenue, SE;
and
(2) $200,000 for the vicinity of the King Greenleaf Recreation Center, located at
201 N Street, SW.
(b) By October 31, 2025, DBH shall award a grant in the amount of $750,000 to an
organization to provide direct support, relationship development, and resource brokering to
individuals at the following locations:
(1) Columbia Heights Civic Plaza;
96

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(2) The intersection of Mount Pleasant Street, NW, and Kenyon Street, NW;
(3) Georgia Avenue, NW, between New Hampshire Avenue, NW, and Harvard
Street, NW; and
(4) U Street, NW, between 14th Street, NW, and Georgia Avenue, NW.
(c) By November 30, 2026, each not-for-profit organization awarded a grant pursuant to
subsections (a) and (b) of this section (“grantee”) shall submit a report to DBH, which shall
include the following information, broken down by location:
(1) The number of individuals or groups the grantee engaged through outreach
efforts;
(2) The number of individuals the grantee connected to substance use disorder
treatment programs, primary healthcare, mental health services, housing assistance, employment
support, or other services;
(3) The number of overdose reversals or interventions performed by the grantee
using naloxone or other overdose reversal medications;
(4) The amount of harm reduction supplies distributed by the grantee, including
clean needles, syringes, naloxone kits, condoms, or other materials that reduce the risks
associated with drug use; and
(5) The number of educational sessions, workshops or prevention activities
delivered by the grantee to target populations.
(d) Within 30 days of receiving the report described in subsection (c) of this section,
DBH shall submit the report to the Council and publicly post the report on its website.
(e) For the locations specified in subsection (a) of this section, DBH shall award a grant
to the same organizations that received grants to provide these services under the Department of
Behavioral Health Targeted Outreach Grants Act of 2023, effective September 6, 2023 (D.C.
Law 25-50; D.C. Official Code § 7-1141.01, note).
SUBTITLE T. OPIOID ABATEMENT AMENDMENTS
Sec. 5191. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Opioid Abatement Directed Funding and Opioid
Abatement Advisory Commission Structure Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5192. Section 5012 of the Opioid Abatement Fund Establishment Act of 2022,
effective September 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-167; D.C. Official Code § 7-3221), is amended by
adding a new subsection (b-6) to read as follows:
“(b-6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subtitle, in Fiscal Year 2026 a total of
$2,107,000 from the Fund shall be used for the following purposes:
97

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) $800,000 to implement the Substance Use and Behavioral Health Services
Targeted Outreach Grant Emergency Act of 2025, passed on emergency basis on July 28, 2025
(Enrolled version of Bill 26-340), at the following locations:
“(A) The vicinity of the 600 block of T Street, NW;
“(B) The vicinity of the of the 1300-1700 blocks of North Capitol Street,
NW, and the 1600-1700 blocks of Lincoln Road, NE;
“(C) The vicinity of the 3800-4000 blocks of Minnesota Avenue, NE; and
“(D) The vicinity of the 1300-1800 blocks of Marion Barry Avenue, SE;
“(2) $400,000 to the Office of the Chief Medical Officer for the purpose of
enabling the testing of illicit drug misuse and the development of novel testing methods for
opioids within the agency’s Forensic Toxicology Lab and Data Fusion Center; and
“(3) $907,000 to the Department of Behavioral Health to implement section
5117a of the Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act of 2013, effective September
18, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-217; D.C. Official Code § 7-1141.06a).”.
Sec. 5193. Section 102 of the Opioid Litigation Proceeds Amendment Act of 2022,
effective March 10, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-315; D.C. Official Code § 7-3212), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsections (c) and (d) are amended to read as follows:
“(c) The Commission shall be composed of 15 members as follows:
“(1) The Director of the Department of Health, or their designee;
“(2) The Director of the Department of Behavioral Health, or their designee;
“(3) The Attorney General, or their designee;
“(4) The Director of the Department of Health Care Finance, or their designee;
“(5) The Chairperson of the Council committee with jurisdiction over health
matters, or their designee;
“(6) Three members appointed by the Mayor, with the following qualifications:
“(A) One member who is a current opioid user or who has lived
experience with opioid use disorder and co-occurring mental health or substance use disorders
and recovery;
“(B) One member with expertise in either public health policy, public
health research, or health equity with a demonstrated understanding of opioid use, harm
reduction, treatment, and recovery systems; and
“(C) One member who has provided direct treatment services related to
prevention, harm reduction, substance use disorder, or recovery, with a preference for individuals
who have worked with populations disproportionately impacted by the opioid crisis, including
Black residents, unhoused individuals, and justice-involved populations;
98

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(7) Three members appointed by the Chairman of the Council, with the
following qualifications:
“(A) One member who is a current opioid user or who has lived
experience with opioid use disorder and co-occurring mental health or substance use disorders
and recovery;
“(B) One member with expertise in addiction medicine and co-occurring
substance use, and mental health disorders; and
“(C) One member who has provided direct treatment services related to
prevention, harm reduction, substance use disorder, or recovery, with a preference for individuals
who have worked with populations disproportionately impacted by the opioid crisis, including
Black residents, unhoused individuals, and justice-involved populations; and
“(8) One representative from the District of Columbia Behavioral Health
Association;
“(9) One representative from the Medical Society of the District of Columbia;
“(10) One representative from the District of Columbia Primary Care Association;
and
“(11) One representative from the District of Columbia Hospital Association.
“(d)(1) The Commission shall elect a Chair or Co-Chairs from among its members, who
shall serve for a term of 2 years and may be appointed to no more than 2 consecutive terms.
“(2) The Commission shall consider the following qualifications in electing a
Chair or Co-Chair:
“(A) Demonstrated experience leading commissions, advisory bodies,
boards, task forces, or large stakeholder groups;
“(B) Ability to facilitate meetings, manage group processes, and foster
collaboration and consensus across sectors;
“(C) Experience collaborating with District government agencies; and
“(D) A preference that at least one Co-Chair, if applicable, be a person
with lived experience related to substance use disorder or a representative of a non-governmental
organization engaged in prevention, treatment, recovery, or harm reduction.”.
(b) The lead-in language of subsection (e)(1) is amended to read as follows:
“(e)(1) Each member appointed pursuant to subsection (c)(6) and (7) of this section shall
serve a 3-year term; except, that:”.
(c) A new subsection (g-1) is added to read as follows:
“(g-1) The Commission shall regularly engage with, and seek input from, the following
agencies to support informed decision-making and to ensure that the Commission’s work aligns
with District-wide policies, programs, and service-delivery efforts:
“(1) The Deputy Mayor for Health and Human Services;
99

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(2) The Deputy Mayor for Public Safety and Justice;
“(3) The Director of the Department of Human Services; and
“(4) The Chief Medical Examiner.”.
(d) Subsection (h)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “operations;” and inserting the
phrase “operations, including establishing expert driven subcommittees;” in its place.
Sec. 5194. Section 5117a(a) of the Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act
of 2013, effective September 18, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-217; D.C. Official Code § 7-1141.06a(a)),
is amended by striking the phrase “in Fiscal Year 2025” and inserting the phrase “in Fiscal Years
2025 and 2026” in its place.
SUBTITLE U. LONG-TERM CARE STRATEGIC COORDINATOR
Sec. 5201. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Long-Term Care Strategic Coordinator Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5202. The Study of Long-Term Care Facilities and Long-Term Care Services Act of
2018, effective March 13, 2019 (D.C. Law 22-238; D.C. Official Code § 7-681 et seq.), is
amended by adding a new section 3a to read as follows:
“Sec. 3a. Long-Term Care Strategic Coordinator.
“There is established within the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Health and Human
Services (“DMHHS”) the position of the Long-Term Care Strategic Coordinator
(“Coordinator”), who shall be a full-time employee of the District. By January 1, 2026, the
Coordinator shall be responsible for:
“(1) Coordinating the Age-Friendly DC program;
“(2) Tracking the long-term care services provided by agencies under the purview
of DMHHS (“health agencies”);
“(3) Using data to develop a strategy to improve and increase the capacity of the
long-term care services workforce to meet the District’s needs;
“(4) Identifying points of contact within each relevant agency outside of the
health agencies, including the Deputy Mayor for Education and the Department for Aging and
Community Living, to avoid duplication of work across agencies and to ensure each agency’s
work aligns with the broader mission of supporting the District’s aging population and long-term
care workforce; and
“(5) Carrying out other duties relevant to support the long-term care workforce as
may be identified and assigned by DMHHS.”.
100

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
SUBTITLE V. HEALTH CARE AND PUBLIC BENEFITS OMBUDSMAN
Sec. 5211. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Health Care and Public Benefits Ombudsman Program
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5212. The Health Care Ombudsman Program Establishment Act of 2004, effective
April 12, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-331; D.C. Official Code § 7-2071.01 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 7-2071.01) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and
inserting a semicolon in its place.
(B) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; or” in its place.
(C) A new subparagraph (C) is added to read as follows:
“(C) An individual applying for, or receiving public benefits, in the
District.”.
(2) New paragraphs (3A) and (3B) are added to read as follows:
“(3A) “DHCF” means the Department of Health Care Finance.
“(3B) “DHS” means the Department of Human Services.”.
(3) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the phrase “Health Care Ombudsman”
both times it appears and inserting the phrase “Health Care and Public Benefits Ombudsman” in
its place.
(4) Paragraph (7) is amended to read as follows:
“(7) “Health Care and Public Benefits Ombudsman Program” or “Ombudsman
Program” means the program established by the District to counsel and assist:
“(A) Uninsured District residents and individuals insured by health
benefits plans in the District regarding matters pertaining to their health care coverage; and
“(B) Individuals applying for or receiving public benefits in the District
regarding matters pertaining to their public benefits coverage including those adversely impacted
by a public benefits determination.”.
(5) A new paragraph (9) is added to read as follows:
“(9) “Public benefits” means a program administered by the Economic Security
Administration of DHS, including the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (“SNAP”)
and Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (“TANF”) program.”.
(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 7-2071.02) is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
101

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“Sec. 3. Establishment of the Health Care and Public Benefits Ombudsman Program.”.
(2) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “The Department shall establish the Health Care
Ombudsman Program” and insert the phrase “DHCF shall establish the Health Care and Public
Benefits Ombudsman Program” in its place.
(B) Strike the phrase “If the Department” and insert the phrase “If DHCF”
in its place.
(C) Strike the phrase “the Department shall operate” and insert the phrase
“DHCF shall operate” in its place.
(3) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b)(1) The Ombudsman Program shall be administered by the Health Care and Public
Benefits Ombudsman, who shall be appointed by the Deputy Mayor of Health and Human
Services, and who shall be an individual with management experience and substantive
experience in the fields of health care, health benefits plans, health care advocacy, or public
benefits program and advocacy.
“(2) Unless DHCF is operating the program, the Health Care and Public Benefits
Ombudsman shall be an employee of the nonprofit corporation, organization, or consortia of
organizations selected by DHCF to operate the program.”.
(4) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “The Department” and
inserting the word “DHCF” in its place.
(5) The lead-in language of subsection (e) is amended by striking the phrase “The
Department” and inserting the word “DHCF” in its place.
(c) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 7-2071.03) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “The Department” and
inserting the word “DHCF” in its place.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) The lead in language of paragraph (1) is amended by striking the
phrase “The Department” and inserting the word “DHCF” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “The Department”
and inserting the word “DHCF” in its place.
(d) Section 5 (D.C. Official Code § 7-2071.04) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) Assist consumers in resolving problems concerning health care bills, health
coverage, access to health care, and public benefits by referring consumers to appropriate
regulatory agencies when their problems are within an agency’s jurisdiction, guiding consumers
through existing complaint and appeal processes, and assisting consumers in informally
102

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
resolving problems through discussions with their public benefits programs and health benefits
plans, the HealthCare Alliance, or other providers;”.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “health benefits plan
members” and inserting the phrase “public benefits applicants and recipients, health benefits plan
members” in its place.
(3) A new paragraph (3A) is added to read as follows:
“(3A) Educate consumers about the District’s public benefits programs and
options;”.
(4) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “health care” and inserting the
phrase “health care or public benefits” in its place.
(5) A new paragraph (5A) is added to read as follows:
“(5A) Help District residents access public benefits options;”.
(6) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the phrase “Medicaid consumers” and
inserting the phrase “Medicaid and public benefits consumers” in its place.
(7) Paragraph (8) is amended by striking the phrase “health care providers” and
inserting the phrase “health care providers, consumer advocacy organizations, and legal service
providers” in its place.
(8) Paragraph (9) is amended to read as follows:
“(9) Make appropriate referrals, including to the Department of Insurance,
Securities, and Banking, the Office of Fair Hearings in the Department of Health Care Finance,
the Office of Administrative Hearings, the Grievance and Appeals Office of the Department of
Health, Health Care Fraud Units, the Long-Term Care Ombudsman, the Health Insurance
Counseling and Assistance Program serving District Medicare beneficiaries, the Center for
Health Dispute Resolution, and the Office of Program Review, Monitoring, and Investigation;
and”.
(e) Section 7 (D.C. Official Code § 7-2071.06) is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 7. Data collection and reporting.
“The Health Care and Public Benefits Ombudsman shall submit annually to the Council,
the Mayor, the Department of Health, DHS, DHCF, and the Department of Insurance, Securities,
and Banking a report on the activities, performance, and fiscal accounts of the Ombudsman
program, issues of concern to consumers, challenges with the District Access System, and the
Ombudsman’s recommendations to improve health and public benefits access. The report shall
be available to the public through the Ombudsman’s website.”.
(f) Section 8 (D.C. Official Code § 7-2071.07) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “Health Care Ombudsman” and insert the phrase
“Health Care and Public Benefits Ombudsman” in its place.
103

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(B) Strike the phrase “medical records” and insert the phrase “medical
records, or records pertaining to the consumer’s public benefits,” in its place.
(2) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “Health Care Ombudsman”
and inserting the phrase “Health Care and Public Benefits Ombudsman” in its place.
(3) Subsection (d) is amended by striking the phrase “The Department” and
inserting the word “DHCF” in its place.
(g) Section 11 (D.C. Official Code § 7-2071.10) is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 11. Requirements for health benefits plans, HealthCare Alliance, and the
Department of Human Services.”.
(2) A new subsection (c) is added to read as follows:
“(c) DHS shall display prominently on its website, in all public benefits applications, in
all official materials conveying information about public benefits, and in each of its service
centers, a notice of information regarding the availability of, and services provided by, the
Ombudsman Program, including the Ombudsman Program’s telephone number, email address,
and website.”.
(h) Section 12(a) (D.C. Official Code § 7-2071.11(a)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the phrase “
and legal service providers, including at least one organization with a focus on public benefits;”
in its place.
(2) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(3) Paragraph (8) is amended by striking the period and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
(4) New paragraphs (9) and (10) are added to read as follows:
“(9) DHS; and
“(10) DHCF.”.
(i) Section 13 (D.C. Official Code § 7-2071.12) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a)(2) is amended by striking the word “Medicaid” and inserting
the phrase “Medicaid and other available” in its place.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “Health Care Ombudsman”
and inserting the phrase “Health Care and Public Benefits Ombudsman” in its place.
SUBTITLE W. DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES GRANT
Sec. 5221. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “DHS Grant Emergency Act of 2025”.
104

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 5222. Notwithstanding the Grant Administration Act of 2013, effective December
24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.), in Fiscal Year 2026, the
Department of Human Services shall issue a grant of $250,000 to A Wider Circle to support its
work providing furniture and home goods to low-income individuals and families.
SUBTITLE X. BODY ART REGULATION CLARIFICATION
Sec. 5231. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Body Art Regulation Clarification Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 5232. Section 47-2853.76b of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “, through the Board of Barber and Cosmetology,
shall regulate” and insert the phrase “shall regulate” in its place.
(B) Strike the phrase “offered by:” and insert the phrase “offered by
establishing and imposing occupational licensing, registration requirements, and associated fee
schedules.” in its place.
(2) Paragraphs (1) and (2) are repealed.
(b) New subsections (b), (c), and (d) are added to read as follows:
“(b) The Department of Health shall regulate body art establishments to ensure that such
establishments have adequate health, sanitization, sterilization and safety methods, procedures,
equipment, and supplies by establishing minimum sterilization, sanitation, health, and safety
standards for the operation of such establishments as may be necessary to prevent infection and
contamination of equipment, supplies, or work surfaces with pathogenic organisms and by
establishing and imposing operational licensing, registration requirements, and associated fee
schedules.
“(c)(1) All body art establishments offering tattooing procedures shall conspicuously post
a written disclosure that states the following:
“The United States Food and Drug Administration has not approved any pigment color
additive for injectable use as tattoo ink. There may be a risk of carcinogenic decomposition
associated with certain pigments when the pigments are subsequently exposed to concentrated
ultra-violet light or laser irradiation.
“(2) All body art establishments offering tattooing procedures shall maintain
documentation on the premises containing the following information and shall disclose such
information to customers upon request:
105

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(A) The components of the pigments used in the body art establishment;
“(B) The names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the suppliers and
manufacturers of pigments used in the body art establishment for the past 3 years; and
“(C) Identification of any recalled pigments used in the establishment for
the past 3 years and the supplier and manufacturer of each pigment.
“(3) All body art establishments shall maintain and use regularly calibrated
autoclave equipment for the sterilization of any non-disposable body art equipment at a
frequency to be established by the Department of Health.
“(4) Only single-use disposable sharps, pigments, gloves, and cleansing products
shall be used in connection with body art procedures in body art establishments, in accordance
with rules established by the Department of Health pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
“(5) A body art establishment that is in violation of this subsection shall be
subject to license suspension or revocation and a maximum fine of $2,500.
“(d)(1) No person shall operate a body art establishment or perform body art procedures
in a body art establishment unless that establishment has obtained a valid body art establishment
license issued by the Mayor.
“(2) No body art establishment shall employ or permit body artists to perform
body art procedures in the body art establishment unless the body artist holds a valid body art
license issued by the Mayor.
“(3) Any person violating paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and may be punished by a fine not exceeding $2,500,
imprisonment for not more than 3 months, or both.”.
TITLE VI. OPERATIONS AND INFRASTRUCTURE
SUBTITLE A. DISTRICT DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION FEE
UPDATE
Sec. 6001. Short title
This subtitle may be cited as the “District Department of Transportation Fee Update
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 6002. Section 225.1(b)(2) of Title 24 of the District of Columbia Municipal
Regulations (24 DCMR § 225.1(b)(2)), is amended as follows:
(a) Sub-subparagraph (D) is amended to read as follows:
“
(D) Receptacles for construction
debris (e.g., Dumpsters™) placed Permit Fee
in public space: Per Month
106

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Month 1 $75.00
Month 2 $150.00
Months 3 and 4 $225.00
Month 5 or more $300.00 + $150.00 for each
month beyond Month 5
(e.g., Month 5 = $300, Month 6
= $450, Month 7 = $600, etc.)
”.
(b) Sub-subparagraph (E) is repealed.
SUBTITLE B. DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES FEE UPDATE
Sec. 6011. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Department of Motor Vehicles Fee Update Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 6012. Section 2 of An Act To amend the Act entitled “An Act to provide for the
recording and releasing of liens by entries on certificates of title for motor vehicles and trailers,
and for other purposes”, approved June 19, 1948 (62 Stat. 493; D.C. Official Code § 50-1213), is
amended by striking the phrase “a fee of 50 cents for” and inserting “a $15 fee for” in its place.
Sec. 6013. The District of Columbia Traffic Act, 1925, approved March 3, 1925 (43 Stat.
1119; D.C. Official Code passim), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 6 (D.C. Official Code § 50-2201.03) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a)(4) is amended by striking the phrase “be $98;” and inserting
the phrase “be $115;” in its place.
(2) Subsection (d) is amended by striking the phrase “a $26 fee” and inserting the
phrase “a $30 fee” in its place.
(b) Section 8 (D.C. Official Code § 50-1401.02) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (e)(2) is amended by striking the figure “$338” both times it
appears and inserting the figure “$350” in its place.
(2) Subsection (e-1)(3) is amended by striking the figure “$338” both times it
appears and inserting the figure “$350” in its place.
(3) Subsection (e-2)(2) is amended by striking the figure “$338” both times it
appears and inserting the figure “$350” in its place.
107

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(4) Subsection (i) is amended by striking the phrase “than $5 and” and inserting
the phrase “than $250 and” in its place.
Sec. 6014. Title IV of the District of Columbia Revenue Act of 1937, approved August
17, 1937 (50 Stat. 679; D.C. Official Code § 50-1501.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 50-1501.02) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (d) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (4)(C) is amended to read as follows:
“(C) A fee of $25 shall be paid for each duplicate registration certificate
issued, a fee of $15 shall be paid for each replacement tag issued, and a fee of $30 shall be paid
for each dealer’s proof of ownership certificate issued;”.
(B) Paragraph (5) is amended as follows:
(i) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “fee of
$13” and inserting the phrase “fee of $15” in its place.
(ii) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “fee of
$13” and inserting the phrase “fee of $15” in its place.
(2) Subsection (e) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “fee of $12” and
inserting the phrase “fee of $15” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the phrase “fee of $12” and
inserting the phrase “fee of $15” in its place.
(b) Section 3(b) (D.C. Official Code § 50-1501.03(b)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1)(A) is amended by striking the tabular array and inserting the
following tabular array in its place:
“
Weight Class Registration Fee
Class I (3,499 pounds or less) $70
Class II (3,500 — 4,999 pounds) $175
Class III (5,000 — 5,999 pounds) $300
Class IV (6,000 pounds or greater) $550 (plus $75 per each additional
1,000 pounds over 10,000 pounds)
108

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Class V (A new electric vehicle, other than a motorcycle
and motorized bicycle, less than 5,000 pounds.) (This
provision shall only apply to the first 2 years of the vehicle’s $40
registration, after which the vehicle shall be treated as Class
I or Class II, whichever is applicable.)
Class VI (vehicles 3,500 pounds or greater that have been
issued a disability license tag by the Department of Motor
Vehicles pursuant to 18 DCMR § 2704, if the vehicle $70
weight above 3,499 pounds is due to the accommodation of
a disability)
”.
(2) Paragraph (2)(A) is amended by striking the tabular array and inserting the
following tabular array in its place:
“
Weight Class Registration Fee
Class I (3,499 pounds or less) $115
Class II (3,500 — 4,999 pounds) $225
Class III (5,000 — 5,999 pounds) $325
Class IV (6,000 — 6,999 pounds) $450
Class V (7,000 — 7,999 pounds) $700
Class VI (8,000 pounds or greater) $800 (plus $100 per each additional 1,000 pounds
over 8,000 pounds)
”.
(3) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the tabular array and inserting the
following tabular array in its place:
“
Weight Class Registration Fee
109

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Class I (3,499 pounds or less)
$85
Class II (3,500 — 4,999 pounds)
$175
Class III (5,000 — 5,999 pounds)
$275
Class IV (6,000 — 6,999 pounds)
$400
Class V (7,000 — 7,999 pounds)
$650
Class VI (8,000 pounds or greater)
$750 (plus $75 per each additional 1,000 pounds over
8,000 pounds)
”.
Sec. 6015. Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (18 DCMR §
100.1 et seq.) is amended as follows:
(a) Section 411.13(c) (18 DCMR § 411.13(c)) is amended by striking the phrase “fee of
ninety eight dollars ($ 98)” and inserting the phrase “fee of one hundred dollars ($100)” in its
place.
(b) Section 2415.3 (18 DCMR § 2415.3) is amended to read as follows:
“2415.3 (a) The fee for a one-year residential permit parking sticker shall be:
“(1) $55 annually for the first vehicle permitted per legal mailing address;
“(2) $80 for the second vehicle permitted per legal mailing address;
“(3) $115 for the third vehicle permitted per legal mailing address; and
“(4) $175 for any fourth or subsequent vehicle permitted per legal mailing
address.
“(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, permits issued to residents sixty-
five (65) years of age or older shall be $35 annually for the first vehicle permitted per legal
mailing address.”.
SUBTITLE C. SUSTAINABLE ENERGY TRUST FUND
Sec. 6021. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Sustainable Energy Trust Fund Emergency Amendment
Act of 2025”.
Sec. 6022. Title II of the Clean and Affordable Energy Act of 2008, effective October 22,
2008 (D.C. Law 17-250; D.C. Official Code § 8-1774.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
110

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) Section 202(a) (D.C. Official Code § 8-1774.02(a)) is amended as follows:
(1) The existing text is designated as paragraph (1).
(2) A new paragraph (2) is added to read as follows:
“(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, during Fiscal Year 2025 or
Fiscal Year 2026, DOEE may extend an existing option period by one year.”.
(b) Section 210 (D.C. Official Code § 8-1774.10) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Sustainable Energy Trust Fund (“Fund”),
which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.”.
(2) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) Revenue from the following sources shall be deposited in the Fund:
“(1) The assessments imposed by subsection (b) of this section;
“(2) The sale of credits associated with the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative or
any successor program; and
“(3) Money transferred from the Green Building Fund pursuant to section 8(c)(1)
of the Green Building Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-234; D.C. Official
Code § 6-1451.07(c)(1)); provided, that any such money shall be used solely for the purpose
described in subsection (c)(18) of this section.”.
(3) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(i) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “upon
the natural” and inserting the phrase “upon a natural” in its place.
(ii) Subparagraph (I) is amended by striking the phrase “of $.1098
in” and inserting the phrase “of $0.032668 in” in its place.
(iii) Subparagraph (J) is amended by striking the phrase “of $.1172
in” and inserting the phrase “of $0.027088 in” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
(i) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “upon
the electric” and inserting the phrase “upon an electric” in its place.
(ii) Subparagraph (T) is amended by striking the phrase “of
$.00691 in” and inserting the phrase “of $0.002056 in” in its place.
(iii) Subparagraph (U) is amended by striking the phrase “of
$.00721 in” and inserting the phrase “of $0.001666 in” in its place.
(C) Paragraph (2A) is amended to read as follows:
“(2A) There shall be imposed upon a person who delivers heating oil or fuel oil to
an end-user in the District, whether for industrial, commercial, or residential use, an assessment
calculated on sales as follows:
111

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(A) The amount of $0.024992 per gallon in fiscal year 2026; and
“(B) The amount of $0.019414 per gallon in fiscal year 2027 and each
fiscal year thereafter.”.
(4) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
(A) The lead-in language is amended to read as follows:
“(c) The funds in the Sustainable Energy Trust Fund shall be used solely to fund the
following; except, that no funds shall be allocated from the Fund to the budget of the Department
of General Services for the purchase of gas, electricity, steam, water, sustainable energy, and
waste management for the District government or other purposes:”.
(B) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) The SEU contract in an amount of at least:
“(A) $19.8 million in fiscal year 2026; and
“(B) $10 million in fiscal year 2027 and every fiscal year thereafter.”.
(C) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) The administration of the SEU contract and the development and
implementation of a comprehensive energy plan by DOEE, in an amount of at least:
“(A) $4,143,591 in fiscal year 2026; and
“(B) $8,532,489 in fiscal year 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter;”.
(D) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “under section 205(k)
in the amount of $100,000 annually, beginning in fiscal year 2012” and inserting the phrase
“under section 205(k)” in its place.
(E) The lead-in language of paragraph (12)(A) is amended to read as
follows:
“(12)(A) Activities of DOEE or the Sustainable Energy Utility to:”.
(F) Paragraph (16)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “at least $7
million” and insert the phrase “at least $3.5 million” in its place.
(G) Paragraph (17) is amended by striking the phrase “Beginning in fiscal
year 2022, at least $3 million annually shall be used by DOEE or the Sustainable Energy Utility,
selected pursuant to this act, to provide assistance” and inserting the phrase “Beginning in fiscal
year 2022, assistance provided by DOEE or the Sustainable Energy Utility” in its place.
(H) Paragraph (23) is amended to read as follows:
“(23) Replacement in a residential unit of all appliances or other systems, such as
an oven, water heater, or heating system, that combust fossil fuels on site with appliances or
other systems that perform the same function and that are powered exclusively by electricity,
including:
“(A) In fiscal year 2024, up to $2 million that may be used for homes in
the River Terrace and Deanwood neighborhoods in Ward 7; and
112

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) As described in section 217; and”.
(I) Paragraph (24) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting
a period in its place.
(J) Paragraph (25) is repealed.
(5) A new subsection (f) is added to read as follows:
“(f)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.”.
(c) A new section 210a is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 210a. Mayor’s Energy Surcharge Fund.
“(a)(1) There is established as a special fund the Mayor’s Energy Surcharge Fund
(“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Department of Energy and Environment in
accordance with subsections (c) and (d) of this section.
“(2) The Fund shall be funded by an assessment on natural gas companies,
electric companies, and persons who deliver heating oil or fuel oil to end-users in the District
imposed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
“(3) All funds collected from these sources shall be deposited into the Fund and
shall be disbursed by the Fiscal Agent.
“(b)(1) There is imposed upon a natural gas company an assessment calculated on sales
on a per-therm basis as follows:
“(A) The amount of $0.077132 in fiscal year 2026; and
“(B) The amount of $0.090112 in fiscal year 2027 and each fiscal year
thereafter.
“(2) There is imposed upon an electric company an assessment calculated on sales
on a per-kilowatt hour basis as follows:
“(A) The amount of $0.004854 in fiscal year 2026; and
“(B) The amount of $0.005544 in fiscal year 2027 and each fiscal year
thereafter.
“(3) There shall be imposed upon a person who delivers heating oil or fuel oil to
an end-user in the District, whether for industrial, commercial, or residential use, as assessment
calculated on sales as follows:
“(A) The amount of $0.059008 per gallon in fiscal year 2026; and
“(B) The amount of $0.064586 per gallon in fiscal year 2027 and each
fiscal year thereafter.
113

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c) Money in the Fund shall only be used for the purchase of wind or solar energy from
the PJM interconnection region by the District government through a power purchase agreement
and the purchase of other energy for the District government in an amount not to exceed the
following thresholds:
“(1) For fiscal year 2026, $70,101,974; and
“(2) For fiscal years 2027, 2028, and 2029, $80,601,974.
“(d)(1) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.
“(2) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.”.
SUBTITLE D. RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARDS
Sec. 6031. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Renewable Energy Portfolio Standards Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 6032. Section 4(b)(2) of the Renewable Energy Portfolio Standard Act of 2004,
effective April 12, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-340; D.C. Official Code § 34-1432(b)(2)), is amended by
striking the phrase “ending September 30, 2028” and inserting the phrase “ending September 30,
2029” in its place.
SUBTITLE E. STORMWATER FUND
Sec. 6041. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Stormwater Fund Emergency Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 6042. Section 152 of the District Department of the Environment Establishment Act
of 2005, effective March 25, 2009 (D.C. Law 17-371; D.C. Official Code § 8-152.02), is
amended by adding a new subsection (g) to read as follows:
“(g) Notwithstanding subsections (a) through (e) of this section, in Fiscal Year 2026,
$5,903,293 shall be allocated directly from the Enterprise Fund to the Department of Public
Works for stormwater management activities, including street sweeping, regardless of when the
stormwater management activities were first carried out and regardless of whether such activities
are otherwise required by law or regulation.”.
SUBTITLE F. DISTRACTED DRIVING
114

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 6051. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Distracted Driving Safety Emergency Amendment Act
of 2025”.
Sec. 6052. The Distracted Driving Safety Act of 2004, effective March 30, 2004 (D.C.
Law 15-124; D.C. Official Code § 50-1731.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 50-1731.02) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “telephone, whether or not
permanently installed in a motor vehicle, that when used allows the vehicle operator to maintain
both hands on the steering wheel” and inserting the phrase “telephone or other personal wireless
communications device, whether or not permanently installed in a motor vehicle, that allows the
vehicle operator to maintain both hands on the steering wheel while the vehicle operator is using
the mobile telephone or other personal wireless communications device” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (4) is amended to read as follows:
“(4)(A) “Personal wireless communications device” means any handheld or
portable electronic device capable of transmitting personal wireless services, as that term is
defined in section 332(c)(7)(C)(i) of the Communications Act of 1934, approved September 13,
1982 (96 Stat. 1096; 47 U.S.C. § 332(c)(7)(C)(i)), including a pager, personal digital assistant,
computer, or gaming console.
“(B) The term “personal wireless communications device” does not
include electronic devices installed in or affixed to a motor vehicle for the purpose of providing
navigation or emergency assistance, such as a GPS device.”.
(3) Paragraph (4A) is repealed.
(4) A new paragraph (4B) is added to read as follows:
“(4B)(A) “Text message” means a text- or image-based electronic message,
including Short Message Service (“SMS”) message, Multimedia Messaging Service (“MMS”)
message, email, social media post, instant message, direct message, or any other text- or image-
based electronic message delivered through a mobile or browser-based application.
“(B) The term “text message” does not include:
“(i) An emergency, traffic, or weather alert;
“(ii) A message relating to the operation or navigation of a motor
vehicle; or
“(iii) Other push notifications.”.
(5) Paragraph (5) is amended to read as follows:
“(5) “Use” means to intentionally view or read from, or manually enter data into,
a mobile telephone or other electronic device to:
115

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(A) Place, talk, or answer a phone call or other voice-based electronic
communication; or
“(B) Compose, send, access, or retrieve a text message.”.
(b) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 50-1731.04) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) No person shall, while operating a motor vehicle in the District:
“(1) Use, or attempt to use, a mobile telephone or other personal wireless
communications device without using a hands-free accessory; or
“(2) Hold, or attempt to hold, a mobile telephone or other personal wireless
communications device.”.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(B) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; or” in its place.
(C) A new paragraph (4) is added to read as follows:
“(4) The operation of a vehicle that has stopped on the side of, or off, an active
roadway in a location where it can safely remain stationary.”.
Sec. 6053. The lead-in language of section 9(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Traffic
Act, 1925, approved March 3, 1925 (43 Stat. 1123; D.C. Official Code § 50-2201.04(c)(2)), is
amended by striking the phrase “limit; and” and inserting the phrase “limit, or in any other
manner that displays a conscious disregard of the risk of causing property damage or bodily
injury to any person, and:” in its place.
SUBTITLE G. DFHV ENFORCEMENT
Sec. 6061. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Carrier and Vehicle for-Hire Enforcement Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 6062. Section 2 of the Taxicab and Passenger Vehicle for Hire Impoundment Act of
1992, effective March 16, 1993 (D.C. Law 9-199; D.C. Official Code § 50-331), is amended as
follows:
(a) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “taxicab and passenger vehicle
for hire” and inserting the phrase “vehicle for hire” in its place.
(b) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
116

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(1) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “Any taxicab or
passenger vehicle for hire” and inserting the phrase “Any vehicle for hire” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “31 DCMR 825” both times it
appears and inserting the phrase “31 DCMR § 2000” in its place.
(3) Paragraph (4) is amended to read as follows:
“(4) The vehicle is not licensed to operate as a for-hire vehicle in the District of
Columbia, or the associated business entity lacks operating authority to provide for-hire services
in the District, and the vehicle is observed providing for-hire service that originates in or occurs
entirely within the District of Columbia;”.
Sec. 6063. The District of Columbia Taxicab Commission Establishment Act of 1985,
effective March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-97; D.C. Official Code § 50-301.01 et seq.), is amended
as follows:
(a) Section 12(c) (D.C. Official Code 50-301.11(c)) is repealed.
(b) The lead-in language of section 20j-8(a)(5) (D.C. Official Code § 50-301.29h(a)(5)) is
amended by striking the word “Submit” and inserting the phrase “No later than January 5, 2026,
register” in its place.
(c) Section 20j-11(a)(1) (D.C. Official Code § 50-301.29k(a)(1)) is amended by striking
the phrase “A carrier-for-hire operator shall” and inserting the phrase “Beginning no later than
January 1, 2026, a carrier-for-hire operator shall” in its place.
SUBTITLE H. FRAUDULENT TAGS AND PARKING ENFORCEMENT
Sec. 6071. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Parking Enforcement Management Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 6072. The Fraudulent Vehicle Tag and Parking Enforcement Modernization
Amendment Act of 2024, effective May 2, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-325, D.C. Official Code § 50-
2431 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) The lead-in language of section 122(a)(2) (D.C. Official Code § 50-2452(a)(2)) is
amended to read as follows:
“(2) Vehicles parked on a public right-of-way or public space in the District, or on
private property under the jurisdiction or management of the District, against which:”.
(b) Section 401(a) is amended by striking the phrase “Sections 113, 114, 121,
122(a)(2)(B), 201(c)(2), and 302(d)(1)(B)(i) shall apply” and inserting the phrase “Sections 113,
114(b) and 201(c)(2) shall apply” in its place.
117

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
SUBTITLE I. WMATA BOARD OF DIRECTORS STIPEND
Sec. 6081. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “WMATA Board of Directors Stipend Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 6082. Section 1108 of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit
Personnel Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-139; D.C. Official Code § 1-
611.08), is amended by adding a new subsection (c-4) to read as follows:
“(c-4) Each member of the Board of Directors of the Washington Metropolitan Area
Transit Authority (“Board”) appointed pursuant to section 2 of the Washington Metropolitan
Area Transit Authority Board of Directors Act of 2012, effective April 27, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-
286; D.C. Official Code § 9-1108.11), who is not an employee of the District or a public official,
shall be entitled to the following stipend, to be paid on a quarterly basis, for his or her service on
the Board:
“(1) For a principal member, $20,000 per 12-month period.
“(2) For an alternate member, $250 for each day the alternate member serves in
the stead of a principal member to determine a quorum of the Board.”.
SUBTITLE J. PUBLIC RESTROOM FACILITY PROGRAM
Sec. 6091. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Public Restroom Facility Program Establishment
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 6092. The Public Restroom Facilities Installation and Promotion Act of 2018,
effective April 11, 2019, (D.C. Law 22-280; D.C. Official Code § 10-1051 et seq.), is amended
as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 10-1051) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is repealed.
(2) A new paragraph (1A) is added to read as follows:
“(1A) “Director” means the Director of the Department of Public Works.”.
(3) Paragraph (2) is repealed.
(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 10-1052) is amended by repealing subsections (d),
(e), (f), and (g).
(c) Section 4a (D.C. Official Code § 10-1053.01) is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 4a. Public Restroom Facility Program.”
“(a) There is established within the Department of Public Works (“DPW”) the public
restroom facility program.
118

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(b)(1) DPW is authorized to enter into a contract to provide public restroom facilities,
which shall:
“(A) Be compliant with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990,
approved July 26, 1990 (104 Stat. 327; 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.);
“(B) Have running water for flushing toilets and sinks, but not require a
municipal water connection;
“(C) Have the ability to be relocated at the direction of the Director; and
“(D) Have remote monitoring and the ability to program automated hours
of operation.
“(2) The contractor shall:
“(A) Provide 24-hour-per-day full maintenance and service for each public
restroom facility;
“(B) Collect data and provide reports to DPW at least monthly on:
“(i) Public restroom facility usage by date and time;
“(ii) Incidents of misuse or vandalism;
“(iii) How facilities were accessed;
“(iv) Cleanliness; and
“(v) User experience; and
“(C) Install public restroom facilities in locations prescribed by the
Director.
“(c) Subject to funding, the Director shall designate the initial placement of public
restroom facilities:
“(1) Within 500 feet of the following locations:
“(A) Dupont Circle Park;
“(B) Columbia Heights Civic Plaza in Square 2843;
“(C) Alethia Tanner Park;
“(D) The intersection of Bladensburg Road, NE, and Maryland Avenue,
NE;
“(E) Eastern Market Metro Plaza in Square 901S; and
“(F) The intersection of T Street, NW, and 7th Street, NW; and
“(2) Within the boundaries of:
“(A) Oxon Run Park;
“(B) Watkins Recreation Center;
“(C) The Downtown DC Business Improvement District; and
“(D) Marvin Gaye Park.
“(d) The Director may relocate a public restroom facility, including those initially sited
pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, at the Director’s discretion.
119

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(e) In selecting locations for new public restroom facilities, the Director shall first
prioritize sites identified in the report issued pursuant to section 3(b).”.
(d) New sections 4b and 4c are added to read as follows:
“Sec. 4b. Rulemaking.
“The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue
rules to implement the provisions of this act.
“Sec. 4c. Public restroom partnership agreements.
“The Director may enter into an MOU, partnership, or cost-sharing agreement with one
or more third-party entities to support additional public restroom facilities under the Department
of Public Works’s contract.”.
(e) Section 5 (D.C. Official Code § 10-1054) is repealed.
SUBTITLE K. HOME ELECTRIFICATION PROGRAM
Sec. 6101. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Home Electrification Program Emergency Amendment
Act of 2025”.
Sec. 6102. Section 217(a) of the Clean and Affordable Energy Act of 2008, effective July
19, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-189; D.C. Official Code § 8-1774.17(a)), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “Shall provide” and inserting
the phrase “Subject to the availability of funding, shall provide” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “Shall provide” and inserting
the phrase “May provide” in its place.
(b) The lead-in language of paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “The
Program shall” and inserting the phrase “Subject to the availability of funding, the Program
shall” in its place.
(c) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “DOEE shall” and inserting the
phrase “DOEE may” in its place.
SUBTITLE L. PLAZA PROGRAM IMPLEMENTATION SCHEDULE
Sec. 6111. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “PLAZA Program Implementation Schedule Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
120

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 6112. Section 202 of the Bicycle and Pedestrian Safety Amendment Act of 2016,
effective March 21, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-312; D.C. Official Code § 50-2372), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (b)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “December 31, 2025, selecting”
and inserting the phrase “December 31, 2026, selecting” in its place.
(b) Subsection (d)(3) is amended as follows:
(1) Strike the phrase “March 31, 2026, announce” and insert the phrase “March
31, 2027, announce” in its place.
(2) Strike the date “October 1, 2026” and insert the date “October 1, 2027” in its
place.
(c) The lead-in language of subsection (e) is amended by striking the phrase “March 31,
2026, the” and inserting the phrase “March 31, 2027, the” in its place.
(d) Subsection (f) is amended by striking the phrase “October 1, 2027, any” and inserting
the phrase “October 1, 2028, any” in its place.
SUBTITLE M. CLEAN CITY OFFICE ESTABLISHMENT
Sec. 6121. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Clean City Office Establishment Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 6122. Title I of the Sustainable Solid Waste Management Amendment Act of 2014,
effective February 26, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-154; D.C. Official Code § 8-1031.01 et seq.), is
amended by adding a new subtitle C to read as follows:
“SUBTITLE C. Office of the Clean City.
“Sec. 127. Establishment of the Office of the Clean City.
“(a) There is established within the Department of Public Works the Office of the Clean
City, which shall be headed by a full-time Clean City Coordinator, who shall be appointed by the
Mayor.
“(b) The Clean City Coordinator shall:
“(1) Conduct cleanliness assessments on a quarterly basis for the entire District
and on an as-needed basis for the District of Columbia National Highway System and provide
written reports and GIS maps documenting the outcomes of those assessments;
“(2) Work in partnership and consultation with the various agencies and offices
that have cleanliness and beautification operational responsibility to develop, coordinate and
support Clean City program activities and to deliver Clean City services;
“(3) Develop, coordinate, and support Clean City program activities with agency
divisions that have operational responsibility for maintaining the cleanliness of the District;
121

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(4) Work with agency directors and staff to identify and resolve barriers to
effective cooperation among multiple agencies to further the cleanliness of the District in areas,
including financial, legal, or procurement services;
“(5) Assist the Director of the Department of Public Works and the Office of
Waste Diversion with innovations in public and household solid-waste container infrastructure
and collections;
“(6) Advocate for the enforcement of existing laws and municipal regulations that
can have a positive impact on the cleanliness and appearance of the District;
“(7) Solicit the involvement of ANCs, civic associations, concerned citizens, and
businesses in litter-prevention programs and support for the cleaning of the District;
“(8) Maintain a website containing information on Clean City activities,
education, and community engagement information;
“(9) Develop and support Clean City Initiative programs to educate and engage
District of Columbia Public Schools and Public Charter School students in litter-prevention
programs and support for the cleaning of the District;
“(10) Formulate and implement a fundraising strategy to solicit corporate and
foundation contributions towards Clean City Initiatives, including “Adopt-A-Block” programs;
“(11) Support the coordination of rodent-abatement programs between the
Department of Public Works and Department of Health; and
“(12) Support planning and resource allocation for pet-waste disposal.
“(c) Subject to funding, the Clean City Coordinator may issue grants to support public-
space cleaning efforts. Such grants shall:
“(1) Preference supporting and expanding the service area of existing Clean
Teams funded by the Department of Small and Local Business Development;
“(2) Prioritize public space cleaning for major arterials, commercial corridors, and
mixed-use neighborhoods; and
“(3) Not be used to replace work performed by Department of Public Works
staff.”.
TITLE VII. FINANCE AND REVENUE
SUBTITLE A. SALES TAX INCREASE DELAY
Sec. 7001. This subtitle may be cited as the “Sales Tax Increase Delay Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 7002. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
122

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) The lead-in language of section 47-2002(a) is amended by striking the phrase “shall
be 6.0% before October 1, 2025, 6.5% beginning on October 1, 2025,” and inserting the phrase
“shall be 6.0% before October 1, 2026,” in its place.
(b) The lead-in language of section 47-2202(a) is amended by striking the phrase “shall
be 6.0% before October 1, 2025, 6.5% beginning on October 1, 2025,” and inserting the phrase
“shall be 6.0% before October 1, 2026,” in its place.
SUBTITLE B. BABY BONDS
Sec. 7011. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Baby Bonds Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 7012. The Child Wealth Building Act of 2021, effective February 18, 2022 (D.C.
Law 24-53; D.C. Official Code § 4-681.01 et seq.), is repealed.
Sec. 7013. Section 315(d) of the Law to Legalize Lotteries, Daily Numbers Games, and
Bingo and Raffles for Charitable Purposes in the District of Columbia, effective May 3, 2019
(D.C. Law 22-312; D.C. Official Code § 36-621.15(d)), is repealed.
Sec. 7014. Section 47-1803.02(a)(2)(QQ) of the District of Columbia Official Code is
repealed.
Sec. 7015. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as September 30, 2025.
SUBTITLE C. HOTEL TAX
Sec. 7021. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Hotel Surtax Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 7022. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 47-2002.03a is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “Except as provided
in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a tax” and inserting the phrase “A tax” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) A tax, separate from and in addition to the taxes imposed pursuant to § 47-
2002(a)(2)(A), § 47-2002.02, and paragraph (1) of this subsection, is imposed on all vendors at
the rate of 1.0% of the gross receipts from the sale of or charges on or after April 1, 2023, and on
123

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
or before September 30, 2027, for any room or rooms, lodgings, or accommodations furnished to
a transient by any hotel, inn, tourist camp, tourist cabin, or any other place in which rooms,
lodgings, or accommodations are regularly furnished to transients.”.
(2) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
(A) The existing text is designated as paragraph (1).
(B) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “The tax revenue
received” and inserting the phrase “Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the
tax revenue received” in its place.
(C) A new paragraph (2) is added to read as follows:
“(2) Beginning October 1, 2025, the tax revenue received pursuant to subsection
(a)(2) of this section shall be deposited as follows:
“(A) In the following fiscal years, the following amounts shall be
deposited in the Economic Development Special Account established by section 301 of the
National Capital Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation
Reorganization Act of 2008, effective March 26, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-138; D.C. Official Code §
2-1225.21):
“(i) In Fiscal Year 2026, $10,466,000; and
“(ii) In Fiscal Year 2027, $6,140,000.
“(B) All other tax revenue received pursuant to subsection (a)(2) of this
section shall be deposited in local funds.”.
(3) The lead-in language of subsection (d) is amended by striking the phrase
“received pursuant to subsection (a)(2) of this section” and inserting the phrase “received by
Destination DC pursuant to this section” in its place.
(b) Section 47-2202.03 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “Except as provided
in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a tax” and inserting the phrase “A tax” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) A tax, separate from and in addition to the taxes imposed pursuant to § 47-
2202(a)(2)(A), § 47-2202.02, and paragraph (1) of this subsection, is imposed on all vendors at
the rate of 1.0% of the gross receipts from the sale of or charges on or after April 1, 2023, and on
or before September 30, 2027, for any room or rooms, lodgings, or accommodations furnished to
a transient by any hotel, inn, tourist camp, tourist cabin, or any other place in which rooms,
lodgings, or accommodations are regularly furnished to transients.”.
(2) Subsection (d) is amended as follows:
(A) The existing text is designated as paragraph (1).
124

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(B) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “The tax revenue
receipted” and inserting the phrase “Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the
tax revenue received” in its place.
(C) A new paragraph (2) is added to read as follows:
“(2) Beginning October 1, 2025, the tax revenue received pursuant to subsection
(a)(2) of this section shall be deposited in local funds;”.
(3) The lead-in language of subsection (e) is amended by striking the phrase
“received pursuant to subsection (a)(2) of this section” and inserting the phrase “received by
Destination DC pursuant to this section” in its place.
SUBTITLE D. COMBINED REPORTING
Sec. 7031. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Combined Reporting Tax Deduction Delay Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 7032. Section 47-1810.08(b) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended
as follows:
(a) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “7-year period beginning with the
15th year of the combined filing” and inserting the phrase “first 7 tax years beginning after
December 31, 2029” in its place.
(b) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “tax year 2020” and inserting the
phrase “tax year 2020 or 2025” in its place.
SUBTITLE E. BALLPARK FEE AND FUND
Sec. 7041. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Ballpark Fee and Fund Emergency Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 7042. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by striking the chapter designation “Chapter 27B.
Ballpark Fee.” and inserting the chapter designation “Chapter 27B. Sports facilities fee.” in its
place.
(b) Chapter 27B is amended as follows:
(1) The table of contents is amended by striking the section designation “47-2762.
Ballpark fee.” and inserting the section designation “47-2762. Sports facilities fee.” in its place.
125

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(2) Section 47-2761(5) is amended by striking the phrase “subject to the ballpark
fee” and inserting the phrase “that are subject to the sports facilities fee and that have paid the
sports facilities fee for the relevant year” in its place.
(3) Section 47-2762 is amended as follows:
(A) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“§ 47-2762. Sports facilities fee.”.
(B) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(i) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) For the fiscal year beginning October 1, 2004, and each fiscal year thereafter,
each feepayer shall remit, on or before June 15 of each year, a sports facilities fee that shall be
based upon the annual District gross receipts of the feepayer for the feepayer’s preceding tax
year and computed according to the fee schedule provided in subsection (b) of this section.”.
(ii) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “ballpark fee”
both times it appears and inserting the phrase “sports facilities fee” in its place.
(C) The lead-in language of subsection (b) is amended by striking the
phrase “ballpark fee” and inserting the phrase “sports facilities fee” in its place.
(D) Subsection (c) is amended as follows:
(i) Strike the phrase “ballpark fee” wherever it appears and insert
the phrase “sports facilities fee” in its place.
(ii) Strike the phrase “$14 million” both times it appears and insert
the phrase “annual debt service on the bonds” in its place.
(E) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d) The revenues received by the District from the sports facilities fee imposed by this
section shall be deposited into the Ballpark Revenue Fund; except, that after all principal and
interest on the bonds issued pursuant to section 103 of the Ballpark Omnibus Financing and
Revenue Act of 2004, effective April 8, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-320; D.C. Official Code § 10-
1601.03), has been paid, the revenues received by the District from the sports facilities fee
imposed by this section shall be deposited in the RFK Campus Infrastructure Fund established by
section 2052 of the RFK Campus Infrastructure Fund Establishment Emergency Act of 2025,
passed on emergency basis on July 28, 2025 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-340).”.
(4) Section 47-2763 is amended by striking the phrase “ballpark fee” and inserting
the phrase “sports facilities fee” in its place.
Sec. 7043. Section 102(d) of the Ballpark Omnibus Financing and Revenue Act of 2004,
effective April 8, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-320; D.C. Official Code § 10-1601.02(d)), is amended by
striking the phrase “the first $32.92 million of any excess that accrues during Fiscal Year
2026, the first $34.06 million of any excess that accrues during Fiscal Year 2027, and the first
126

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
$35.19 million of any excess that accrues during Fiscal Year 2028” and inserting the phrase “and
the first $32.92 million of any excess that accrues during Fiscal Year 2026” in its place.
SUBTITLE F. 1000 U STREET, NW, PROPERTY TAX CLARIFICATION
Sec. 7051. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “1000 U Street, NW, Property Tax Clarification
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 7052. Chapter 10 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by striking the section designation “47-1045. Prince
Hall Freemason and Eastern Star Charitable Foundation, lot 0826 in square 0333.” and inserting
the section designation “47-1045. Prince Hall Free & Accepted Mason and Order of the Eastern
Star Charitable Educational Foundation.” in its place.
(b) Section 47-1045 is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“§ 47-1045. Prince Hall Free & Accepted Mason and Order of the Eastern Star Charitable
Educational Foundation.”.
(2) The existing text is designated as subsection (a).
(3) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) Certain property located in the District of Columbia currently described for
assessment and taxation purposes as Lots 37 and 828 in Square 333, together with improvements
thereon and furnishings therein, with equitable and legal title in the name of the Prince Hall Free
& Accepted Mason and Order of the Eastern Star Charitable Educational Foundation, or a
successor in interest including the Prince Hall Free & Accepted Mason and Order of the Eastern
Star Title Holding Company, is hereby exempt from all taxation and transfers of the property
from deed recordation and transfer taxes so long as the same is used in carrying on the purposes
and activities of the Prince Hall Free & Accepted Mason and Order of the Eastern Star
Charitable Educational Foundation and is not used for exclusively commercial purposes, subject
to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009.”.
(4) A new subsection (b) is added to read as follows:
“(b)(1) In Fiscal Year 2025, any unpaid tax liability due to the Recorder of Deeds, in
association with the real property described in subsection (a) of this section, shall be forgiven.
(2)(A) In Fiscal Year 2026, unpaid tax liability for Tax Years 2022, 2023, 2024,
and 2025 shall be forgiven and real property tax payments made for Tax Years 2022, 2023,
2024, and 2025, including payments of penalties and interest, shall be refunded to the payor,
subject to the limitation set forth in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.
127

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) The total amount of the tax liability forgiven and the real property tax
payments refunded pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall not exceed
$1,284,271.”.
Sec. 7053. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of September 30, 2025.
SUBTITLE G. CHILD TAX CREDIT
Sec. 7061. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Child Tax Credit Emergency Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 7062. Section 47-1806.17 of the District of Columbia Official Code is repealed.
Sec. 7063. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of October 1, 2024.
SUBTITLE H. NON-LAPSING FUND MODIFICATIONS AND REPEALS
Sec. 7071. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Non-Lapsing Fund Modifications Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 7072. Adverse Health Benefit Decision Grievance Fund (1060132)
Section 109 of the Health Benefits Plan Members Bill of Rights Act of 1998, effective
April 27, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-274; D.C. Official Code § 44-301.09), is amended as follows:
(a) The existing text is designated as subsection (a).
(b) A new subsection (b) is added to read as follows:
“(b)(1) There is established as a special fund the Adverse Health Benefit Decision
Grievance Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with
paragraph (3) of this subsection.
“(2) Payments of the assessments imposed pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section shall be deposited in the Fund.
“(3) Money in the Fund shall be used to pay the costs of administering this act.
“(4) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as
determined by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the
unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal
year-end close.”.
128

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7073. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Administration Fund (1060374)
Section 25-210 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis
Administration Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with
subsection (d) of this section.”.
(b) Subsection (b) is repealed.
(c) New subsections (c), (d), and (e) are added to read as follows:
“(c) All funds obtained from alcoholic beverage licensing and permitting fees shall be
deposited in the Fund. Funds obtained from penalties and fines, as prescribed by Chapter 8 of
this title, shall be deposited in the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of
Columbia.
“(d) Money in the Fund shall be used to fund the operations of ABCA.
“(e)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.”.
Sec. 7074. Anacostia River Clean Up and Protection Fund (1060184)
Section 6 of the Anacostia River Clean Up and Protection Act of 2009, effective
September 23, 2009 (D.C. Law 18-55; D.C. Official Code § 8-102.05), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Anacostia River Clean Up and Protection
Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Director of the Department of Energy and
Environment (“DOEE”) in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.”.
(b) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) The following revenue shall be deposited in the Fund:
“(1) The fees established by section 4 for disposable carryout bags that have been
transmitted to the Office of Tax and Revenue;
“(2) The net proceeds from the fees charged for the issuance and renewal of
Anacostia River Commemorative License Plates pursuant to section 8;
“(3) Fees collected for the application for and display of Protect Local Wildlife
license plates pursuant to section 2l(b)(1) of Title IV of the District of Columbia Revenue Act of
1937, effective November 13, 2021 (D.C. Law 24-45; D.C. Official Code § 50-1501.02l(b)(1));
and
129

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(4) The net proceeds from the voluntary tax check-off provided for in D.C.
Official Code § 47-1812.11d.”.
(c) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.”.
Sec. 7075. Appraisal Education Fund (1060266)
Section 47-2853.154 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Appraisal Education Fund (“Fund”), which
shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.”.
(b) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) The following revenue shall be deposited in the Fund:
“(1) All funds obtained from the appraisal education fund fee established by the
Mayor; and
“(2) Civil penalties imposed by the Board or the Office of Administrative
Hearings pursuant to this part.”.
(c) A new subsection (e) is added to read as follows:
“(e)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.”.
Sec. 7076. Apprenticeship Fines (1060416)
Section 5(c)(3) of the Amendments to An Act To Provide for Voluntary Apprenticeship
in the District of Columbia Act of 1978, effective March 6, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-156; D.C. Official
Code § 32-1431(c)(3)), is amended by striking the phrase “programs.” and inserting the phrase
“programs; provided, that any such fine remaining unspent for such purpose at the end of a fiscal
year, as determined by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be
transferred to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as
part of the fiscal year-end close.” in its place.
Sec. 7077. Automated External Defibrillator Registration Fee Fund (1060194)
130

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Section 5 of the Public Access to Automated External Defibrillator Act of 2000, effective
April 27, 2001 (D.C. Law 13-278; D.C. Official Code § 7-2371.04), is repealed.
Sec. 7078. Basic Business License Fund (1060272)
Section 47-2851.13 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Basic Business License Fund (“Fund”),
which shall be administered by the Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection in
accordance with subsection (c) of this section.”.
(b) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “expended by the Department as
designated by an appropriations act of Congress,” and inserting the phrase “expended by the
Department” in its place.
(c) Subsection (d)(2) is repealed.
(d) A new subsection (e) is added to read as follows:
“(e) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7079. Benchmarking Enforcement Fund (1060318)
Section 8a(d) of the Green Building Act of 2006, effective October 22, 2015 (D.C. Law
21-36; D.C. Official Code § 6-1451.07a(d)), is amended to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7080. Board of Pharmacy Fund (1060133)
Section 4904b of the Department of Health Functions Clarification Act of 2001, effective
March 26, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-131; D.C. Official Code § 7-733.02), is amended to read as
follows:
“Sec. 4904b. Board of Pharmacy Fund.
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Board of Pharmacy Fund (“Fund”), which
shall be administered by the Department of Health in accordance with subsection (c) of this
section.
“(b)(1) All licensing fees, civil fines, and interest earned relating to the practice of
pharmaceutical detailing shall be deposited in the Fund.
131

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(2) For the purposes of this subsection, the term “practice of pharmaceutical
detailing” shall have the same meaning as provided in section 102(10A) of the District of
Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985, effective March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-99;
D.C. Official Code § 3-1201.02(10A)).
“(c) Money in the Fund shall be used for the administration of the Board of Pharmacy.
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7081. Combat Sports Commission Fund (1060277)
The Boxing and Wrestling Commission Act of 1975, effective October 8, 1975 (D.C.
Law 1-20; D.C. Official Code § 3-601 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 8(a) (D.C. Official Code § 3-607(a)) is amended by striking the phrase
“District of Columbia Combat Sports Commission Fund” and inserting the phrase “Combat
Sports Commission Fund” in its place.
(b) Section 8a (D.C. Official Code § 3-607.01) is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 8a. Combat Sports Commission Fund.”.
(2) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “District of Columbia
Combat Sports Commission Fund” and inserting the phrase “Combat Sports Commission Fund”
in its place.
(3) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7082. Community-Based Violence Reduction Fund (1010042)
Section 3014 of the Community-based Violence Reduction Fund [Act of 2008], effective
August 16, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-219; D.C. Official Code § 1-325.121), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(a)(1) There is established as a special fund the Community-Based Violence Reduction
Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (b) of
this section.”.
(2) Paragraph (2) is repealed.
132

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “Justice Grants Administration” and
inserting the phrase “Office of Victim Services and Justice Grants” in its place.
(c) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “Community-Based Violence
Reduction Fund” and inserting the word “Fund” in its place.
(d) A new subsection (d) is added to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7083. Community Schools Fund (1010118)
Section 404 of the Community Schools Incentive Act of 2012, effective June 19, 2012
(D.C. Law 19-142; D.C. Official Code § 38-754.04), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Community Schools Fund (“Fund”), which
shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.”.
(b) A new subsection (d) is added to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7084. Corporate Recordation Fund (1060283)
Section 29-102.13 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “There is established the Corporate
Recordation Fund (“Fund”), which shall be classified as a proprietary fund and a type of
enterprise fund for the purposes of § 47-373(1)” and inserting the phrase “There is established as
a special fund the Corporate Recordation Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the
Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection in accordance with subsection (b) of this
section” in its place.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “by the Department of Licensing and
Consumer Protection as designated by an appropriations act of Congress” and inserting the
phrase “by the Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection” in its place.
(c) A new subsection (b-1) is added to read as follows:
“(b-1) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as
determined by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the
133

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal
year-end close.”.
Sec. 7085. DC Circulator Fund (1060281)
(a) The Department of Transportation Establishment Act of 2002, effective May 21, 2002
(D.C. Law 14-137; D.C. Official Code § 50-921.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(1) Section 5(a)(3)(H)(ii) (D.C. Official Code § 50-921.04(a)(3)(H)(ii)) is
amended by striking the phrase “; provided further, that proceeds relating to private sponsorship
of vehicles, equipment, and facilities used in the DC Circulator program shall be deposited into
the DC Circulator Fund established by section 11c;” and inserting a semicolon in its place.
(2) Section 11a(2) (D.C. Official Code § 50-921.31(2)) is repealed.
(3) Section 11c (D.C. Official Code § 50-921.33) is repealed.
(b) Section 3(h)(1) of the District of Columbia Motor Vehicle Parking Facility Act of
1942, approved February 16, 1942 (56 Stat. 91; D.C. Official Code § 50-2603(8)(A)), is
amended by striking the phrase “, the DC Circulator Fund in accordance with section 11c of the
Department of Transportation Establishment Act of 2002, effective March 6, 2007 (D.C. Law
16-255; D.C. Official Code § 50-921.33),” and inserting a comma in its place.
(c) Any money remaining in the DC Circulator Fund, established by section 11c of the
Department of Transportation Establishment Act of 2002, effective March 6, 2007 (D.C. Law
16-225; D.C. Official Code 50-921.33), on the effective date of this section shall be transferred
to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.
Sec. 7086. DCHA Rehabilitation and Maintenance Fund (1010093)
Section 3(c-1)(5) of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Act of 1999, effective
May 9, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-105; D.C. Official Code § 6-202(c-1)(5)), is amended to read as
follows:
“(5) Any money remaining available in the R&M Fund at the end of a fiscal year,
as determined by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to
the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal
year-end close.”.
Sec. 7087. DCPS School Facility Fund (1060147)
Section 5 of the Ensuring Community Access to Recreational Spaces Act of 2018,
effective February 22, 2019 (D.C. Law 22-210; D.C. Official Code § 38-434), is amended as
follows:
(a) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 5. DCPS School Facility Fund.”.
134

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7088. Department of Corrections Reimbursement Fund (1060006)
Section 3032 of the Department of Corrections Reimbursement Fund Act of 2005,
effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33, D.C. Official Code § 1-325.21), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “There is established a nonlapsing
fund to be designated as the Department of Corrections Reimbursement Fund (“Fund”), which
shall be a segregated account within the General Fund of the District of Columbia and” and
inserting the phrase “There is established as a special fund the Department of Corrections
Reimbursement Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Director of the Department
of Corrections and” in its place.
(b) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7089. Department of Housing and Community Development Unified Fund
(1060069)
Section 2009 of the Department of Housing and Community Development Unified Fund
Establishment Act of 2008, effective August 16, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-219; D.C. Official Code §
42-2857.01), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “nonlapsing fund” and inserting the
phrase “special fund” in its place.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
(c) The lead-in language of subsection (e) is amended by striking the phrase “, beginning
on October 1, 2008:” and inserting a colon in its place.
135

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7090. District Department of Transportation Transportation Initiatives Fund
(1060333)
(a) The Department of Transportation Establishment Act of 2002, effective May 21, 2002
(D.C. Law 14-137; D.C. Official Code § 50-921.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(1) Section 3(f)(1)(A)(iii) (D.C. Official Code § 50-921.02(f)(1)(A)(iii)) is
amended by striking the phrase “District Department of Transportation Enterprise Fund for
Transportation Initiatives” and inserting the phrase “Transportation Initiatives Fund” in its place.
(2) Section 5(a)(3)(H)(ii) (D.C. Official Code § 50-921.04(a)(3)(H)(ii)) is
amended by striking the phrase “DDOT Enterprise Fund for Transportation Initiatives” and
inserting the phrase “Transportation Initiatives Fund” in its place.
(3) Section 9e (D.C. Official Code § 50-921.13) is amended as follows:
(A) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 9e. Transportation Initiatives Fund.”.
(B) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Transportation Initiatives Fund (“Fund”),
which shall be administered by the Director of the Department of Transportation in accordance
with subsection (b-1) of this section.
(C) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(i) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “,
beginning October 1, 2011:” and inserting a colon in its place.
(ii) Paragraph (6) is amended as follows:
(I) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the semicolon
and inserting the phrase “; and” in its place.
(II) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the semicolon
and inserting the phrase “; and” in its place.
(iii) Paragraph (7) is repealed.
(D) A new subsection (b-1) is added to read as follows:
“(b-1) Money in the Fund shall be used to pay for goods, services, property, capital
improvements, or for any other permitted purpose as authorized by sections 3(f) and 5 and to pay
into the Highway Trust Fund.”
(E) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
(b) Section 2(g) of the Neighborhood Contractor Daytime Parking Permit Act of 2012,
effective April 20, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-254; D.C. Official Code § 50-2635(g)), is amended by
136

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
striking the phrase “DDOT Enterprise Fund for Transportation Initiatives” and inserting the
phrase “Transportation Initiatives Fund” in its place.
Sec. 7091. District of Columbia Motor Vehicle Inspection Fund (1060310)
An Act To provide for the annual inspection of all motor vehicles in the District of
Columbia, approved February 18, 1938 (52 Stat. 78; D.C. Official Code § 50-1101 et seq.), is
amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 50-1102) is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “Biennial Inspection”
and inserting the word “Inspection” in its place.
(2) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Motor Vehicle Inspection Fund (“Fund”),
which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.”.
(3) Subsection (d) is repealed.
(4) A new subsection (e) is added to read as follows:
“(e) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
(b) Section 6(b) (D.C. Official Code § 50-1106(b)) is amended by striking the phrase
“District of Columbia Motor Vehicle Biennial Inspection” and inserting the phrase “Motor
Vehicle Inspection” in its place.
Sec. 7092. District of Columbia Jobs Trust Fund (1060104)
Section 5c of the First Source Employment Agreement Act of 1984, effective February
24, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-84; D.C. Official Code § 2-219.04c), is amended to read as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “the District of Columbia Jobs Trust
Fund” and inserting the phrase “the District of Columbia Jobs Trust Fund (“Fund”)” in its place.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7093. Drug-, Firearm-, or Prostitution-Related Nuisance Abatement Fund (1060263)
(a) Section 12a of the Drug-Related Nuisance Abatement Act of 1998, effective April 4,
2006 (D.C. Law 16-81; D.C. Official Code § 42-3111.01), is amended as follows:
137

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Drug-, Firearm-, or Prostitution-Related
Nuisance Abatement Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance
with subsection (b) of this section.”.
(2) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) The revenue deposited into the Fund shall consist of damages collected in cases
brought pursuant to this act; provided, that the balance in the Fund shall not exceed $2 million at
any time and any excess above that amount shall be transferred to the unassigned fund balance of
the General Fund of the District of Columbia.”.
(3) A new subsection (d) is added to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
(b) This section shall apply as of September 30, 2026.
Sec. 7094. Early Childhood Educator Pay Equity Fund (1010213)
Section 5102(d) of the Early Childhood Educator Pay Equity Fund Establishment Act of
2021, effective November 13, 2021 (D.C. Law 24-45; D.C. Official Code § 1-325.431(d)), is
amended to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7095. Eastern Market Enterprise Fund (1060206)
Section 4 of the Eastern Market Real Property Asset Management and Outdoor Vending
Act of 1998, effective April 16, 1999 (D.C. Law 12-228; D.C. Official Code § 37-103), is
amended as follows:
(a) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 4. Eastern Market Enterprise Fund.”.
(b) Subsections (a) and (b) are amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Eastern Market Enterprise Fund (“Fund”),
which shall be administered by the Department of General Services in accordance with
subsections (d) and (e) of this section.
138

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(b) All revenues, proceeds, and moneys from whatever source derived that are collected
or received by the Department of General Services on behalf of Eastern Market shall be
deposited into the Fund.”.
(c) Subsection (f) is amended to read as follows:
“(f) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7096. Emancipation Day Fund (1010038)
Section 4(b) of the District of Columbia Emancipation Day Parade and Fund Act of 2004,
effective March 16, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-240; D.C. Official Code § 1-183(b)), is amended to read
as follows:
“(b) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7097. Employees’ Compensation Fund (1010094)
Section 2342 of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit Personnel
Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-139; D.C. Official Code § 1-623.42), is
amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a)(2) is repealed.
(b) New subsections (c), (d), (e), and (f) are added to read as follows:
“(c) There is established as a special fund the Employees’ Compensation Fund (“Fund”),
which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (e) of this section.
“(d) The following revenue shall be deposited into the Fund:
“(1) Such amounts as may be appropriated to or transferred to the Fund; and
“(2) Amounts that otherwise accrue to the Fund under this act or other law.
“(e) Money in the Fund shall be used for the payment of compensation and other benefits
and expenses incurred to implement the provisions of this title.
“(f)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.”.
139

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7098. Fair Elections Fund (1010015)
Section 332i(d) of the Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment
and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Amendment Act of 2011, effective May 5, 2018 (D.C. Law
22-94; D.C. Official Code § 1-1163.32i(d)), is amended to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7099. Green Building Fund (1060279)
Section 8(d) of the Green Building Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-
234; D.C. Official Code § 6-1451.07(d)), is amended to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7100. Hazardous Waste and Toxic Chemical Source Reduction Fund (1060187)
Section 21a(d) of the District of Columbia Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1977,
effective December 3, 2020 (D.C. Law 23-149; D.C. Official Code § 8-1319.01(d)), is amended
to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7101. Health Occupations Regulation Fund (1060151)
(a) The Department of Health Functions Clarification Act of 2001, effective October 3,
2001 (D.C. Law 14-28; D.C. Official Code § 7-731 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 4902(b) (D.C. Official Code § 7-733(b) is amended by striking the phrase
“Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs” and inserting the phrase “Department of
Licensing and Consumer Protection” in its place.
(b) Section 4904 (D.C. Official Code § 7-733) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsections (a) and (b) are amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Health Occupations Regulation Fund
(“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (b-1) of this
section.
140

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(b) All licensing fees and civil fines relating to the practice of health occupations in the
District of Columbia shall be deposited into the Fund; except, that the Basic Business License
Fee collected by the Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection for the activities
described in section 4902 shall be deposited into the Basic Business License Fund established by
D.C. Official Code § 47-2851.13.”.
(2) A new subsection (b-1) is added to read as follows:
“(b-1) Money in the Fund shall be used by the Mayor for the operation of the boards
established pursuant to the District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985,
effective March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-99; D.C. Official Code § 3-1201.01 et seq.), including all
salaries and all other expenses necessary in carrying out the duties of the boards.”.
(3) Subsection (d) is repealed.
(4) A new subsection (e) is added to read as follows:
“(e)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.”.
Sec. 7102. Healthy DC and Health Care Expansion Fund (1011007)
Section 15b of the Hospital and Medical Services Corporation Regulatory Act of 1996,
effective March 2, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-192; D.C. Official Code § 31-3514.02), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Healthy DC and Health Care Expansion
Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (a-1) of
this section.”.
(b) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) Money in the Fund shall be used to support the Healthy DC Program, established
by section 5042 of the Healthy DC Act of 2008, effective August 16, 2008 (D.C. Law 17-219;
D.C. Official Code § 4-632), and other medical assistance programs administered by the
Department of Health Care Finance.”.
(c) Subsection (c) is repealed.
(d) Subsection (d) is amended by striking the phrase “subsection (a)” and inserting the
phrase “subsection (a-1)” in its place.
(e) A new subsection (e) is added to read as follows:
“(e) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
141

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7103. Historic Landmark-District Protection Fund (1060236)
Section 11a(c) of the Historic Landmark and Historic District Protection Act of 1978,
effective November 16, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-185; D.C. Official Code § 6-1110.01(c)), is amended
to read as follows:
“(c) Any money remaining available in the HLP Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as
determined by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the
unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal
year-end close.”.
Sec. 7104. Home Purchase Assistance Fund (1060027)
The Home Purchase Assistance Fund Act of 1978, effective September 12, 1978 (D.C.
Law 2-103; D.C. Official Code § 42-2601 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 42-2601), is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 2. Home Purchase Assistance Fund.
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Home Purchase Assistance Fund (“Fund”),
to be administered by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.
“(b) The following revenue shall be deposited in the Fund:
“(1) Such amounts as may be appropriated to the Fund;
“(2) Grants and gifts from public and private sources to the Fund or to the District
of Columbia for the purposes of the Fund;
“(3) Repayments of principal and any interest on loans provided from the Fund;
“(4) Proceeds realized from the liquidation of any security interests held by the
District of Columbia under the terms of any assistance provided from the Fund;
“(5) Interest earned from the deposit or investment of monies of the Fund;
“(6) Repayments of principal and any interest on loans provided under the District
of Columbia Government Employer-Assisted Housing Program; and
“(7) All other revenues, receipts, and fees of whatever nature derived from the
operation of the Fund.
“(c)(1) Money in the Fund shall be used to provide financial assistance to low and
moderate income persons, and District government employees participating in the District of
Columbia Employer-Assisted Housing Program, and families seeking to purchase homes in the
District of Columbia, for the purposes of enabling them to purchase decent, safe, and sanitary
homes in the District of Columbia.
142

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(2) Money in the Fund shall also be available for the purpose of providing
financial assistance for down payments or interim financing to recipients for the purpose of
purchasing or securing housing, including single family homes, condominium units, or
occupancy rights to cooperative housing in the District of Columbia as their principal place of
residence and of providing financial assistance to District of Columbia government employees
eligible under the District of Columbia Employer-Assisted Housing Program to purchase a home
in the District of Columbia.
“(3) Under terms and conditions prescribed by the Mayor, the Fund may be used
for making loans and providing other forms of financial assistance. The assistance provided
pursuant to the Fund may be used in conjunction with other available home-assistance programs.
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 42-2602) is repealed.
(c) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 42-2603) is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 4. Dashboard; continuing eligibility.”.
(2) Subsection (a) is repealed.
Sec. 7105. Indoor Mold Assessment Fund (1060155)
Section 308(d) of the Air Quality Amendment Act of 2014, effective September 9, 2014
(D.C. Law 20-135; D.C. Official Code § 8-241.07(d)), is amended to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7106. Interim Disability Assistance Fund (1060039)
Section 409 of the District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982, effective October
1, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-190; D.C. Official Code § 4-204.09), is amended to read as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Interim Disability Assistance Fund
(“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (a-2) of this
section.”.
(b) New subsections (a-1) and (a-2) are added to read as follows:
“(a-1) The amounts described in section 407(e-1) shall be deposited in the Fund.
143

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(a-2) Money in the Fund shall be used solely for the purpose of implementing the
Interim Disability Assistance program established by section 407.”.
(c) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b)(1) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not
revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end
of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.”.
Sec. 7107. Lead Service Line Replacement Fund (1010181)
Section 6019b(i)(4) of the Lead Service Line Priority Replacement Assistance Act of
2004, effective March 13, 2019 (D.C. Law 22-241; D.C. Official Code § 34-2159(i)(4)), is
amended to read as follows:
“(4) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as
determined by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the
unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal
year-end close.”.
Sec. 7108. Lobbyist Administration and Enforcement Fund (1060029)
Section 227(c) of the Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and
Comprehensive Ethics Reform Amendment Act of 2011, effective April 27, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-
124; D.C. Official Code § 1-1162.27(c)), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “the Board. The funds in the Lobbyist
Fund shall be used by the Board solely for the purpose of administering and enforcing this title.”
and inserting the phrase “the Board.” in its place.
(b) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) All fees collected under subsection (b) of this section by the Board shall be
deposited into the Lobbyist Fund.”.
(c) New paragraphs (3) and (4) are added to read as follows:
“(3) The funds in the Lobbyist Fund shall be used by the Board solely for the
purpose of administering and enforcing this title.
“(4)(A) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall
not revert to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the
end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
“(B) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan,
any funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year
limitation.”.
144

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7109. Medicaid Collections- 3rd Party Liability (1060128)
Section 4 of the Medicaid Provider Fraud Prevention Amendments Act of 1984, effective
March 16, 1985 (D.C. Law 5-193; D.C. Official Code § 4-803), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (e) is amended by striking the phrase “the Corporation Counsel. Amounts
recovered under this section shall be paid to the District of Columbia Treasurer and allocated,
first, to reimburse the Medicaid program and, then, to the General Fund of the District of
Columbia.” and inserting the phrase “the Attorney General.” in its place.
(b) A new subsection (i) is added to read as follows:
“(i)(1) There is established as a special fund the Medicaid Provider Fraud Reimbursement
Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with paragraph (3) of
this subsection.
“(2) Amounts recovered under this section shall be deposited in the Fund.
“(3) Money in the Fund shall be used to reimburse the Medicaid program when
the payment from Medicaid funds that is being reimbursed:
“(A) Was based on an instance of Medicaid provider fraud; or
“(B) Should be or should have been paid by a third-party insurer.
“(4) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as
determined by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the
unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal
year-end close.”.
Sec. 7110. Medical Cannabis Administration (1060389)
Section 9a(d) of the Legalization of Marijuana for Medical Treatment Initiative of 1999,
effective December 3, 2020 (D.C. Law 23-149; D.C. Official Code § 7-1671.08a(d)), is amended
to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7111. Medical Examiner Pathology and Toxicology (1060021)
Section 1918c(d) of the Establishment of the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner Act
of 2000, effective November 13, 2021 (D.C. Law 24-45; D.C. Official Code § 5-1420(d)), is
amended to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
145

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7112. Municipal Aggregation Fund (1060314)
Section 115 of the Retail Electric Competition and Consumer Protection Act of 1999,
effective May 9, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-107; D.C. Official Code § 34-1515), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a)(1A)(A) is repealed.
(b) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1)(1) There is established as a special fund the Municipal Aggregation Fund
(“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with paragraph (3) of this
subsection.
“(2) The funds collected under subsection (a)(1A)(B) of this section shall be
deposited in the Fund.
“(3) Money in the Fund shall be used solely to pay the costs of the formation and
administration of municipal aggregation contracts of the District.
“(4) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as
determined by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the
unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal
year-end close.”.
Sec. 7113. OCTFME Special Account (1060009)
Section 203 of the Office of Cable Television, Film, Music, and Entertainment
Amendment Act of 2015, effective October 9, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-193; D.C. Official Code § 34-
1252.03), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the OCTFME Special Account (“Account”),
which shall be administered by the Director of OCTFME in accordance with subsection (e) of
this section.”.
(b) Subsections (b) and (c) are repealed.
(c) Subsection (d) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “Deposits into the
special account shall include” and inserting the phrase “The following revenue shall be deposited
in the Account” in its place.
(2) A new paragraph (4A) is added to read as follows:
“(4A) All other revenues owed and accruing to the District from the
establishment, regulation, and operation of industries under this act.”.
(3) Paragraph (5) is repealed.
146

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(d) New subsections (e) and (f) are added to read as follows:
“(e) Money in the Account shall be used for the uses and purposes set forth in this act.
“(f) Any money remaining available in the Account at the end of a fiscal year, as
determined by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the
unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal
year-end close.”.
Sec. 7114. Office of Veterans Affairs Fund (1060007)
Section 705 of the Office of Veterans Affairs Establishment Act of 2001, effective
October 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 14-28; D.C. Official Code § 49-1004), is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 705. Office of Veterans Affairs Fund.
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Office of Veterans Affairs Fund (“Fund”),
which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.
“(b) Special purpose revenue received for the Office, including fees received by the
Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to sections 2a(b)(2) and 2b(b)(1) of Title IV of the
District of Columbia Revenue Act of 1937, approved August 17, 1937 (50 Stat. 679; D.C.
Official Code §§ 50-1501.02a(b)(2) and 50-1501.02b(b)(1)), shall be deposited in the Fund.
“(c) Money in the Fund shall be used for the purposes and functions described in this act.
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7115. Parks and Recreation Fund (1060026)
(a) Section 4 of the Recreation Act of 1994, effective March 23, 1995 (D.C. Law 10-246;
D.C. Official Code § 10-303), is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 4. Parks and Recreation Fund.”.
(2) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Parks and Recreation Fund (“Fund”), which
shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.”.
(3) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) The following revenue shall be deposited in the Fund:
“(1) Payments of fees imposed for the use of parks, recreation centers, and other
facilities of the Department of Parks and Recreation;
“(2) Payments pursuant to concession contracts of the Department of Parks and
Recreation;
147

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3) Payments for concessions operated by the Department of Parks and
Recreation;
“(4) Payments to the Department of Parks and Recreation for services provided by
the Department to outside entities;
“(5) Payments by developers seeking relief from zoning laws by way of the
planned unit development process considered part of the required community benefits package of
the proposed planned unit development; and
“(6) Fees collected pursuant to section 2f(b)(1) of Title IV of the District of
Columbia Revenue Act of 1937, effective November 27, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-185; D.C. Official
Code § 50-1501.02f(b)(1)).”.
(4) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
(5) Subsection (d) is repealed.
(6) Subsection (f) is repealed.
(b) Title IV of the District of Columbia Revenue Act of 1937, approved August 17, 1937
(50 Stat. 679; D.C. Official Code § 50-1501.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(1) Section 2g(b)(2) (D.C. Official Code § 50-1501.02g(b)(2)) is amended by
striking the phrase “Recreation Enterprise Fund” and inserting the phrase “Parks and Recreation
Fund” in its place.
(2) Section 3(d)(9) (D.C. Official Code § 50-1501.03(d)(9)) is amended by
striking the phrase “Recreation Enterprise Fund” and inserting the phrase “Parks and Recreation
Fund” in its place.
Sec. 7116. Pesticide Registration Fund (1060366)
Section 9a(d) of the Pesticide Education and Control Amendment Act of 2012, effective
December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 8-438.01(d)), is amended to read as
follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7117. Private Security Camera Incentive Fund (1010043)
148

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Section 215(d) of the Neighborhood Engagement Achieves Results Amendment Act of
2016, effective June 30, 2016 (D.C. Law 21-125; D.C. Official Code § 7-2832(d)), is amended to
read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7118. Product Stewardship Fund (1060159)
Section 127(d) of the Sustainable Solid Waste Management Amendment Act of 2014,
effective December 13, 2017 (D.C. Law 22-33; D.C. Official Code § 1-325.381(d)), is amended
to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7119. Public Vehicles-for-Hire Consumer Service Fund (1060381)
Section 20a of the Department of For-Hire Vehicles Establishment Act of 1985, effective
May 10, 1988 (D.C. Law 7-107; D.C. Official Code § 50-301.20), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “within the District of
Columbia Treasury a fiduciary fund to be known as the Public Vehicles-for-Hire Consumer
Service Fund. The Fund shall be a revolving, segregated, nonlapsing fund administered by the
DFHV.” and inserting the phrase “as a special fund the Public Vehicles-for-Hire Consumer
Service Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by DFHV in accordance with subsection (b)
of this section.” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (4) is repealed.
(3) A new paragraph (4A) is added to read as follows:
“(4A) Such assessment as may levied by DFHV on taxicab and public vehicle-
for-hire operators, for the purpose of providing funds for the authorized uses of the Fund;”.
(b) Subsection (b)(2) is repealed.
(c) Subsection (c) is repealed.
(d) Subsection (h) is amended to read as follows:
“(h) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
149

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
(e) Subsection (k) is repealed.
Sec. 7120. Recorder of Deeds Automation Fund (1060052)
Section 3 of An Act Providing for expenses of the offices of recorder of deeds and
register of wills of the District of Columbia, effective April 12, 1997 (D.C. Law 11-257; D.C.
Official Code § 42-1214), is amended as follows:
(a) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “Automation and Infrastructure
Improvement” and inserting the phrase “Automation Improvement” in its place.
(b) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Recorder of Deeds Automation Fund
(“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Chief Financial Officer in accordance with
subsections (b) and (b-1) of this section.”.
(c) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) Notwithstanding section 1, the following revenue shall be deposited in the Fund:
“(1) All funds collected pursuant to section 552a of An Act To establish a code of
law for the District of Columbia, effective April 12, 1997 (D.C. Law 11-257; D.C. Official Code
§ 42-1211);
“(2) Costs and charges collected under D.C. Official Code § 47-876; and
“(3) Charges collected under D.C. Official Code § 47-1340(h).”.
(d) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7121. Renewable Energy Development Fund (1060174)
Section 8 of the Renewable Energy Portfolio Standard Act of 2004, effective April 12,
2005 (D.C. Law 15-340; D.C. Official Code § 34-1436), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Renewable Energy Development Fund
(“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Director of DOEE in accordance with subsections
(b), (c), and (e) of this section.”.
(b) Subsection (b)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “The Fund established by this
section shall be administered by DOEE. The DOEE may” and inserting the phrase “DOEE may”
in its place.
150

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(c) The lead-in language of subsection (d) is amended by striking the phrase “Proceeds
for the Fund shall be collected from the following:” and inserting the phrase “The following
revenue shall be deposited in the Fund:” in its place.
(d) A new subsection (h) is added to read as follows:
“(h) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7122. Resident Welfare Account (1060033)
The Inmate Welfare Fund Establishment Act of 2006, effective March 2, 2007 (D.C. Law
16-192; D.C. Official Code § 24-281 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 3003 (D.C. Official Code § 24-282) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsections (a), (b), and (c) are amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Resident Welfare Fund (“Fund”), which
shall be administered by the Director of the Department of Corrections in accordance with
section 3004.
“(b) Monies derived from the sale of goods through the commissary at correctional
facilities shall be deposited in the Fund.
“(c) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
(2) Subsections (d) and (e) are repealed.
(b) Section 3004 (D.C. Official Code § 24-283) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the phrase “;
and” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is repealed.
Sec. 7123. Soil Erosion and Sediment Control Fund (1060365)
Section 10c(d) of the Water Pollution Control Act of 1984, effective December 13, 2017
(D.C. Law 22-33; D.C. Official Code § 8-103.09c(d)), is amended to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
151

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7124. Solid Waste Diversion Fund (1060286)
Section 112(d) of the Sustainable Solid Waste Management Amendment Act of 2014,
effective February 26, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-154; D.C. Official Code § 8-1031.12(d)), is amended
to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7125. St. Elizabeths East Campus Redevelopment Fund (1011016)
Section 2042(d) of the St. Elizabeths East Campus Redevelopment Fund Establishment
Act of 2017, effective December 13, 2017 (D.C. Law 22-33; D.C. Official Code § 1-325.361(d)),
is amended to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7126. State Athletic Activities, Programs, and Office Fund (1060106)
Section 4033(d) of the State Athletic Activities, Programs, and Office Fund Act of 2013,
effective December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 38-2672(d)), is amended to
read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7127. Subrogation Fund (1060146)
Section 2 of the Subrogation Fund Establishment Act of 2018, effective July 3, 2018
(D.C. Law 22-122; D.C. Official Code § 1-325.391), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (b)(2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) Revenue arising from subrogation claims brought by or on behalf of the
Chief Risk Officer, including revenue arising from subrogation claims referred by the Chief Risk
Officer to the Office of the Attorney General for prosecution.”.
(b) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
152

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7128. Targeted Homeowner Grant Program (1010107)
Section 11b of the Historic Landmark and Historic District Protection Act of 1978,
effective March 2, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-189; D.C. Official Code § 6-1110.02), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (k) is repealed.
(b) A new subsection (l) is added to read as follows:
“(l)(1) There is established as a special fund the Targeted Homeowner Grant Fund
(“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with paragraph (3) of this
subsection.
“(2) There shall be deposited in the Fund any funds appropriated for the purposes
of the targeted homeowner grant program (“Program”) authorized to be established by
subsection (a) of this section.
“(3) Money in the Fund shall be used to:
“(A) Fund grants issued under the Program; and
“(B) Pay the costs of administering the Program; provided, that no more
than 5% of the amount of the money authorized for expenditure from the Fund in a fiscal year
may be expended in that fiscal year for this purpose.
“(4) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as
determined by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the
unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal
year-end close.”.
Sec. 7129. Tree Fund (1060300)
Section 107 of the Urban Forest Preservation Act of 2002, effective June 12, 2003 (D.C.
Law 14-309; D.C. Official Code § 8-651.07), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) There is established as a special fund the Tree Fund (“Fund”), which shall be
administered by the Director in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.”.
(b) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) Fees and penalties collected pursuant to this act or any rules established to
implement this act shall be deposited into the Fund.”.
(c) Subsection (c) is repealed.
(d) A new subsection (c-1) is added to read as follows:
153

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c-1) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as
determined by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the
unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal
year-end close.”.
(e) Subsection (d) is repealed.
Sec. 7130. Underground Storage Tank Regulation Fund (1060058)
Section 6a(d) of the District of Columbia Underground Storage Tank Management Act of
1990, effective December 3, 2020 (D.C. Law 23-149; D.C. Official Code § 8-113.05a(d)), is
amended to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7131. Vending Regulations Fund (1060284)
Section 8(b) of the Vending Regulation Act of 2009, effective October 22, 2009 (D.C.
Law 18-71; D.C. Official Code § 37-131.07(b)), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(b)(1) There is established as a special fund the Vending Regulation Fund (“Fund”),
which shall be administered by the Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection in
accordance with paragraph (4) of this subsection.”.
(b) Paragraph (3) is repealed.
(c) A new paragraph (5) is added to read as follows:
“(5) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as
determined by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the
unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal
year-end close.”.
Sec. 7132. Vision Zero Pedestrian and Bicycle Safety Fund (1060340)
Section 9l of the Department of Transportation Establishment Act of 2002, effective
October 22, 2015 (D.C. Law 21-36; D.C. Official Code § 50-921.20), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “Deputy Mayor for Operations and
Infrastructure” and inserting the word “Mayor” in its place.
(b) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
154

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7133. Wage Theft Prevention Fund (1060103)
Section 7a(d) of An Act To provide for the payment and collection of wages in the
District of Columbia, effective February 26, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-157; D.C. Official Code § 32-
1307.01(d)), is amended to read as follows:
“(d) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7134. Walter Reed Redevelopment Fund (1011017)
Section 7(e) of the Walter Reed Development Omnibus Act of 2016, effective May 18,
2016 (D.C. Law 21-119; D.C. Official Code § 2-1227.06(e)), is amended to read as follows:
“(e) Any money remaining available in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year, as determined
by the Chief Financial Officer in the fiscal year-end close, shall be transferred to the unassigned
fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia as part of the fiscal year-end
close.”.
Sec. 7135. Applicability.
Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, this subtitle shall apply as of September 1,
2025.
SUBTITLE I. NON-LAPSING FUND TRANSFERS
Sec. 7141. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Non-Lapsing Fund Transfers Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 7142. (a) Notwithstanding any provisions of law directing the deposit of revenue
into, or limiting the use of funds in, the accounts listed in the following chart, the Chief Financial
Officer shall transfer, in the fiscal years indicated, the following amounts from the certified fund
balances and revenue deposited in the identified special purpose revenue and dedicated tax
accounts to the local fund of the District of Columbia:
Fund FY26 Amount FY27 Amount FY28 Amount FY29 Amount
Agency Fund Name
Number (in $) (in $) (in $) (in $)
AG0 1060013 Accountability Fund (38,614.05) (38,614.05) (38,614.05) (38,614.05)
AG0 1060029 Lobbyist Fund (49,987.95) (49,987.95) (49,987.95) (49,987.95)
155

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Eastern Market
AM0 1060206 (1,307.00) (1,307.00) (1,307.00) (1,307.00)
Enterprise Fund
Special Purpose Fund
AM0 1060193 (94.00) (94.00) (94.00) (94.00)
(Non-DC Agencies)
West End Library/
AM0 1011014 (272,430.00) (287,202.00) (210,226.00) (223,134.00)
Firehouse Maintenance
BA0 1060197 Distribution Fees (7,093.00) (7,093.00) (7,093.00) (7,093.00)
Defined Benefits
BE0 1060091 (1,367.00) (1,367.00) (1,367.00) (1,367.00)
Retirement Program
Reimbursable From
BE0 1060208 (1,402.00) (1,402.00) (1,402.00) (1,402.00)
Other Governments
BX0 1011002 Dedicated Taxes (28,634.78) (699,718.78) (1,608,799.78) (2,536,062.78)
Child Support -
CB0 1060035 TANF/AFDC (4,964.00) (4,964.00) (4,964.00) (4,964.00)
Collections
CB0 1060094 Litigation Support Fund (7,054,057.00) (5,054,057.00) (2,054,057.00) (1,054,057.00)
CB0 1060092 Nuisance Abatement (8,000.00) (7,000.00) (5,000.00) (4,000.00)
Tenant Receivership
CB0 1060415 0.00 (600,000.00) 0.00 0.00
Abatement Fund
Special Purpose
CI0 1060009 (525,116.66) (525,116.66) (525,116.66)
Revenue Fund (525,116.66)
CQ0 1060261 Rental Unit Fee Fund (1,584.00) (1,584.00) (1,584.00) (1,584.00)
Basic Business License
CR0 1060272 (839,563.41) (839,563.41) (839,563.41) (839,563.41)
Fund
Corporate Recordation
CR0 1060283 (1,235,244.89) (1,235,244.89) (1,235,244.89) (1,235,244.89)
Fund
DC Combat Sports
CR0 1060277 (25,000.00) (25,000.00) (25,000.00) (25,000.00)
Commission Fund
OPLA - Special
CR0 1060267 (1,968,404.40) (1,968,404.40) (1,968,404.40) (1,968,404.40)
Account
Real Estate Appraisal
CR0 1060266 (150,000.00) 0.00 (140,000.00) 0.00
Fee
Real Estate Guaranty
CR0 1060265 0.00 (175,000.00) (175,000.00) (175,000.00)
and Education Fund
Vending Regulation
CR0 1060284 (154,574.88) (154,574.88) (154,574.88) (154,574.88)
Fund
Economic Development
EB0 1060131 (2,751.00) (2,732.00) (2,732.00) (2,732.00)
Special Acct
Industrial Revenue
EB0 1060063 (2,732.00) (2,732.00) (2,732.00) (2,732.00)
Bond Program
156

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
St Elizabeths East
EB0 1011016 Campus (446,793.00) (449,793.00) (452,793.00) (451,793.00)
Redevelopment
Reimbursable From
FB0 1060208 0.00 (91.00) (91.00) (91.00)
Other Governments
Corrections Trustee
FL0 1060006 (1,042,898.00) (1,042,898.00) (1,042,898.00) (1,042,898.00)
Reimbursement
Medical Examiner
FX0 1060419 Pathology and (2,701.00) (2,701.00) (2,701.00) (2,701.00)
Toxicology
Enterprise Fund
HA0 1060026 (1,000,000.00) (1,000,000.00) (1,000,000.00) (1,000,000.00)
Account
HC0 1060151 Board of Medicine (1,509,841.14) (4,584,121.14) (4,584,121.14) (4,584,121.14)
HC0 1060133 Pharmacy Protection (8,937.00) (8,937.00) (8,937.00) (8,937.00)
HC0 1060166 SHPDA Admission Fee (3,768.00) (3,768.00) (3,768.00) (3,768.00)
HC0 1060050 SHPDA Fees
(104,633.00) (104,633.00) (104,633.00) (104,633.00)
HC0 1060053 Vital Records Revenue (13,030.00) (13,030.00) (13,030.00) (13,030.00)
Individual Insurance
HT0 1060386 Market Affordability (5,082,000.00) (5,082,000.00) (5,082,000.00) (5,082,000.00)
and Stability
HT0 1011007 Healthy DC Fund (1,760,322.24) (1,541,682.00) (1,572,515.00) (761,095.00)
Outpatient Hospital
HT0 1011019 Directed Payments (5,031,741.46) (4,738,703.00) (4,833,477.00) (5,322,705.00)
Provider Fee Fund
Air Quality
KG0 1060363 (3,352.00) (3,352.00) (3,352.00) (3,352.00)
Construction Permits
Benchmarking
KG0 1060318 (63,146.90) (63,146.90) (63,146.90) (63,146.90)
Enforcement Fund
KG0 1060368 Economy II Fund (12,892.00) (12,892.00) (12,892.00) (12,892.00)
Energy Assistance
KG0 1060330 (51,352.00) (51,352.00) (51,352.00) (51,352.00)
Trust Fund
KG0 1060036 Fishing License (1,200.00) (1,200.00) (1,200.00) (1,200.00)
Hazardous Generator
KG0 1060187 (17,185.49) (17,185.49) (17,185.49) (17,185.49)
Fees
Lead Poisoning
KG0 1060181 (150,000.00) (150,000.00) (150,000.00) (150,000.00)
Prevention Fund
Pesticide Product
KG0 1060366 (47,517.25) (47,517.25) (47,517.25) (47,517.25)
Registration
157

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Renewable Energy
KG0 1060174 (7,992.00) (7,992.00) (7,992.00) (7,992.00)
Development Fund
Residential Aid
KG0 1060369 (6,063.67) (6,063.67) (6,063.67) (6,063.67)
Discount
Residential Essential
KG0 1060370 (42,110.78) (42,110.78) (42,110.78) (42,110.78)
Services
Soil Erosion/ Sediment
KG0 1060365 (20,147.46) (20,147.46) (20,147.46) (20,147.46)
Control
KG0 1060154 Storm Water Fees (2,512.00) (2,512.00) (2,512.00) (2,512.00)
Underground Storage
KG0 1060058 (580.00) (580.00) (580.00) (580.00)
Tank Fines and Fees
General “O” Type
KV0 1060260 (401,647.00) (401,647.00) (401,647.00) (401,647.00)
Revenue Sources
Motor Vehicle
KV0 1060310 (16,560.00) (16,560.00) (16,560.00) (16,560.00)
Inspection Station
ABC - Import and
LQ0 1060374 (69,322.00) (69,322.00) (69,322.00) (69,322.00)
Class License Fees
Medical Cannabis
LQ0 1060389 (8,697.00) (8,697.00) (8,697.00) (8,697.00)
Administration Fund
RJ0 1060146 Subrogation Fund (4,411.00) (4,411.00) (4,411.00) (4,411.00)
DMH Federal
RM0 1060070 Beneficiary (800,000.00) (800,000.00) (800,000.00) (800,000.00)
Reimbursement
SR0 1060240 HMO Assessment (7,066.00) (7,066.00) (7,066.00) (7,066.00)
SR0 1060242 Insurance Assessment (32,639.00) (32,639.00) (32,639.00) (32,639.00)
Public Vehicles-for-
TC0 1060381 (287,777.64) (287,777.64) (287,777.64) (287,777.64)
Hire Consumer Service
TO0 1060195 SERV US Program (91.00) (94.00) (94.00) (94.00)
(b) The amounts identified in subsection (a) of this section shall be made available as set
forth in the approved Fiscal Year 2026 Budget and Financial Plan.
SUBTITLE J. CLEAN HANDS TECHNICAL AMENDMENT
Sec. 7151. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Clean Hands Certification Technical Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 7152. Section 47-2862(a)(7) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended to
read as follows:
158

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(7) Owes the District, other than amounts owed to the Department of Motor
Vehicles, more than $1,000 in outstanding fines, penalties, or interest;”.
SUBTITLE K. NONPROFIT WORKFORCE HOUSING PROPERTIES
Sec. 7161. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Nonprofit Workforce Housing Properties Tax
Exemption Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 7162. Section 47-1005.03 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “as of the date of acquisition by the nonprofit
owner;” and insert a semicolon in its place.
(B) Strike the phrase “provided further, that beginning no later than 12
months following the date of such acquisition, each of the following requirements has been
certified as having been met pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, and thereafter on an annual
basis are recertified as having been met pursuant to subsection (f) of this section:” and insert the
phrase “provided further, that each of the following requirements has been certified as having
been met pursuant to subsection (f) of this section on an annual basis:” in its place.
(2) Paragraphs (1) and (2) are amended to read as follows:
“(1) Not fewer than 50% of the occupied units are occupied by tenants with
household incomes not in excess of 80% of the adjusted median income;
“(2) The remainder of the occupied units are occupied by tenants with household
incomes not in excess of 120% of the adjusted median income;”.
(3) Paragraph (3)(A) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “provided, that the total” and insert the phrase
“provided, that before July 1, 2023, the total” in its place.
(B) Strike the phrase “District of Columbia Housing Authority;” and insert
the phrase “District of Columbia Housing Authority; provided further, that beginning July 1,
2023, the total rent paid to the non-profit landlord for any individual unit shall not exceed the
rent reasonableness maximum determined by the District of Columbia Housing Authority;” in its
place.
(b) Subsection (f) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (E) is repealed.
(B) Subparagraph (F) is amended to read as follows:
159

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(F) Any other information OTR shall require to administer the
exemption, which OTR shall make available in advance on its website to nonprofit owners
seeking the exemption.”.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “applicable tenants” and
inserting the phrase “applicable tenants annually to the nonprofit owner, the District of Columbia
Housing Authority, or the Department of Housing and Community Development” in its place.
(3) A new paragraph (5) is added to read as follows:
“(5) The effective date of an exemption under this section shall be October 1 of
the tax year that OTR verifies the certification submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) of this
subsection; provided, that no exemption shall be available before October 1, 2019.”.
SUBTITLE L. RESERVOIR DISTRICT TAX EXEMPTION
Sec. 7171. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Reservoir District Tax Exemption Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 7172. Chapter 46 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“47-4682. Tax Exemption for Reservoir District; Lots 809, 810, 814, 815, Square 3128.”.
(b) A new section 47-4682 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-4682. Tax Exemption for Reservoir District; Lots 809, 810, 814, 815, Square 3128.
“(a) For the purpose of this section, the term:
“(1) “Owner” means McMillan Parcel 2 Owner, LLC, and McMillan Parcel 4
Owner, LLC, affiliates of LDP Holdings, LLC d/b/a Jair Lynch Real Estate Partners, and its
successors, affiliates, and assigns.
“(2) “Property” means the real property, including any improvements constructed
thereon, at Parcel 2 West and Parcel 4 within the Reservoir District; known for tax and
assessment purposes as Lots 814 and 815 in Square 3128, and Lots 809 and 810 in Square 3128,
respectively.
“(b) Beginning on October 1, 2029, 100% of the real property tax imposed on the
Property pursuant to Chapter 8 of this title shall be exempted for 20 real property tax years;
provided, that the Owner shall:
“(1) Operate or cause to be operated 449 units of housing at the Property;
“(2) Set aside 1/3 of the operating rental housing units in the Property as
affordable and available for households earning an average of 80% of the Area Median Income;
160

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3) Enter into an agreement with the District government that requires the
Owner, or its designee or assignee, to, at a minimum, contract with certified business enterprises
for at least 35% of the contract dollar volume of the construction of the project on the Property,
in accordance with Subchapter IX-A of Chapter 2 of Title 2; and
“(4) By September 30 of the year immediately preceding each tax year in the
exemption period set forth in this subsection, provide the Mayor with information showing what
percentage of each of the requirements for eligibility for the exemption provided in paragraphs
(1) through (3) of this subsection has been met. If the total number of units of housing required
to be provided pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection has not been met, the amount of the
real property tax exemption shall be reduced in equal proportion to the percentage of units of
housing that are not currently operating in the given real property tax year.
“(c) By December 31 of each tax year of the exemption period provided in subsection (b)
of this section, the Mayor shall certify to the Office of Tax and Revenue what percentage of tax
exemption the Property is eligible to receive under this section for that tax year. The Mayor shall
notify the Office of Tax and Revenue if the Property ceases to be eligible for the exemption and
the date such eligibility ceased.
“(d) The exemptions provided by this section shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of,
any other tax relief or assistance from any other source applicable to the Owner or Property.”.
SUBTITLE M. SUBJECT-TO-APPROPRIATION AMENDMENTS
Sec. 7181. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Subject-to-Appropriation Emergency Amendment Act
of 2025”.
Sec. 7182. Section 301(a) of the Birth-to-Three for All DC Act of 2018, effective
October 30, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-179; 65 DCR 9569), is amended by striking the phrase “Sections
102(g)(3), (4), and (5), 104, 106(b)(2)” and inserting the phrase “Sections 106(b)(2)” in its place.
Sec. 7183. Section 4 of the Postpartum Coverage Expansion Amendment Act of 2020,
effective October 20, 2020 (D.C. Law 23-132; 67 DCR 9887), is revived as of October 1, 2025,
and amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 4. Applicability.
“(a) Amendatory section 3a in section 2(b) shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its
fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.
“(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect
in an approved budget and financial plan and provide notice to the Budget Director of the
Council of the certification.
161

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c)(1) The Budget Director of the Council shall cause the notice of the certification to be
published in the District of Columbia Register.
“(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of the provision identified in subsection (a) of this section.”.
Sec. 7184. Section 3 of the Home Visiting Services Reimbursement Amendment Act of
2024, effective March 23, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-142; 71 DCR 1474), is revived as of October 1,
2025, and amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 3. Applicability
“(a) This act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
budget and financial plan.
“(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect
in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the
Council of the certification.
“(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
the District of Columbia Register.
“(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of this act.”.
Sec. 7185. Section 3(a) of the School Improvement Amendment Act of 2023, effective
March 23, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-147; 71 DCR 1443), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(1) Strike the phrase “Paragraphs (1), (2), (4), and (5) and insert the phrase
“Paragraph (2)” in its place.
(2) Strike the phrase “their effect” and insert the phrase “its effect” in its place.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “their fiscal effect” and inserting the
phrase “its fiscal effect” in its place.
(c) Subsection (c)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “of the provisions” and inserting
the phrase “of the provision” in its place.
Sec. 7186. Section 8 of the Strengthening Traffic Enforcement, Education, and
Responsibility (“STEER”) Amendment Act of 2024, effective April 20, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-161;
71 DCR 2248), is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 8. Applicability.
“(a)(1) Amendatory section 9a(b) in section 2 shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its
fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.
162

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect
in an approved budget and financial plan and provide notice to the Budget Director of the
Council of the certification.
“(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
the District of Columbia Register.
“(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of the provision identified in subsection (a) of this section.
“(d) Sections 3, 4(d) and (f), 5, and 6 shall apply as of January 1, 2027.”.
Sec. 7187. Section 10 of the Open Movie Captioning Requirement Amendment
Act of 2024, effective July 19, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-190; 71 DCR 6693), is revived as of
October 1, 2025, and amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 10. Applicability.
“(a) Section 8 shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an
approved budget and financial plan.
“(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal
effect in an approved budget and financial plan and provide notice to the Budget Director
of the Council of the certification.
“(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be
published in the District of Columbia Register.
“(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not
affect the applicability of the provision identified in subsection (a) of this section.”.
Sec. 7188. (a) The Insurance Database Amendment Act of 2024, effective March 7, 2025
(D.C. Law 25-264; 72 DCR 343), is amended as follows:
(1) Sections 401 and 402 are redesignated as sections 402 and 403.
(2) A new section 401 is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 401. Applicability.
“(a) Titles I and II shall apply upon the date of inclusion of their fiscal effect in an
approved budget and financial plan.
“(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect
in an approved budget and financial plan and provide notice to the Budget Director of the
Council of the certification.
“(c)(1) The Budget Director of the Council shall cause the notice of the certification to be
published in the District of Columbia Register.
“(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of the provisions identified in subsection (a) of this section.”.
163

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) This section shall apply as of July 15, 2025.
Sec. 7189. Section 3 of the Child Behavioral Health Services Dashboard Amendment Act
of 2024, effective March 7, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-279; 72 DCR 14500), is repealed.
Sec. 7190. Section 3 of the Ranked Choice Voting and Open the Primary Elections to
Independent Voters Act of 2024, effective March 7, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-295; 71 DCR 15797), is
amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 3. Applicability.
“(a) Section 2(b)(1) and (d) shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an
approved budget and financial plan.
“(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect
in an approved budget and financial plan and provide notice to the Budget Director of the
Council of the certification.
“(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
the District of Columbia Register.
“(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of the provision identified in subsection (a) of this section.”.
Sec. 7191. Section 4 of the Containing Litter and Ensuring Adequate
Neighborhood (CLEAN) Collections Amendment Act of 2024, effective March 21, 2025
(D.C. Law 25-297; 72 DCR 720), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) Section 2(d) shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an
approved budget and financial plan.”.
(b) Subsection (c)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “this act” and inserting the
phrase “the provision identified in subsection (a) of this section” in its place.
Sec. 7192. Section 3 of the Fairness in Human Rights Administration Amendment
Act of 2024, effective March 21, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-300; 72 DCR 737), is repealed.
Sec. 7193. Section 4 of the Carrier-for-Hire Oversight and Enforcement
Amendment Act of 2024, effective March 21, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-301; 72 DCR 742), is
repealed.
164

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7194. Section 6 of the Enhancing Mental Health Crisis Support and Hospitalization
Amendment Act of 2024, effective March 21, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-304; 72 DCR 790), is
repealed.
Sec. 7195. Section 7 of the Public Life and Activity Zones Amendment (“PLAZA”) Act
of 2024, effective March 21, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-312; 72 DCR 1085), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “Sections 3(b), 4, and 5 shall apply”
and inserting the phrase “Amendatory section 202(e)(1) in section 3(b) shall apply” in its place.
(b) Subsection (c)(2) is amended by striking the word “provisions” and inserting the word
“provision” in its place.
Sec. 7196. Section 7 of the Recidivism Reduction at DYRS Amendment Act of 2024,
effective March 28, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-321; 72 DCR 1117), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “Sections 2, 3, 4, and 5” and
inserting the phrase “Section 2” in its place.
(b) Subsection (c)(2) is amended by striking the word “provisions” and inserting the word
“provision” in its place.
Sec. 7197. Section 4 of the Certificate of Need Improvement Amendment Act of 2025,
effective June 10, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-7; 72 DCR 4878), is repealed.
Sec. 7198. The Farmers Market Support Amendment Act of 2025, enacted on July
7, 2025 (D.C. Act 26-95; 72 DCR 7661), is amended as follows:
(a) The lead-in language of amendatory section 4939(d) in section 2 is amended
by striking the figure “$250,000” and inserting the figure “$140,000” in its place.
(b) Section 5 is repealed.
Sec. 7199. Section 3 of the Board of Trustees Training Amendment Act of 2025, enacted
on July 21, 2025 (D.C. Act 26-112; 72 DCR 8156), is repealed.
SUBTITLE N. RULE 736 REPEALS
Sec. 7201. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Rule 736 Repeals Emergency Amendment Act of
2025”.
165

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7202. (a) Section 112e of Title I of the Sustainable Solid Waste Management
Amendment Act of 2014, effective March 16, 2021 (D.C. Law 23-211; D.C. Official Code § 8-
1031.12e), is repealed.
(b) Section 2(b)(2) of the Zero Waste Omnibus Amendment Act of 2020, effective March
16, 2021 (D.C. Law 23-211; 68 DCR 68), is repealed.
Sec. 7203. The Procurement Agencies Alignment Amendment Act of 2022, effective
September 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-169; 69 DCR 9204), is repealed.
Sec. 7204. Section 1204a(b) of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive
Merit Personnel Act, effective December 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-212; D.C. Official Code § 1-
612.04a(b)), is repealed.
Sec. 7205. Section 10d(a) of the Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of
1986, effective December 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-213; D.C. Official Code § 6-1413(a)), is
repealed.
Sec. 7206. The Bedbug Control Act of 2022, effective February 23, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-
238; 69 DCR 14738), is repealed.
Sec. 7207. The Limited Equity Cooperative Property Tax Assistance Amendment Act of
2022, effective February 23, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-244; 69 DCR 15094), is repealed.
Sec. 7208. The Whitman-Walker Entities at St. Elizabeths Tax Rebate Amendment Act
of 2022, effective February 23, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-260; 69 DCR 15088), is repealed.
Sec. 7209. Section 208(f-7) of the District of Columbia Procurement Practices Act of
1985, effective February 21, 1986, (D.C. Law 6-85; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.115a(f-7)), is
repealed.
Sec. 7210. The No Senior Hungry Omnibus Amendment Act of 2022, effective March
10, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-294; 70 DCR 560), is repealed.
Sec. 7211. Section 5084(b) of the Food Stamp Expansion Act of 2009, effective February
26, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-155; D.C. Official Code § 4-261.04(b)), is repealed.
SUBTITLE O. NONPROFIT SOLAR TAX EXEMPTION
166

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7221. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Nonprofit Solar Tax Exemption Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 7222. Section 47-1005 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by
adding a new subsection (e) to read as follows:
“(e)(1) This section shall not apply to buildings or grounds used for solar energy
generation, energy storage, solar energy management activities that comply with Energy Star
guidelines, or electric vehicle charging.
“(2) For the purpose of this subsection, the term:
“(A) “Solar energy management activities” means activity intended to
monitor, control, and optimize solar energy consumption to improve efficiency, reduce costs, and
minimize environmental impacts.
“(B) “Energy storage” means the collection and storage of energy
generated by solar panels for later use, customarily through the use of battery energy storage
systems.”.
SUBTITLE P. PARKSIDE TAX EXEMPTION ACT
Sec. 7231. Short title
This subtitle may be cited as the “Parkside Exemption Emergency Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 7232. Chapter 46 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“47-4683. Tax Exemption for Parkside Lots 866 and 868, Square 5056.”.
(b) A new section 47-4683 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-4683. Tax Exemption for Parkside; Lots 866 and 868, Square 5056.
“(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the real property described as Lots 866 and
868 in Square 5056 shall be allowed an annual real property tax abatement equal to the amount
of the real property taxes assessed and imposed pursuant to Chapter 8 of this title of up to a total
maximum amount for each lot of $300,000 per year for 30 real property tax years commencing
on October 1, 2029.
“(b) For each of the lots subject to this section, the real property tax abatement shall
expire and an abatement shall not be allowed if that lot has not been issued a final certificate of
occupancy by September 30, 2029.
167

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c) The tax abatements and the exemptions from fees and deposits provided pursuant to
this subsection shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other tax relief or assistance from
any other source applicable to the development of Lots 866 and 868, in Square 5056.”.
SUBTITLE Q. REPROGRAMMING AND TAFA AMENDMENTS
Sec. 7241. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Reprogramming and TAFA Emergency Amendment
Act of 2025”.
Sec. 7242. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Chapter 3 is amended as follows:
(1) Section 47-355.05(e)(2)(A)(i)(III) is amended by striking the phrase
“Comptroller source group” and inserting the phrase “Object Class” in its place.
(2) Section 47-361 is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “, as detailed by the Agency field in the financial system.” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “, as detailed by the Fund field in the financial system.” in its place.
(C) Paragraph (4)(A) is amended by striking the phrase “agencies,
programs, agency funding sources, object categories, and object classes” and inserting the phrase
“agencies, cost centers, programs, agency funding sources, object categories, object classes, and
projects (including interagency projects)” in its place.
(D) New paragraphs (6A) and (6B) are added to read as follows:
“(6A) “Cost Center” means the highest level of organizational unit responsible for
managing funds assigned to one or more Programs as detailed by the Cost Center field, without
parent levels, in the financial system.
“(6B) “Financial system” means the District Integrated Financial System.”.
(E) Paragraph (9) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “, as detailed by the Account Category field in the financial system.” in its place.
(F) Paragraph (10) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “, as detailed by the Account field in the financial system.” in its place.
(G) Paragraph (13) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “, without parent levels, in the financial system.” in its place.
(H) Paragraph (14) is amended by striking the phrase “from one program
to another program.” and inserting the phrase “from one program to another program; provided
further, that for purposes of § 47-362(b), the term “reprogramming” shall include budget
168

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
modifications of any amount that otherwise meet the requirements of this paragraph.” in its
place.
(3) Section 47-362 is amended as follows:
(A) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) A reprogramming of any amount shall not be used to:
“(1) Establish new programs or to make or change budget allocations originally
proposed by the Mayor, which the Council specifically denied, limited, or increased in a budget
act, or the accompanying spreadsheets or final data file, or in an act passed pursuant to §§ 47-
369.01 or 47-369.02; or
“(2) Eliminate new programs or allocations specifically provided by the Council
in a budget act, or the accompanying spreadsheets or final data file, or in an act passed pursuant
to §§ 47-369.01 or 47-369.02.”.
(B) Subsection (c) is amended by striking the phrase “Funding for such
section” and inserting the phrase “Funding for such program or project” in its place.
(C) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
“(d) Should unusual circumstances require an exception to subsections (a) through (c) of
this section, a reprogramming request shall be submitted to the Council for approval regardless
of the dollar amount involved, accompanied by a narrative explanation of the unusual
circumstances and the need for an exception.”.
(4) Section 47-363(e)(1) is amended as follows:
(A) A new subparagraph (C-i) is amended to read as follows:
“(C-i) Cost Center;”.
(B) Subparagraph (D) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and
inserting a semicolon in its place.
(C) Subparagraph (E) is amended to read as follows:
“(E) Agency funding sources; and”.
(D) A new subparagraph (F) is added to read as follows:
“(F) Project, including interagency projects, as applicable.”.
(5) Section 47-392.02 is amended by adding a new subsection (j-6) to read as
follows:
“(j-6)(1) Beginning December 30, 2024, and on a quarterly basis thereafter, the Chief
Financial Officer shall submit a report to the Council that includes a statement on the balance
and activities of:
“(A) The Fiscal Stabilization Reserve Account, established by subsection
(j-1) of this section; and
“(B) The Cash Flow Reserve Account, established by subsection (j-2) of
this section.
169

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(2) This reporting may be included in the quarterly report required by § 1-
204.50a(d).”.
(b) Section 47-4701(a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) Before markup by a Council committee, the Chief Financial Officer shall provide a
tax abatement financial analysis (“TAFA”) for a permanent bill that grants an exemption or
abatement of a tax imposed by this title or by § 42-1103, unless the exemption or abatement is
one of general applicability.”.
SUBTITLE R. DC CENTRAL KITCHEN REBATE
Sec. 7251. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “D.C. Central Kitchen, Inc. Tax Rebate Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 7252. Section 47-4674 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (a)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “under the lease” and inserting the
phrase “under its leases” in its place.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “under a lease with the lessor that
was paid, directly or indirectly, by DCCK; except, that the amount of the rebate may not exceed
$208,000 in any given year” and inserting the phrase “under one or more leases with the lessor
that was paid, directly or indirectly, by DCCK” in its place.
(c) Subsection (c)(1) is amended by striking the “A copy of the lease” and inserting the
phrase “Copies of its leases” in its place.
Sec. 7253. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of May 1, 2025.
SUBTITLE S. REVISED REVENUE FUNDING
Sec. 7261. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Revised Revenue Funding Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 7262. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, to the extent that Fiscal Year
2025 local revenues certified in the September 2025 revenue estimate exceed the annual revenue
estimate incorporated in the approved budget and financial plan for Fiscal Year 2025 and Fiscal
Year 2025 revenues exceed actual expenditures as estimated by the Chief Financial Officer no
later than November 15, 2025, these additional revenues shall be allocated and expended in
Fiscal Year 2026 pursuant to the Appropriation of Additional Resources sections of the Fiscal
170

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Year 2026 Local Budget Act of 2025, passed on 2nd reading on July 28, 2025 (Enrolled version
of Bill 26-260), and of the Fiscal Year 2026 Local Budget Emergency Act of 2025, passed on
emergency basis on July 28, 2025 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-262), and pursuant to this section.
(b) The additional revenues shall be allocated as follows:
(1) The first $5,500,000 of one-time funds shall be allocated to the Office of the
State Superintendent of Education to be spent on the Childcare Subsidy Program in Fiscal Year
2026;
(2) The next $1,500,000 of one-time funds shall be allocated to the Early
Childhood Educator Pay Equity Fund at the Office of the State Superintendent in Fiscal Year
2026;
(3) The next $10,000,000 of one-time funds shall be allocated to the Housing
Production Trust Fund to be spent on housing preservation in Fiscal Year 2026;
(4) The next $3,500,000 of one-time funds shall be allocated to the Department of
Forensic Sciences for in-house DNA testing in Fiscal Year 2026;
(5) The next $500,000 of recurring funds shall be allocated to the Department of
Healthcare Finance in each of Fiscal Years 2026, 2027, 2028, and 2029 to increase the Medicaid
personal needs allowance;
(6) The next $2,950,715 of one-time funds shall be allocated to the Department of
Human Services to be spent on the Emergency Rental Assistance Program in Fiscal Year 2026;
(7) The next $1,000,000 of one-time funds shall be allocated to the Department of
Housing and Community Development to supplement its Housing Preservation Fund in Fiscal
Year 2026;
(8) The next $1,000,000 of one-time funds shall be allocated to the District of
Columbia Public Charter School Board to be spent on lead-pipe testing in charter schools in
Fiscal Year 2026;
(9) The next $1,893,863 of funds shall be allocated to repeal section 401 of the
Amplified Sound Mitigation Regulation Amendment Act of 2024, effective March 21, 2025
(D.C. Law 25-313; 72 DCR 1095), as follows:
(A) $608,000 in Fiscal Year 2026;
(B) $419,874 in Fiscal Year 2027;
(C) $428,561 in Fiscal Year 2028; and
(D) $437,429 in Fiscal Year 2029;
(10) The next $638,628 of funds shall be allocated to the Metropolitan Police
Department for housing incentives for police officers as follows:
(A) $459,000 in Fiscal Year 2027; and
(B) $179,628 in Fiscal Year 2028; and
171

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(11) The next $21,538,938 of funds shall be allocated to the Department of Health
Care Finance for the DC Healthcare Alliance program to delay to October 1, 2026, the effective
date to limit the types of services provided by the program to enrollees aged 21 or older under
section 7(a-1)(1) of the Health Care Privatization Amendment Act of 2001, effective July 12,
2001 (D.C. Law 14-18; D.C. Official Code § 7-1405(a-1)(1)).
Sec. 7263. By November 15, 2025, the Chief Financial Officer shall certify:
(1) Whether, and by what amount, local Fiscal Year 2025 revenues included in the
revenue estimate exceed the annual revenue estimate incorporated in the approved budget and
financial plan for Fiscal Year 2025;
(2) Whether such excess revenues are in an amount sufficient to meet, in whole or
in part, the requirements of section 7262; and
(3) That all such excess revenues have been set aside and allocated according to
the provisions of section 7262.
Sec. 7264. Applicability.
This subtitle shall apply as of September 1, 2025.
TITLE VIII. TECHNICAL AMENDMENTS
SUBTITLE A. TECHNICAL AMENDMENTS
Sec. 8001. Short title.
This subtitle may be cited as the “Technical Amendments Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 8002. Section 4(r)(4) of the Retail Incentive Act of 2004, effective September 8,
2004 (D.C. Law 15-185; D.C. Official Code § 2-1217.73(r)(4)), is amended by striking the
phrase “Barney Circle, S.E..” and inserting the phrase “Barney Circle, S.E.” in its place.
Sec. 8003. Section 28:9-703(b)(3) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended
by striking the phrase “this article applies are satisfied” and inserting the phrase “this article are
satisfied” in its place.
Sec. 8004. Section 1505(b-10)(7) of the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council for the
District of Columbia Establishment Act of 2001, effective October 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 14-28;
D.C. Official Code § 22-4234(b-10)(7)), is amended by striking the phrase “; provided.” and
inserting a period in its place.
172

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 8005. Section 3(i)(1)(A) of the Institution of Higher Education Sexual Misconduct
Reporting and Resource Accessibility Act of 2025, enacted on April 25, 2025 (D.C. Act 26-59;
72 DCR 5314), is amended by striking the number “104” and inserting the number “100” in its
place.
Sec. 8006. The Attorney General for the District of Columbia Clarification and Elected
Term Amendment Act of 2010, effective May 27, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-160; D.C. Official Code §
1-301.81 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 108d (D.C. Official Code § 1-301.88g) is redesignated as section 108g.
(b) Section 110 (D.C. Official Code § 1-301.88c) is redesignated as section 108c.
(c) Section 110a (D.C. Official Code § 1-301.88d) is redesignated as section 108d.
(d) Section 110b (D.C. Official Code § 1-301.88e) is amended as follows:
(1) Redesignate the section as section 108e.
(2) Subsection (e) is amended by striking the phrase “section 110a(b).” and
inserting the phrase “section 108d(b).” in its place.
Sec. 8008. Section 104(d)(2) of the Universal Paid Leave Amendment Act of 2016,
effective April 7, 2017 (D.C. Law 21-264; D.C. Official Code § 32-541.04(d)(2)), is amended by
striking the phrase “in paragraph (3),” and inserting the phrase “in paragraph (3) of this
subsection,” in its place.
Sec. 8009. Section 47-850 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “in subsection (a-1) of this section,”
and insert the phrase “in subsection (a-2) of this section,” in its place.
(b) The second subsection (f) is redesignated as subsection (h).
Sec. 8010. Section 201 of the Vacant to Vibrant Amendment Act of 2025, enacted on
August 11, 2025 (D.C. Act 26-128; __ DCR __), is amended as follows:
(a) Strike the phrase “Section 201” and insert the phrase “Section 202” in its place.
(b) Strike the phrase “10-562.01” and insert the phrase “10-562.02” in its place.
(c) Strike the phrase “Strategic Enforcement Plan” both times it appears and insert the
phrase “annual enforcement plan” in its place.
(d) Strike the phrase “Strategic Enforcement Plans” and insert the phrase “annual
enforcement plans” in its place.
(e) Strike the word “SEA” both times it appears and insert the word “Director” in its
place.
173

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
TITLE IX. APPLICABILITY; FISCAL IMPACT; EFFECTIVE DATE
Sec. 9001. Applicability.
Except as otherwise provided, this act shall apply as of October 1, 2025.
Sec. 9002. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 9003. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
174